Blacknail and Mahedium were walking through the city alone. It was a cloudy afternoon in Daggerpoint, as the pair made their way down one of the city’s main streets.

Several days had passed since the hobgoblin had rejoined Herad’s band. He’d spent most that time lying around, healing, and stuffing his face with food.

It was just after noon and the roads were crowded. Crowds of of bustling people were everywhere, so Blacknail wore his long dark brown cloak. With the hood up it completely concealed his form, and prevented him from drawing unwanted attention. The two of them still got the occasional second glance though. They made for an odd looking pair.

Mahedium was dressed up to impress. He wore a set of fine clothes including a red shirt with long loose sleeves. He had also shaved and gotten a haircut, which made him look much different than the disheveled and distracted man he usually seemed to be. Most importantly, he wore several pouches around his waist, and was carrying his staff.

Even though everyone on the street was armed, and half of them were thieves and killers, no one bothered them. A mage was more than the nearby thugs and pickpockets were willing to tangle with, and they didn’t know what to make of Blacknail.

The crowds grew thinner as they neared the Central Quarter of the city. The border was obvious in the daytime, but Blacknail had only been here at night before. Not only were the houses larger and better maintained there, but there were far less people on the street.

Several men with helmets who were holding long spears and wearing steel breastplates watched everyone who passed. Their choice of equipment made them stand out. Spears and shiny metal weren’t popular with most the other humans in the city, probably because they made it harder to run away.

The metal wearing humans didn’t stop anyone from passing into the Central Quarter, but only a few people seemed to want to walk past them anyway.

Blacknail noticed that the shiny men got a lot of hostile looks from other people on the street. Even though they were badly outnumbered by the nearby crowds no one tried to start anything, though. Obviously, the spearmen weren’t very popular, but they were respected warriors nonetheless.

As they were walking Mahedium turned to Blacknail, and pointed at the steel clad humans.

“Those are the Governor’s men, and we’re entering his territory. He allows anyone entry, but they have to obey his rules. Mostly, they involve keeping the streets orderly and clear. Stick by me, and don’t draw attention to us,” the mage told the hobgoblin.

Blacknail gave the mage an annoyed glare. That had been his plan anyway. He had obviously been doing that the entire way here, so why did Mahedium feel the need to mention it? Humans, other than his master, must just really like to hear themselves talk.

As they crossed the border Mahedium started to look nervous. He was very obviously staring at the guards out of the corner of his eye, and he’d grown twitchy. Blacknail on the other hand just strolled casually by; he didn’t see a reason to be nervous. There were already plenty of humans around, and these were just a few more.

The mage and the hobgoblin made it past the Governor’s men unimpeded; the spearmen didn’t try to stop them. As they headed deeper into the inner part of the city the houses and buildings began to get larger and fancier.

There were noticeably less people out and about as well. The humans here were better dressed, but the occasional group of thugs and miscreants still could be seen wandering around. The crowds were also quieter, and there was a lot less shouting.

As Blacknail observed the surroundings, a patrol of half a dozen of the armored men from before came down the street. These ones had swords instead of spears, but they were obviously from the same tribe as the border guards.

“We should be near the right place. Keep a look out for any signs that mention our destination,” Mahedium told the hobgoblin as they walked.

“I can’t do-ss the reading thing,” Blacknail pointed out.

“Ah, of course you can’t. I should have realized that; you’ve obviously never had a chance to learn. Maybe I’ll teach you the basics sometime,” Mahedium replied as he looked around.

Blacknail snorted. Why would he want to learn to read anyway? All his time was spent doing chores and learning useful things, like cooking and sword fighting. There were so many things he had to practice already. Reading seemed useless to him anyway; he would be better off burning books for warmth, or clubbing people over the head with them.

“Ah, there it is,” Mahedium exclaimed as he pointed to a building up ahead of them.

It was a large mansion surrounded by a wrought iron fence. The inner section of the city was where all the larger and better maintained homes were located, which in Daggerpoint just meant they were more than one story and weren’t in immediate danger of falling down.

This home however looked to be in good repair. There wasn’t a single shingle missing from the roof. The only obvious flaw was that the grounds were overgrown, but the fact it had grounds at all was impressive. Most the other buildings just had a large patch of mud out front.

The yard behind the iron fence had several large trees scattered across it. A long wild looking row of hedges ran along the path; up from the gate to the front door of the residence. There were also a few overgrown flower beds full of weeds. All the unkempt greenery cast a lot of shadows in the afternoon sun, and gave the building a sinister air.

Blacknail barely gave the house and yard a second glance though; his attention was focused on the large rough looking man standing on the other side of the gate. He had a sword at his hip and a mean look in his eyes that reminded Blacknail of the more dangerous bandits from Herad’s band. The man was without a doubt an experienced killer, and not one of the Governor’s men.

The hobgoblin eyed him carefully as he and the mage approached, and he couldn’t help but growl softly. The fact that such a human was being used as a guard made him more than a little uneasy. The owner of the house wasn’t messing around when it came to security.

The guard wasn’t looking their way, but Blacknail wasn’t fooled. He could tell by the man’s posture and movements that he’d noticed the two of them approaching. The man was good… not great, but still good. Mahedium didn’t seem to notice Blacknail’s concern, because he walked right up to the man and announced himself.

“I’m Mahedium Loggart and I have an appointment with your master. As per the agreement I have come armed and with one escort,” the mage declared confidently.

The guard gave Mahedium and Blacknail a brief look over. His stare was intense, but also indifferent at the same time. Blacknail had to stifle another growl; the man’s condescending attitude raised his hackles.

Without a word the man then stepped over and unlocked the gate, before throwing it open.

“Enter,” he told them emotionlessly.

Mahedium hesitated and an uneasy look flashed across his face. He was clearly thrown a little off balance by the guard’s attitude. After a few seconds though, he unfroze and walked through the gate. The hobgoblin shadowed him closely while keeping careful watch on the guard. He already didn’t like this place.

“He certainly wasn’t a cheery fellow. The master of this abode should really consider getting some friendlier staff. There’s something to be said for basic courtesy after all,” the mage muttered as he walked up the path to the house. “Why would anyone want such inhuman thugs around?”

Blacknail met Mahedium’s gaze. The mage blinked and stared at the hobgoblin for a second before sighing.

“Right, never mind,” he then muttered to himself.

The hedge loomed to their right as they approached the end of the path. When they got to the entrance Mahedium knocked politely. It was a massive wooden double doors. Almost immediately they began to swing open. The mage looked nervously through the entranceway. Another guard similar to the first one stood on the other side, and had opened the doors.

“Please take a seat,” he told them before stepping aside.

The room on the other side was huge and dark. It was two stories tall and large enough to fit dozens of people. A pair of staircases ran up the walls on either side of the room, and led to the second floor. The windows were few in number however, and had curtains on them that blocked the light. As a result, the corners of the room were dim and shadowy.

Mahedium threw Blacknail a nervous glance, but the hobgoblin just shrugged. The mage had been the one that had wanted to come here, and hobgoblins could see in the dark. With another sigh Mahedium stepped into the house.

“A flair for the dramatic is pretty common in mages, but this seems like overkill, even to me,” he muttered to himself.

Plush red furniture lined the room, including several couches and chairs, so Mahedium headed for the nearest set and sat down. Blacknail sat down beside him, in a chair that was as comfy as it was ornate and red.

Just as he was settling down, a casual breath brought an unexpected scent with it. The building smelled of human blood. Not just one person either, but many different humans. Blacknail was unsure of what to make of it, so he decided to ask.

The hobgoblin casually leaned over towards his companion, and whispered in his ear.

“It smells of human-ss blood here. Many different people-ss,” Blacknail told the mage.

Mahedium looked rather uncomfortable and wary of having Blacknail so close, but after the hobgoblin finished speaking his eyes narrowed and he frowned uneasily. He appeared to be thinking something over.

“It’s probably nothing; don’t worry about it,” the mage replied after a few seconds.

Blacknail shrugged and sat back down in his chair. He could tell the mage wasn’t being entirely forthcoming, and was somewhat concerned about something, but he didn’t really care. It was probably just some pointless human thing anyway.

After a few minutes of waiting for something to happen Mahedium began to scowl impatiently, and Blacknail grew bored. The hobgoblin could only amuse himself by examining the contents of the room for so long.

The guard by the door was particularly boring, as all he did was stare straight ahead. The hobgoblin was tempted to throw something at him, just to see what would happen. He doubted Mahedium would approve though.

Blacknail shifted restlessly in his seat. At least the chair he was sitting in was very comfy. As he moved the plush cushions made him spring up into the air slightly. He smiled at the unusual sensation, and did it again on purpose.

Soon the bored hobgoblin was bouncing up and down on the chair and snickering to himself in amusement. The chair was just so soft and springy! He needed to find a chair like this to borrow when no one was using it, or around to see him.

Blacknail’s antics finally caused the man by the door to turn towards the visitors. He began scowling at the hobgoblin in annoyance, and with more than a little disbelief. Mahedium noticed as well.

“Stop that, it’s impolite. Just sit still,” he whispered to Blacknail.

The hobgoblin sighed but did as he’d been told; it had been getting old anyway. Once Blacknail had settled down, they only had to wait a few more minutes for their host to arrive. A set of doors across the room were thrown open and two men stepped out.

The first was an older man, even older than Saeter. He wore immaculate black clothing with silver lining, was bald, and sported a neatly trimmed short white beard. His face was wrinkled with age, but his eyes were sharp and his movements swift and full of purpose.

Behind him came another man who looked to be another one of the house’s guards. Like the others he was a large man with a cold focused stare. He also wore the same black and grey uniform. Blacknail could tell by the warrior’s body language that he was subordinate to the white haired elder.

The pair quickly crossed the floor of the room, and drew near their guests. Mahedium politely rose to meet them and Blacknail followed suit, mostly because it made it easier for him to fight or flee.

As the mage stepped forward the hobgoblin fell in behind him in mimicry of the old man’s guard. By doing so he made his role obvious, and was thus much more likely to be overlooked.

“Welcome, you must be Mahedium. Thank you for waiting. I simply had some other business I had to attend to. I’m known as Master Avolus, and that is how you may address me,” the older man told the mage.

He then reached out and extended a white gloved hand. After a second of hesitation Mahedium extended his own arm and they shook hands.

“Ah, it’s a pleasure to meet you Master Avolus. Pardon me, but you must be the mage I corresponded with, then?” Mahedium asked respectfully.

“Indeed I am. I must say that I’m also glad to meet you. It’s been a while since I’ve had an opportunity to converse with a colleague. Rogue mages with an interest in thaumaturgic research are very rare. The guilds are usually very successful in weeding us out, and of course they’re not the only ones who benefit from monopolizing magical knowledge,” Avolus said with a smile that didn’t quite reach his eyes.

Mahedium’s eyes narrowed slightly at the other man’s words and tone. They were more than a little suspicious, and Blacknail was sure he detected a hint of threat in them.

“Yes well, I’m a skilled combat mage with quite a few powerful crystals at my disposal. I could show them to you if you like. I was also very lucky in coming across Mistress Herad, and in being allowed to join her band. In fact she expressed interest in this visit herself, and wanted me to tell her all about it as soon as I got back,” Mahedium replied dryly.

“Well then I’d better be on my best behavior, I’d hate for her to think badly of me,” the older man said with a faint smile.

Blacknail didn’t like the older man’s grin. He looked like he knew some secret joke no one else was aware of. The hobgoblin hated not getting a joke.

He also didn’t like what the body language of the old man’s guard was telling him. The huge thug’s face was calm and unreadable, but his posture betrayed his contempt for his master’s guests. Yet, the bodyguard was also looked ready to act at anytime, as if he expected a fight of some sort to break out.

“I feel like sitting,” Avorlus then remarked.

He snapped his fingers and pointed to a small nearby table. Instantly, the guard by the door hurried over and picked the table up. He rushed over at put it down in front of the older man. Avorlus then pointed to a nearby chair, and the guard brought that over as well.

Mahedium nodded and both mages sat down across from each other at the table. Avorlus’ guard took up position standing behind his master’s chair. Blacknail copied him again, and stood behind Mahedium.

“Well then, now that we’ve been properly introduced, feel free to make yourself comfortable. We have much to discuss,” the older mage told them.

“This is a rather nice home you have here, your business must be quite profitable,” Mahedium politely commented.

“It certainly pays the bills and keeps me fed. There’s always a demand for elixir in Daggerpoint, and the city is short on suppliers. What about you, how are you finding the city?” Avorlus replied with a smug grin.

“Well enough. It’s nice to be out from under the guilds, and take destiny into my own hands. There are no lords or guild masters here to exploit me, and tell me what I can and can’t learn,” the other mage answered.

“Very true. I myself found them quite stifling as well. Daggerpoint of course is not without its own dangers,” Avorlus replied.

“Obviously, you’ve managed to prosper though,” the younger mage remarked.

“You seem to know a fair bit about my own operations, but I know next to nothing about you. May I enquire as to your own knowledge and background? Your note was intriguing, but severely lacking in detail,” Avorlus asked.

Now it was Mahedium’s turn to smile knowingly.

“I’m sure there’s not much I could tell you that you don’t already know. A man so obviously as intelligent and successful as yourself would have already looked into my history as soon as my note arrived. It’s also not like my past is a secret. You, on the other hand, are quite the enigma though,” the younger mage replied.

“Straight down to business it is then. When you first contacted me you suggested an exchange of knowledge would be to both our interests. That seems unlikely to me, but I’d like to know what you have to offer anyway. As you’ve already correctly determined I’m a maker of Elixirs,” Avorlus said.

“And you’ve amassed yourself a fortune, by secretly selling them to bandit chieftains using intermediaries,” Mahedium remarked.

Avorlus nodded in response, so Mahedium continued speaking.

“My own area of expertise lies in a different area of research. I specialize in creating spell crystals. I have the skills and knowledge to grow them from scratch,” Mahedium told the other man as he reached into his coat.

The old mage’s guard tensed at Mahedium’s movement, but didn’t act further. Master Avorlus barely reacted. His fake looking smile didn’t falter at all.

The younger mage then pulled out a small pouch and emptied it onto the table. Half a dozen transparent crystals rolled across the table. Avorlus’ white eyebrows rose slightly in surprise.

“They are a gift, from me to you. A token of my respect and an offer of friendship,” the younger mage explained. 







DOB 9









Master Avorlus reached down and picked the largest stone up with two fingers. It was slightly smaller than his closed fist. He stared at it for a second and it pulsed with light.

“These are all light crystals,” the older mage observed impassively.

“Yes well, since I see that you’re using candles to light your home, I think these will be quite useful to you,” Mahedium replied.

The older man grunted and eyed Mahedium with new interest.

“Yes, these would be quite useful, but worth Elixirs? I don’t believe so. You can’t compare the ability to uplift mere men into Vessels to something that’s a small improvement over a candle,” he remarked scornfully.

“Perhaps, but light crystals don’t kill most the people who try and use them either, and I have other stones,” Mahedium countered.

“So what if you do? I make more than enough money to buy as many crystals as I want by selling Elixirs. Why do I need you?” the older mage replied.

Mahedium didn’t seem concerned by Avorlus’ argument. He leaned back in his chair and appeared to relax.

“You can’t use your potions yourself though. You’re a mage not a Vessel. Are you really satisfied with granting other people power, and not finding ways to make and use magic for yourself?” he asked.

“You’re assuming I don’t know how to make my own spell stones,” Avorlus responded coldly.

Blacknail wasn’t fooled though. The older man was looking less composed and sure of himself now. Mahedium leaned forward and stared hard into the other mage’s eyes.

“I know you can’t, for the same reasons I know you can’t actually buy all the crystals you want. This home is lit by candles instead of magic. Where are all the crystals you’re supposedly buying? I’ll tell you where. They’re tucked away somewhere safe, or hidden about your person in case of an emergency. You’re never going to use them though; they’ll lay there forever. You won’t risk wasting them when you can never be sure you’ll be able to replace them, and thus you’ll never be truly free to use the power that is yours by right,” Mahedium explained with calm intensity.

The younger mage kept up eye contact with the older mage, as he reached down and picked up one of the spell stones on the table. He concealed it in his closed fist, before it burst to life. The light from the crystal was so strong the shadows of the bones in his hand were visible as light blazed out from between his fingers. Then the light died, and Mahedium dropped the used up spell stone onto the table.

“Power that can’t be used as one wishes, is not truly power at all,” he commented dryly.

Avorlus looked away. His teeth were clenched hard together, and he looked unsettled now.

“Very well, I’m listening. What do you propose?” he replied few seconds later in a defeated tone.

“Let us start by being forthright with each other. We could sit here all day making cryptic comments and never accomplish anything. Instead though, let’s put our cards on the table, and see what we have to trade,” Mahedium suggested.

Avorlus coolly eyed the younger mage for a few seconds, but then nodded. Seeing this, Mahedium continued talking.

“I have next to no information on the process of creating Elixirs, and you do. I can show you the basic techniques for creating spell stones however. What would you be willing to trade for it?” he asked.

“Trade? You’re here in my home begging favors from me. I’m an experienced mage and you’re nothing but a young upstart. I might teach you something in exchange for the scraps of knowledge you possess, but that doesn’t make us equals,” Avorlus responded coldly.

The old bald bearded mage then raised a gloved hand to reveal he held a crystal against his palm. Black smoke began to curl and rise menacingly upward from the spell stone. Blacknail really didn’t like the look of that, or the smell. It reminded him of rotten eggs.

Mahedium tensed at the other mage’s actions. His own hand inched towards one of the spell stones concealed up his sleeve.

“I should warn you that I have a rather large force stone tucked up against my skin right now. If you do anything too sudden I might ignite it, and reduce everything in this room to smithereens,” Mahedium told the older mage, as he reached up his sleeve and pulled out a small wand. The end of the rod held a small crystal, and it began to thrum and vibrate.

He didn’t point it at anyone, but he didn’t have to, the message was clear. He wasn’t intimidated by the other mage’s display. Blacknail got ready to draw his own weapon and fight as well. He would have preferred to flee, but the door was guarded and all the windows were too small to squeeze through.

The two mages eyes met, and they stared defiantly at each other. Then Avorlus chuckled, and smiled humorlessly.

“You’re very determined, I see. Good, maybe you’re worth dealing with after all,” he remarked.

Mahedium’s posture relaxed at the other man’s words, but he didn’t put his wand back away. Blacknail continued to stare at the mage’s bodyguard, who was staring right back at him. The hobgoblin wasn’t exactly sure what he was going to do if he actually had to fight this massive human, but that didn’t stop him glaring menacingly.

Avorlus noticed his guest’s hostility and sighed dramatically. He then carefully placed his spell stone on the table in front of him.

“Your turn,” he remarked confidently.

Mahedium gave the older mage a hard stare, but relented a second later. He tucked his wand back into his sleeve, and out of sight.

“I think you’ll find that I’m willing to do practically anything to increase my knowledge of magic. Now, what are you willing to trade for the basic techniques for creating spell stones,” Mahedium asked the other mage.

“As am I, young mage. Over the years I have collected quite a bit of information on the crystal growing process. I’ve never had any luck making it work though; the information is incomplete. There are however a few formulas for spells in there that I’m sure would be of great value to you, though. I will exchange this knowledge for the basic techniques you’ve acquired,” Avorlus offered carefully.

“I would have to look it over before agreeing to anything,” was Mahedium’s answer.

“I will allow you to read a sample of the writings beforehand,” Avorlus told him.

“Acceptable, but there are other areas I’m interested in as well,” the younger mage replied.

Avorlus tensed slightly and leaned backwards. The hostile look from earlier returned to his eyes. Mahedium didn’t seem surprised or concerned though.

“You have nothing valuable enough to trade for my knowledge of Elixirs,” the older man replied coldly.

“So I understand, but I’m not asking for anything like all your knowledge. I simply need to be able to create one specific formula, that which my leader Herad uses. She requires a new source of the Ressertein Elixir, and has tasked me with procuring it for her. Your business would remain undisturbed,” Mahedium explained.

“Do you have anything to offer me for this? If not, then she’ll just have to purchase it from me like everyone else. I’m not afraid of the bandit chiefs,” Avorlus told him coldly.

Mahedium rubbed his chin thoughtfully, and looked off to one side for a second.

“I have some unique Vessel samples you might be interested it. They come from a rather interesting source,” he told the other man.

“They would have to be very interesting indeed.” Avorlus remarked doubtfully.

“Oh, they are. Blacknail would you please remove your hood,” Mahedium asked.

From where he was standing behind his chair the hobgoblin gave the mage a curious look. He didn’t really want to reveal himself in such a plain manner. It wasn’t… fun enough. Everyone was now looking his way, and Avorlus looked caught between curiosity and confusion.

“Now, please,” Mahedium requested impatiently, but with a trace of humor.

Blacknail sighed, but then did as he was told. He flipped his hood down, and then gave the guard across from him a broad toothy smile. The reaction was immediate. Avorlus flinched away from him, and his guard went for his sword.

“Fuck me,” the guard whispered to himself.

This caused Blacknail’s smile to widen. He had won the game, and made the stupid human say something aloud! Mahedium calmly reached into his sleeve and withdrew the small wand again, which he pointed at the guard.

“There’s no need for violence; he’s friendly as long as you are. However, if you attempt to raise your blade against him then he’ll be the least of your worries, because I’ll blast you across the room so fast you won’t know what hit you,” Mahedium told them.

“What is this thing that you’ve brought into my home?” Avorlus asked in shock. His eyes were wide with alarm, and his wrinkled face and grown paler.

Blacknail hissed in annoyance at the man’s tone and words. It was more than a little insulting. The older mage’s hand had also slipped into one of his pockets where it was clenching something. Blacknail was sure it was a weapon or spell stone of some sort.

“It’s a hobgoblin, and also a Vessel. He’s the sample I was talking about before. Introduce yourself Blacknail,” Mahedium said.

“Hello. I promise not to kill you, or other bad things,” Blacknail told them cheerfully.

Avorlus continued to stare in shock at Blacknail; he didn’t seem reassured.

“See? He’s actually a rather nice fellow when you get to know him,” Mahedium added with a smile of his own.

Avorlus turned his attention to the younger mage, and then seemed to relax and regain his composure. He made a waving motion at the guard behind him, and the other man relaxed as well.

“It’s a Vessel you say? Any idea which Elixir?” the older mage asked with obvious interest.

“I’m a he, not an it,” Blacknail told the man with forced smile.

“I have no idea, but the blood work I did was conclusive. I was hoping you could tell us more,” Mahedium answered.

“I must admit to never seeing a non-human vessel before. I’ve heard of them of course, though. Some of the guilds create hunting dogs or warhorses, but they’re the play toys of the high nobility. How did he become a Vessel, and why do you think I will be interested in studying him?” Avorlus asked.

“That’s an interesting question. Blacknail was originally picked up by one of Herad’s men when they liberated him from a caravan, which just happened to have been guarded by a mage.”

“From which guild?” Avorlus asked curiously.

“I’m getting to that. It was before I joined, but Herad actually keeps records of everything she procures and sells. She also had some papers from the merchants themselves. From descriptions of the mage and the records I was able to determine that he was attached to that caravan in order to guard a shipment of materials for his guild; the Purple Hearts,” Mahedium explained.

“I see; the goblin was part of the cargo,” Avorlus whispered to himself, as an excited grin broke out on his wrinkled face.

Blacknail didn’t see, or understand either. What were these mages talking about?

“Indeed, the Purple Heart guild is known for its work on non-human vessels,” Mahedium remarked.

‘Why would they experiment in order to create a goblin Vessel, though?” Avorlus mused.

“Why do the guilds do anything? I’ve heard the Purple Hearts have an elixir for house cats! Goblin Vessels seem sane compared to that,” Mahedium replied with a roll of his eyes.
“True, it was probably just some student’s thesis project, which turned out to be an unexpected success. Was the goblin the only thing of interest from the caravan?” the older mage asked.

“No, when she raided the caravan Herad captured some other wares that I believe were also their work. She didn’t think much of them and neither did any of her buyers, so they were still sitting around her base camp when I joined,” Mahedium remarked.

“You have them, here?” the older gentleman asked with eyes that shone with hunger.

“Of course, naturally I collected everything that even hinted at magic when I joined. At the time though, couldn’t figure out what any of it was, so I dismissed it as useless. With your help though, and knowing that one of the samples is probably an Elixir for Blacknail…” the younger mage explained.

“Reverse engineering an Elixir is not an easy task. The Elixir itself is far more than the sum of its parts; once the mage blood is added it becomes active, and is completely transformed,” Avorlus explained.

“In the same way a crystal is grown from a mineral base and mage’s blood,” Mahedium commented.

Blacknail frowned in frustration as he realized what the mages had just said. You needed mage blood to make Elixirs. That ruined his plan to find out how to make it for himself, and not be reliant on Mahedium for his magic.

“You’re asking for time tested knowledge, in exchange for nothing but possibilities,” their bearded host said.

“True, but I’m only asking for very basic knowledge that costs you nothing. If you’re nearly as good an alchemist as you seem to be you, then you should be able to reverse engineer the Purple Heart’s work. Think about what you would get from that, cutting edge guild research. A brand new unknown Elixir,” Mahedium countered.

Blacknail grinned as an idea occurred to him. Scamp was a mage right? He could just use his blood! The little troublemaker undoubtedly had more blood than he was using anyway.

“You’re playing me like a flute,” Avorlus told the other mage with a dramatic sigh.

“We’re simply engaging in an exchange. You’re losing nothing,” the other mage replied with a smile.

“We’ll see. I agree to both of the deals. I’d like to start as soon as possible. Come back tomorrow morning, and I’ll have a lab set up,” their host told Mahedium.

The other mage nodded, stood up, and then extended a hand. The two men shook, and then after a few brief words one of the guards escorted them out.

They had no more trouble from their hosts on the way out. That was good because Avorlus’ smoke crystal had apparently ended up in Blacknail’s pocket. Blacknail wasn’t sure how; it wasn’t like he wanted the smelly thing.

As Blacknail and Mahedium walked back down the pathway that led to the iron gate and off the property, the hobgoblin considered what had just happened.

Blacknail led the way towards the house where Herad was waiting. Just in case things had gone badly she had brought some men and they were waiting nearby. As they moved onto a deserted street, the hobgoblin heard several people step out of an alley onto the road behind them.

He turned around to get a look at them and saw that they were thugs, like those that could be found all over Daggerpoint. This was the Central District though, and groups of a dozen men such as them were very rare here. Blacknail was too paranoid to think they presence was just a coincidence.

Then one of the men raised a crossbow, and Blacknail’s eyes went wide in alarm. He tackled Mahedium and threw both the mage and himself to the ground, just as a crossbow bolt zoomed past them. They hit the cobblestones hard, and Mahedium grunted in surprise in pain.

“What’s going on?” the mage wheezed.

“Enemies, and a crossbow!” Blacknail hissed angrily, as he scrambled back to his feet. He didn’t like being ambushed. That was his thing; he did the ambushing, not the other way around!

The man with the crossbow began to load it again, and his companions drew their own weapons and rushed towards Blacknail and Mahedium. The hobgoblin immediately began looking for somewhere to run. There was no way he could fight so many humans. He would also probably have to leave Mahedium behind…

As Blacknail was planning his escape, Mahedium pushed himself up onto his knees. Then the mage leveled his staff at the armed thugs racing towards him. The crystal at the end glowed orange, and its power exploded out.

The thugs between Mahedium and the crossbowman were knocked backwards and caught fire. The crossbowman himself was instantly set ablaze. Several of the attackers died instantly, but they were the lucky ones. Screams of pain filled the air as some of the other flaming thugs began flailing around in pain and panic. The smell of roasting meat filled the corpse littered street.

The remaining unharmed attackers stopped and looked stunned, before deciding to make a run for it. They all quickly dashed out of sight. They didn’t want to risk meeting the same fate as their companions. Mahedium was looking at the destruction he had wrought with a satisfied look on his face.

“The question is whether these were Werick’s men, or if Avorlus sent them,” the mage mused aloud.

“Think later! We need to go, now!” Blacknail hissed.

He heard yelling off in the distance. He was pretty sure it was the Governor’s men coming to investigate the disturbance. Quickly, the hobgoblin grabbed Mahedium and began dragging the mage towards Herad and the rest of the band.

Mahedium had surprised him. He was far more clever and dangerous than he usually pretended to be. He acted so clueless sometimes that it was easy to forget all the power he had at his fingertips.

Blacknail wondered if the man was hiding his real self, or if he had simply risen to the occasion. Regardless, the hobgoblin planned to keep an eye on him. If only to make sure they never became enemies, and so he could find out the man’s weaknesses if they ever did.







INT: DOD







The leafy branch shifted as he pushed it out of the way, and the man’s efforts were rewarded by the sight of his destination. Up ahead, through several paces of thick forest, stood the claim marker. It was little more than a post with a long piece of red cloth tied to it, but it did its job.

Beside the marker he would find the cave they’d discovered last month. He could still remember it like it had been yesterday. While out surveying the hills, he and his partner and had stumbled across the opening. After a brief debate they had risked a brief foray inside, and they hadn’t been disappointed by what they’d found within.

“Stop standing there and blocking the way, Elred! There are people behind you, and they don’t want to stand in the middle of the woods just so you can take in the scenery,” a deep voice said from behind him.

Elred sighed in annoyance, but started walking forward again. When he had stepped out from beneath the forest canopy and into the sun he turned around, and watched the rest of his party emerge from the trees.

“Why didn’t you take the lead if you’re in such a hurry, Desleth?” he asked his partner.

“Because if someone was going to walk into a mimic or a troll I didn’t want it to be me,” Desleth replied with a chuckle.

Elred rolled his eyes in annoyance. He had been partnered with Desleth for over a decade, and the man’s sense of humor was still as annoying as ever.

“I scouted this path just a few minutes ago. No one is in any danger of walking into a mimic, and you don’t walk into trolls. You won’t see one until it attacks, and then it will pick out the weakest target,” their guide Katha interjected.

“Hear that Elred? That means it would definitely attack you,” Desleth remarked.

“Ha ha, you’re hilarious,” Elred replied in a distracted manner as he scanned the nearby rocks.

“Don’t even joke about trolls. Mimics or goblins are one thing, but trolls are another. If you guys weren’t paying so well I wouldn’t have left Coroulis,” one of the miners added, as he walked out of the woods and into the clearing.

Soon everyone had gathered in the rocky clearing around the claim marker. A huge pile of stones dominated the middle of the forest clearing. Tall trees and thick greenery surrounded them on every side, but the sky above was blue and clear.

There were around a dozen people in their group, and seven pack mules. As Elred watched, everyone began settling down. Packs were discarded, and animals were tied up.

Most of them were handpicked men from the Surveyors’ Guild. That meant they had all signed a contract that acknowledged this claim belonged to Elred and his partner. Guild men were expensive, but they were worth it because using them prevented claim jumping and theft.

Katha was their guide, and was holding up the rear of the group. She was an average sized woman with a lean hard cast to her features, and long brown hair that was tied back in a ponytail.

Elred and his partner had debated hiring her, since she wasn’t strictly necessary to find the claim. In the end, Elred had convinced his partner that they could afford her and an expert on the forest would make the trip much safer. Having her around had certainly reassured him. Running into a troll was unlikely this close to civilization, but not impossible.

The last member of their party was a mage from the Earth Breakers. The mage guild had a deal with the surveyors, and was informed every time a new cavern system was discovered. The mage’s name was Seraj, and he was apparently a specialist in exploring the Dark Paths.

The man seemed agreeable enough, and would probably end up being useful. Elred hoped the mage ended up disappointed with their trip, though. The only reason he was here was to search for crystals, and if he found any it would make their trip a lot more dangerous. Mining in caves that possibly connected to the Dark Paths was bad enough, while mining near crystals was almost suicide.

“We may as well set up here,” Desleth remarked, as he started unpacking his bag.

The group of miners then spent the next hour helping set up their camp. When they were done Elred called a meeting, and they began discussing exploring the cave.

“I’ll be staying up here. You hired me to guide you through forest, not underground,” Katha told them.

“Oh come on! It’s not really any more dangerous down there than in the forest,” Desleth exclaimed in exasperation.

“The forest is my home, the Deeps aren’t,” she replied.

Desleth looked like he wanted to argue, but Eldred cut him off.

“That’s fine, Katha. It’s a good idea to have someone patrolling the woods, anyway. Just make sure nothing dangerous wanders into camp,” he told her.

She gave a brief nod and then turned away. Desleth was scowling, but Eldeth ignored him. There was no point in forcing Katha to enter the cave with them.

Lanterns and rope were then taken out and passed around. Last but hardly least, most of the party armed themselves with hooked spears. They were the weapon of choice for fighting underground.

Hidden among the rocks behind the marker was a crack in the earth. The miners approached the opening and gazed down into it. It wasn’t that deep. You could jump down to the bottom and easily climb out, even if the tight walls and rocky bottom made that a stupid idea.

On the far side of the pit was the actual entrance to the cave though. It was a dark crack in the wall that led deeper under the earth.

From where Elred was standing it didn’t look like there had been a collapse or anything, not that he’d expected there to have been one. A quick look around also failed to turn up any signs of bears or other unwanted wildlife.

“The first thing we’ll have to do is fix up this entrance; It’s much too hard to get in and out of the crack,” Desleth remarked as he stared down into the chasm.

“We’ll throw some dirt down there to make a ramp, and maybe widen the cave mouth. First let’s get this initial sweep over with,” Elred responded.

His partner nodded and then climbed down into the chasm. When he reached the bottom a few seconds later, one of the men threw him a lantern. Desleth lit it, and then one by one the group started down after him.

As Elred jumped down, his partner stepped into the cave mouth and out of sight. It was a tight fit in the chasm, the rocky walls pressed into Elred from both sides. Rocks scrapped against him as he pushed forward after his partner and the rest of their group.

As he stepped into the rocky maw the light of the sun vanished and everything grew dark. All he could see was the flickering lantern lights ahead of him, and the flashes of light they cast on the cavern walls.

When his vision had adjusted Elred was greeted by the sight of a twisting rock corridor. By the light of the lanterns the grey walls of the cave seemed to have a reddish cast to them. The sound of water dripping could be heard echoing from further in, and the air was moist and warm.

The rest of his party was strung out in front of him, and at the very front was Desleth with a lantern. He was standing beside the mage, and seemed to be conversing with him. After a few seconds Seraj nodded and pulled out a lantern of his own. This one however wasn't full of oil, but held a crystal instead.

It flared to life, and the cave was suddenly illuminated by steady bright white light. Desleth smiled and snuffed out his own lantern. The cavern looked very different now. The crystal light was much brighter, and made everything look paler instead of red. It also didn’t create any smoke, which was definitely a good thing.

The party resumed moving forward at a slow pace. The prize was still a bit further in, and Elred was excited to lay his eyes on it again, but he also didn’t want to die. Moving quickly while underground was a good way to get yourself killed.

Feeling impatient, Elred moved his way up the line and next to his partner and the mage. They had both stopped walking, and were scanning the shadows between the stalagmites that hung from the ceiling. Desleth then turned around and addressed one of the men behind him.

“Pass me your spear, please,” he told the miner.

Immediately, the man’s spear was tossed up to Desleth, who caught it out of the air. He then aimed it upwards at the ceiling. A second later he stabbed at something behind one of the stalagmites, and there was a hissing noise.

When Desleth’s partner withdrew the spear there was a wriggling form impaled on the tip. Tentacles waved madly through the air and the thing flopped around uselessly for a few seconds, before going limp. The creature looked like a large grey octopus, but with a thick wing-like membrane stretching between all its limbs.

“I see you’ve killed our expedition’s first stone strangler,” Elred remarked, as he joined the mage and his partner.

“It’s just a small one; barely an adult, see,” Desleth responded as he swung the spear towards Elred.

“Hey, watch it!” Elred exclaimed as the spear tip and the dead creature were shoved towards his face.

“Don’t worry; it’s very dead,” his partner said with a humorous grin.

“Ya, but you could still take my eye out with that thing,” Elred replied, as he pushed the spear away and frowned in annoyance.

Some of the miners they’d hired were giving the stone strangler nervous looks. So of course, Desleth waved the corpse in their direction.

“It’s just a stone strangler. It’s only really dangerous if it lands on your head and suffocates you to death, before someone else can cut it off of you,” he told them.

Seraj turned towards Desleth. He had an un-amused look on his face.

“You’re right; there are much worse things down here in the depths than stone stranglers. So, let’s not let it distract us from other threats. We need to stay focused,” the mage told them.

“Good luck with that, because there’s the first of the gold,” Desleth replied smugly as he pointed deeper down into the cavern.

Instantly, everyone went silent and looked that way. They all peered past each other expectantly. The only one that was looking was Elred. He could have sworn he’d heard something move behind him, but he didn’t see anything there among the rocks and shadows. It was probably just water…

Seraj held his lantern up, and golden veins suddenly shone brightly across the cavern wall, and formed intricate mesmerizing patterns. It was beautiful.

“Thank the gods,” someone mumbled.

Everyone now had stupid grins on their faces. The only person who didn’t seem particularly happy was the mage. In fact he was scowling in displeasure.

“Alright that’s enough. It’s not going anywhere. We need to continue scouting down this passage before anyone can get to mining. If it leads down into the Dark Paths I might have to seal it,” Seraj told them all.

“And we need to see if there’s any more gold down there as well,” Desleth added with a mischievous grin.

After everyone’s fascination with the gold had worn off, they reluctantly moved on and continued on deeper into the cave. Soon, they reached the deepest reaches that Elred and Desleth had entered.

When they had first scouted the passage it had been bare and mostly empty of anything but rock. That wasn’t the case anymore. Piles of dirt lay around the place, and mushrooms were growing from them.

“No wonder there was a strangler so close to the entrance, while we were gone harvesters have moved in,” Elred remarked.

The air was heavy with moisture here, and smelled slightly of compost. It wasn’t a terrible smell, but it wasn’t a good one either.

“Ya, that’s not good,” Desleth added as he looked around.

“They’re just harvesters. The bugs are completely harmless,” one of the miners said.

“They might be completely harmless, but not all the things that come to eat their mushrooms are, and the things that come to eat those things certainly aren’t,” Elred explained.

Seraj nodded in agreement as he raised his crystal lantern up over his head, and scanned the surroundings. The light glinted off the shell of the occasional harvester that was busy working among the mushrooms, or that had taken flight.

“Them being here makes it far more likely that this cave leads to the Dark paths as well. Let’s hope the passage is small and easy to seal,” the mage added.

One of the miners approached one of the harvester mounds and was studying it. Suddenly, he yelped and fell backwards. The soil in front of him roiled and a small thin crab-like creature unburied itself, and swiftly scuttled away.

“It’s just a lurker. They’re harmless unless you’re a rodent,” Elred said in relief.

Several of the other miners chuckled at their fallen companion, whose face had turned red in embarrassment. Seraj threw them all a disapproving glare and they grew quiet.

The mage then started walking forward again, so everyone reluctantly followed him. The twisting passages they moved through continued to be full of harvesters and their mounds. Twice they had to stop to spear stone stranglers that lurked up in the shadows of the uneven ceiling.

They didn’t however find any more gold, much to Desleth’s disappointment. Elred was fine with that though. There was more than enough of the stuff near the entrance to set them up for life, if they managed to get it home.

“How much longer are we going to explore?” he asked the mage. “Because this is just more of the same; rocky stone passages full of dirt mushrooms and bugs.”

“It looks like the way forward widens significantly up ahead. We’ll see what’s there, and then decide,” the mage replied as he continued walking.

Elred sighed, and shared a knowing look with Desleth. The bloody mage was probably looking for trouble, and hoping to find some signs of crystals. Everyone else was happy with the gold, but apparently not Seraj. Elred really hoped the mage didn’t find anything up ahead.

The sound of dripping water grew stronger as they moved carefully forward, until Elred realized why. The natural chamber up ahead of them was much wider than the passage they’d just come from, and in the center lay a pond sized pool of crystal clear water.

Long stalagmites reached down from the roof. Several of them reached all the way down to the ground, and formed smooth stone pillars. Just with a quick glance around Elred was able to see at least two side passages that led deeper underground, and probably to the Dark Paths.

The entire chamber echoed with the hypnotic sound of lapping water, and falling droplets. The only other noise was the rasping breath of the newly arrived men.
The floor of the chamber was several feet below them, and its smooth layered surface had obviously been worn down by water over countless ages.

“Well, isn’t that something,” Desleth remarked with a hint of awe in his voice.

“I wonder if any other human has ever set his eyes on this before,” Elred mused aloud.

Seraj just grunted in reply. He then raised his lantern high and it flared brighter than ever. The white light burned the shadows from the chamber ahead of them, and revealed its hidden contents. Tall bumps scattered across the floor that Elred had taken to be rocks or natural formations were actually alive.

There were dozens of the creatures, and each one of them was the size of a large dog. The light seemed to startle them because the closest ones started moving. Six long legs stuck out from a body that resembled a gigantic insect or crab.

Their grey shells were curved and spiky in a way that helped them camouflage with the stone. Two huge wicked looking pincers extended out from the front of the beasts.

“Cave crabs, they’re nasty if you get close to them, but not man eaters. Unless you’re already dead, that is,” Elred said.

“Ya, this looks like the perfect place to seal the tunnel. It’s a shame though, that we won’t be able to see this ever again,” Desleth remarked.

Elred was just about to reply when he noticed Seraj was staring intently at the center of the chamber, and the pool of water there. He followed the mage’s gaze and didn’t see anything at first, but then the water rippled ominously. Something large and pale glided through it.

“What is it?” Elred asked the mage nervously.

Seraj didn’t reply; he just watched the pool. The other members of the party began to mutter amongst themselves in alarm.

Then a massive white creature dragged itself out of the water. It was long, longer than a man was tall, even if you didn’t include the tail it was dragging behind it. Its skin was practically transparent it was so pale, and veins could be seen running beneath it.

It was a huge salamander. It crawled cross the cavern floor on four short legs, but it moved smoothly and with grace. Its long snout was pointed in their direction, and it was clearly headed their way.

Its tongue flickered in and out of its mouth, which opened to reveal row upon rows of tiny razor sharp teeth. A pair of gills ran along the side of its neck, but the most startling thing about it was its eyes. It didn’t have any. Its skull was completely smooth where they should have been, and yet it was swiftly and unerringly racing towards them.

“Okay that’s dangerous. I’ve never seen one of those,” Desleth remarked nervously.

“It’s a blind hunter, and yes it’s very dangerous. This one shouldn’t be too much of a problem though. Creatures such as it are at their most dangerous when you don’t see them coming,” Seraj remarked.

The mage then passed Desleth his light, and raised his staff. He aimed the end of it towards the salamander that was stalking towards them. A second later the air rippled and a bolt of force shot out towards the blind hunter.

The magical attack missed the salamander, but slammed into the ground beside it. Bits of rock flew through the air, and a loud cracking sound reverberated through the cavern. The attacking salamander was thrown off its feet and sent flying into a nearby stone pillar, as a wave of air washed over the watchers.

The noise startled the cave crabs, and they began running for shelter. Several dashed into the water and disappeared, while others hid among the rocks. The salamander itself lay prone and unmoving.

“See, as long as you don’t let them sneak up on you they’re not a real problem,” the mage told the others as he grinned smugly.

That was when Elred heard a scuttling sound on the rocks below them. His first thought was that the noise was probably a cave crab. He leaned over the ledge at his feet to check.

A rather large cave crab was climbing up the rocks, and headed in their direction. He sighed with relief, when he realized that it wasn’t anything worse.

Wait... The cave crab was rather large; it probably weighed as much a man, and it had an odd purplish tint to its carapace. In fact, it kind of looked like it had bits of crystal growing on it...

“Shit, mutant crab,” Elred yelled in panic as he backed away.

“Get back, all of you,” Seraj yelled as he stepped forward.

He almost seemed excited at the presence of the mutant. Fucking mages, and their obsession with crystals!

No one needed to be told twice. The miners and their two employers hurried back into the passage behind them. The mage himself took a few steps back. He then waited for the monster to pull itself up over the ledge, so he could get a clear shot with his staff.

Just as the creature reached the top it lunged at Seraj, and he fired his staff. The bolt of force hit the mutant head on. It seemed to hang in the air for a second, with its claws extended and its legs dangling below it, until the moment ended and the creature ruptured.

Purple flames burst out from its crumbling shell and washed over the mage. Seraj had no time to protect himself. There was a brief scream before he vanished behind the curtain of fire.

The cave rumbled and bits of rock fell around them. Elred looked up in alarm. The cave was collapsing!

“Run!” Desleth yelled as he took off towards safety.

Everyone else was right behind him. Luckily, Desleth still had the mage’s lantern and it lit their way. They all ran madly towards the exit as the flames and falling rocks chased them. The sound of shifting stone was overpowering now, and the air was hot and dry. One of the men beside Elred tripped and fell. No one had any time to help him, or even look back.

Up ahead the exit came into sight, and daylight streamed through the opening. The rumbling behind them seemed to have stopped, but everyone was still too terrified to stop running. They couldn’t all fit through the entrance at the same time though, so Elred slowed.

Desleth had already reached the exit, but he’d also stopped there and was lighting the way for the others. As the men in front of him fought to get outside, Elred addressed his partner.

“Let’s get the hells out of here,” he said.

Desleth nodded in agreement.

“We can come back later and see if the cavern is stable. Hopefully, that gods cursed explosion sealed that chamber and it’s safe now,” he replied.

Elred coughed as he inhaled dust that had been thrown into the air by the explosion, and then hurried through the now empty opening. Once outside he took a second to bask in the bright sunlight and fresh air. The sound of leaves blowing in the wind could be heard in the distance. Relief washed through him; he’d had more than enough of caves for a while.

As he pulled himself up out of the chasm he looked around and relaxed. His muscles were tight and sore from all the frantic activity. Where were the other men, though? They’d been right in front of him…

There was the slightest whisper of sound from behind him, but before he could turn around his head was thrown forward as something smashed into it from behind. Elred gasped in pain as he staggered, and then collapsed limply onto the ground.

Confused but still lucid, he tried to move but couldn’t d manage more than a loose flop. Something grabbed his ankles and began to drag him out of sight behind a rock. To his horror a pile of bodies lay there. All the miners had been ambushed as they’d rushed out of the cave and climbed out of the chasm, just like him.

Even Katha’s body lay there, and it wasn’t a pretty sight. Most her clothes had been ripped off and the flesh underneath had been mutilated. Elred felt a wave of horror and despair wash over him at the sight. What the hell had done all this? Why couldn’t he move?

As he struggled desperately to overcome his paralysis, he was suddenly released. A pair of green feet then descended and filled his vision. They were quickly followed by the leering face of a yellow eyed hobgoblin, as it leaned over him.

It grinned wickedly as it reached over him with one of its clawed hands. Elred couldn’t even scream as it ripped out his eyes, just choke and squirm mutely.

“Elred, where’d you go?” Desleth’s voice rang out.

It was the last thing Elred ever heard. 







JE : Crystals







Ancient legend says that the god of darkness Cor-Dius’ bears an old grudge against the god of light Hel-Lustra. Some believe that this hate is so strong that it oozes forth from the earth and takes on physical form as mana crystals.

Such tales are nothing but silly superstition of course, but this one does perhaps accurately portray how dangerous and vile mana crystals can be. They are the scourge of human civilization all across the world. No matter where you travel you cannot escape the lingering threat of these deadly formations.

The most common type of crystal is rarely even identified as such. It is a black oily looking growth that is usually mistaken for rock, hence it’s name Blackstone. Luckily, this basic form of mana is inert and has no magical effects; it simply grows and spreads deep within the dark corners of the earth.

As it expands, Blackstone consumes the dirt and rock around itself to create long twisting tunnels. Eventually, Blackstone growths will run their course and old crystal formations will dissolve, leaving nothing but rock behind. This is how significant portions of the Dark Paths were probably created.

Unfortunately, that is not all Blackstone does. As it expands the crystals will occasionally consume something that causes what is commonly known as a mana stone to form. These crystals are bright and occasionally even glow, which makes them hard to miss. They come in many different colors, shapes, and sizes, but the important part is the magic that lies within them.

Every mana stone has a unique magical effect that a mage can produce by using their mage gift to burn the crystal. While many are useless or even dangerous to users, some are extremely powerful and useful.

These stone are the foundation of a mage's power, and all the stones created by the guilds are copies or offshoots of naturally formed mana crystals. This makes such stones incredibly valuable to mages, and thus treasures of great value. Many a life has been lost searching for such stones.

The Dark Paths are of course extremely dangerous themselves, but crystal formations make them even more deadly. For once you have Blackstone and mana crystals forming you will also start to see mutation.

Exposure to mana crystals sometimes causes the crystals to take root within living things. The process transforms an animal and creates a mutant. Such creatures are not only unnaturally strong, large, and swift, but the mana within them can actually imbue them with magical powers.

These horrors are the stuff of nightmares, and a plague upon all human civilization. As crystal caves grow they can breach the surface, and deposit their vile contents upon it. Thus, what was once considered safe civilized land can suddenly become wild and dangerous, as mutant abominations run wild across it.

Stories abound of such beasts, such as those of hard working farmers being slain by rats the size of dogs that can pass through walls or drive men mad with their whispers. Only, by removing the mana stones and sealing the tunnel can the nearby lands be made safe again.

Some of the creatures that dwell within crystal caves have no obvious earthly origin, but instead seemed formed completely of the crystals themselves. Slimes are the best known of these, but rumors persist of hulking creatures made of Blackstone that dwell within the deepest parts of crystal caves.

The magic derived from crystal caves is useful, but personally I do not believe it makes up for the threat such formations pose to humanity. They are just far too dangerous and unpredictable; you never know where one will appear, or what will crawl out of it.

Monsters of legend such as the Breshura Cyclops or the Wurm of Terringale were probably mutants as well, and the stories passed own about these monsters puts those of any modern mutant to shame. These creatures leveled cities and cast down empires. One day, I fear that something truly horrendous will again be born within the depths of these horrid places, and then all of humanity will weep and know the face of fear

-Farstidiuous Der Lanmount, Royal Gervaien Surveyor.








ATT 1







Blacknail yawned luxuriously as he slowly stretched out his long slender body. His movements caused the sheets beneath him to rub pleasantly against his skin. He then smiled contentedly as he sank into the soft fluffy mattress.

He was really enjoying having a bed of his own. He’d never had one before, only a blanket to curl up onto. This was much nicer, and bouncier.

As he laid there his stomach grumbled slightly, which raised a dilemma. Should he get up and grab some food, or try and get back to sleep? On one hand the food here was very tasty, but on the other hand the bed was amazingly soft. It was thus a difficult choice to make.

Sloth eventually overcame gluttony, and the decision was made for Blacknail. The hobgoblin fell back to sleep before he could make up his mind.

When he next awoke, red tinted sunlight was leaking into the room from behind the curtains that blocked the window. Blacknail gazed lazily at it and yawned deeply again, before grinning happily to himself.

It wasn’t just the bed that was his, the entire room was! Herad had given him it, and it was just down the hall from hers. Most the other bandits had roommates, but he had his room all to himself. Blacknail had been told this was because he was special, which probably meant he was Herad’s favorite.

Having his own space was definitely a good thing; humans tended to smell funny, so he didn’t want to share a room with one. Unlike his master, most of them didn’t even try to hide their weird human scent. Saeter usually smelled strongly of herbs, soil, and the forest.

Judging by the amount of light that was coming in through the curtains it was around noon now. Blacknail rarely got out of bed this early in the morning anymore. Mostly, he just lounged around inside until he got hungry, or it got dark, or both.

He still did a lot of training; he just did it in the afternoon, when it was harder for people see. Herad wanted to keep Blacknail’s presence a secret, or at least make sure he remained mysterious. Blacknail understood her reasons, and even approved of them. The less people knew about him, the more they would fear him. It was a very hobgoblin way of thinking, and Blacknail liked being feared.

Saeter had also originally tried to find chores for him to do as well, but had given up eventually when he hadn’t found anything appropriate. The city was a much easier place to live, and Blacknail liked it that way. Fewer chores meant more naps.

After they were done training, his master had to go do his own jobs. This left Blacknail free to slip away and out into the city. He hadn’t been told he wasn’t supposed to go out, and he liked it that way, so he wasn’t about to ruin it by asking for permission.

Sleeping in his room was great, but so was the city. There were so many tasty treats out there for him to eat! It seemed like Daggerpoint contained endless different types of food for him to try.

As the hobgoblin was contemplating the contents of his next meal, he heard the sound of footsteps approaching. He sighed in irritation when he realized they were headed his way. It was unlikely to be someone bringing him food.

A few seconds later the door opened and Saeter stepped into the room. The hobgoblin gazed up at him curiously from his bed. What did his master want this early in the day?

Saeter grunted and gave Blacknail an irritated scowl when he saw that the hobgoblin was still in bed.

“Get up you lazy green lump. You don't get to sleep in till sun down today,” Saeter told the hobgoblin with obvious satisfaction.

“Why?” muttered Blacknail in annoyance.

He wanted to sleep in until sundown. It sounded like fun.

“Herad wants to see you,” Saeter replied smugly.

“Why?” the hobgoblin asked again, as he slowly picked himself off the bed.

He shouldn't keep his chieftain waiting, it would be bad for his health. Knives were funny that way.

“It's a surprise,” his master told him.

Saeter then threw Blacknail his scabbard and belt. Blacknail caught them and started putting them on. If whatever Herad wanted required a sword then it would probably be interesting at least.

“Come on; we don't have all day,” Saeter told the hobgoblin as soon as he was finished dressing.

Blacknail then followed his master out into the hallway, down a flight of stairs, and out into the yard behind Herad's hideout. The enclosure was usually used for training, but this time as Blacknail walked outside he immediately noticed that Herad was standing in the middle of the yard.

The bandit chieftain was wearing her usual black leathers, and carrying her usual plethora of blades. Her dark eyes stared out from under her short black hair as it waved in the wind.

Mahedium was the only other person present, and was standing off to one side. He was wearing a long grey coat today, probably because the air outside had a chilly edge to it. The sky overhead was full of grey clouds that hid the sun away.

Blacknail didn't see any sign of a single other person. Both Herad and the mage seemed excited. The hobgoblin was now very curious about what was going on, and more than a little apprehensive as well.

“Finally, you sure like making me wait, Saeter. Or, maybe you’re just getting slower in your old age,” Herad remarked as Saeter and the hobgoblin approached.

“I must be getting old then, how could I ever resist the attraction of your company?” Saeter replied without an ounce of humor or disrespect in his voice.

Herad eyed the grey haired scout carefully, and her hand dropped towards one of her daggers. Blacknail held his breath, but after a few seconds she relaxed.

“Mahedium has something for you, Blacknail” she told the hobgoblin.

Now that it was safe, Blacknail shifted his gaze to the mage. Maybe, Herad was giving him a gift in return for his earlier present! He hoped it was edible. He still hadn’t had breakfast.

“Hmm, I do indeed,” the mage remarked as he stepped over.

Mahedium then reached into one of his coat pockets and withdrew a small vial. Blacknail stared at it for a second and frowned. The liquid inside was light blue, and he didn’t think it looked very tasty.

“Finally, after several days of research and hard work Avorlus and I managed to re-create your Elixir!

We’re almost completely sure it will work!” Mahedium told him with an excited grin.

“Oh, good…” Blacknail remarked skeptically. He was excited about getting his own magic, but he’d caught that ‘almost’ Mahedium had said.

Then there was that color… Elixirs were edible; or drinkable at least. What did Elixir taste like anyway? He hoped the color meant it would taste like blue berries. Wait, what had he been worrying about?

Mahedium handed Blacknail the vial and gave him an expectant look.

“Just pop it open and drink the contents. You should be able to feel a difference right away since you’re already a Vessel,” the mage explained.

“Thank you,” the hobgoblin politely replied happily.

He couldn’t wait! Blacknail grasped the vial and quickly twisted the top off. Soon, he would have magic of his own; he’d be a magic hobgoblin! Nothing could stop him from drinking this.

“Oh, and if you suddenly develop a headache, nausea, diarrhea, break out into a rash, or start losing your hair tell me,” the mage added as a side thought.

Blacknail froze, and gave Mahedium a startled look. Suddenly drinking the vial didn’t seem like such a great idea to him, magic or not.

“It’s poison?” he asked in concern, as he held the vial above his lips.

“No, all those symptoms are very unlikely. I’ll be right here if anything happens, anyway,” the mage replied.

“And you have cure?” the hobgoblin asked in relief.

“Um, no… I have some basic soothing herbs and water here though, and I’m told that sometimes helps,” Mahedium explained helpfully.

What? That didn’t really seem all that helpful to Blacknail. He looked over towards his master, but Saeter had a carefully neutral expression on his face. The hobgoblin still didn’t feel like taking the Elixir…

“Stop wasting my time, goblin. Drink the damned potion! Don’t make me come over there and shove it down your throat,” Herad ordered him with a snarl.

Blacknail looked over to see her staring at him coldly. He raised the vial again. It didn’t seem like he had any choice but to drink the stuff. Quickly, he gulped the liquid within down. It tasted nothing like blue berries. In fact, it tasted more like salty dirt, yuck.

No one said anything as they all waited for something to happen, especially Blacknail. The hobgoblin was holding his breath while he stared at his arms, and searched for any sign of a developing rash.

“Try moving around,” Saeter suggested after a few minutes.

Tentatively, Blacknail began walking around. Then he jumped on the spot a few times. It didn’t feel like he was about to become sick, or explode…

“Ah, good. It would appear that we found the right mixture. He’s not showing any signs of rejection. Master Avorlus will be very pleased,” Mahedium commented proudly.

“Just as long as he keeps supplying me with Elixir. Now run around the yard a few times, Blacknail,” Herad commanded him.

The hobgoblin immediately began jogging around.

“Faster you lazy green runt, or I’ll have you dodging arrows,” she yelled a few seconds later.

Blacknail broke out into a sprint.

“Do we have any idea what type of Elixir he’s using, or if it has secondary effects?” Herad then asked the mage, as she watched Blacknail run.

“Um no, we don’t. It’s impossible to say just from the recipe, not to mention it seems to be a completely new experimental mixture,” Mahedium replied.

Blacknail was listening carefully. Elixirs could have secondary effects? None of the Vessels he’d seen had done anything special. As he ran, he began to feel an odd familiar burning sensation in his legs. The hobgoblin ignored it though, and continued to listen in on the others.

Herad frowned as she considered the mages words.

“So we won’t know what, if anything, it does until he starts breathing fire or jumping ten feet up into the air,” she remarked.

“Pretty much, although most elixirs don’t apparently have much in the way of secondary effects. Like your own Ressertein recipe, they mostly just grant increased physical vigor, or so Avorlus has told me,” Mahedium replied.

“Blacknail’s pretty fast, but I think he’s doing a fair bit better than usual,” Saeter suddenly interjected.

Herad and the mage looked over at the hobgoblin that was running around the yard. There was a small dust trail rising behind him as he moved.

“Huh ya, he’s definitely a fast little beast. It’s hard to tell if that’s from the Elixir, though. Let’s test his strength,” Herad said.

“You can stop now, Blacknail. Come over here,” Saeter yelled out to the hobgoblin.

Blacknail immediately stopped and made his way back to the others. His chest rose and fell as he breathed heavily, but he wasn’t feeling all that tired.

“Blacknail come over here and take my hand,” Herad said, as she raised one arm in his direction.

Blacknail had never actually touched the chief before, and the idea made him more than a little uncomfortable. Hopefully, it was a sign of her favor, and she wasn’t about to hurt him.

When the hobgoblin hesitated to approach Herad gave him an impatient glare. Blacknail quickly reached out and took her hand. Immediately, Herad’s fingers closed tightly around his wrist and held him in place. This didn’t seem promising…

“Now goblin, you have to try and pull your hand away from mine. If you can’t then I’m going to punch you in the face a few times,” she told him dispassionately.

Blacknail’s eyes went wide. This was definitely not good. The hobgoblin grabbed his own arm and lowered his stance as he began frantically trying to pull his hand free. His heels dug into the earth as he squirmed and fought to free himself.

Herad’s fingers seemed as strong as iron though, and he couldn’t get his arm loose. She scowled in annoyance at Blacknail’s futile struggling. Slowly, she then raised a clenched fist.

The hobgoblin redoubled his efforts, and then all of sudden the burning sensation from before washed through his entire body. Fear spurred him on as he pulled desperately on his arm, and Herad moved. She kept her grip on him, but her body twisted as she kept her balance, and her feet slid forward slightly.

Before he could react Herad grinned, and then released him. Off balance and in the middle of pulling, the hobgoblin was sent sprawling over backwards.

“Ouch, cheese rot,” Blacknail hissed, as he landed painfully on his ass.

“Hmm, that last pull was definitely above normal human, or hobgoblin, strength. It seems to have worked,” Herad remarked.

A grinning Blacknail picked himself off the ground and jumped into the air experimentally a few times. He had super strength! He thought he was jumping a little higher than before, but nothing like ten feet. He then began breathing out as hard as he could.

“Do you have something in your throat?” Saeter asked him.

“Uh no-ss, it’s nothing,” the embarrassed hobgoblin replied, as he turned away to hide his face.

He apparently didn’t breathe fire either… which was too bad, that would have been amazing!

“So now I’ve got both a Vessel hobgoblin, and a reliable source of Elixir for both of us. Good work, Mahedium. It’s nice to know that not all my subordinates are completely useless,” she told the mage, as he nodded respectfully back.

An eager smile spread across Herad’s lips, and she turned to look towards the direction the rest of the city lay. There was a building blocking her view, but she didn’t seem to care.

Blacknail recognized that bloodthirsty smile. He shivered in excitement. That look meant Herad was about to start a fight, and that Blacknail was about to have a lot of fun!

Not only had he finally gotten some magic of his own, but it looked like his tribe was about to go to war. This was the best day ever!

“This shifts the odds our way by a fair bit, and if I leverage this right I ought to be able mess up Werick’s plans. I’m done playing defense, now it’s time to go for their throats. I’ll isolate them and take my enemies out one by one. Then the chiefs that are left won’t dare raise a hand against me, no matter what Werick offers them,” Herad bragged.

She then turned to Blacknail.

“You’ve already proved that you’re a half decent assassin, so I’m going to unleash you. With Fang dead, my biggest enemy is Galive, so I’ll be sending you after him. I want Zelena dead as well, but word is she’s surrounded herself with over half the bodyguards and assassins in the city,” Herad told the hobgoblin.

Blacknail smiled in anticipation. Now that he was a Vessel he was sure it would be much easier to take out Herad’s enemies. If nothing else, he was now an even faster runner. There was no way he’d get himself into trouble like the last time.

“Blacknail needs training before you throw him out there, or he’ll just get himself killed,” Saeter interjected in concern.

“True, but that’s easily fixed. You’ve already been teaching him how to fight. I’ll just have to  beat all the bad habits you’ve taught Blacknail out of him,” Herad remarked.

Blacknail’s felt a sinking sensation in his stomach. This didn’t sound good.

“He’ll need more than just the ability to fight. He’s a natural stalker and hunter, but totally ignorant of a lot of things. He’s going to need some new equipment, and training in things like lock picking as well,” Saeter countered.

“I’ll let you handle that stuff; I don’t have time for it. I will however show him how a true Vessel fights. It’s time that Blacknail and I had that spar,” Herad told Saeter.

The hobgoblin’s eyes went wide in alarm. This couldn’t be happening! There was no way he could fight Herad; she’d cut him into tiny little pieces. He turned to Saeter and threw him a desperate pleading look.

Blacknail’s master was frowning, but when he noticed the hobgoblin’s attention he just shrugged helplessly. Blacknail grimaced in dismay. He’d really been hoping Saeter would save him! Herad was going to kill him…

Behind Blacknail, there was the sound of a blade being slowly drawn from its sheath. He shuddered in dread, as he turned around to see Herad pointing her naked blade towards his throat.

“Draw your sword, hobgoblin. It’s time to test your mettle,” she told him.

Blacknail peed himself a little. He was too young and smart to die!

Herad didn’t wait for him to respond; her blade sliced towards his head. The hobgoblin yelped as he ducked under the attack. He then scrambled backwards.

“You can’t run, hobgoblin. Draw your sword or I’ll skin you alive, you little green coward,” Herad growled viciously.

Blacknail considered his options. Herad was way too into this, but she probably wouldn’t actually kill him if he did as he was told. If he tried to run away though…

Blacknail thus reluctantly unsheathed his own blade and faced Herad. He even managed to keep his trembling to a minimum. The bandit chieftain immediately reacted and attacked again.

The hobgoblin raised his blade to intercept it, but then Herad’s blade disappeared from his sight. He then reeled in shock as something smacked into the side of his head, and knocked him sideways.

From where he was lying on the ground, Blacknail looked up with cloudy eyes to see Herad sneering down at him. She’d hit him with the flat of her blade. Out of the corner of his eye the hobgoblin saw his master wince.

“Pathetic. We’re going to keep doing this until you can burn your Elixir at will, and until you know one end of a blade from another. Now get up or I’ll smack you again,” Herad told him condescendingly.

Blacknail whimpered in self pity. This was the worst day ever!

Herad evidently heard him, because she gave him a disproving look and then attacked again. Blacknail's eyes widened fearfully as her blade sliced towards his face. She hadn't even given him time to raise his own sword; there was no way he could dodge or block it! 









ATT 2








“Blacknail you need to come out from under there,” Saeter said with obvious frustration, before continuing to grind his teeth.

“No, I don’t want to,” Blacknail whined.

“Seriously, don’t make me get down there and drag you out,” Blacknail’s master added.

The goblin sniffled miserably and groaned in pain and humiliation. Herad’s lessons had gone on for hours! She’d beat him black and blue, and then purple and green. It had been so much worse than even his first lesson with Saeter.

“I can’t believe I’m doing this,” Saeter mumbled to himself.

The old scout crossed his arms and scowled in annoyance, as he glanced around the room. There was no one around to see his expression though, so a few seconds later he sighed in defeat and turned back to where the hobgoblin was hiding.

“What are you doing? You can’t be all that scared of Herad,” Saeter asked.

Blacknail stifled another whimper. Getting beaten up by the chief had crushed his ego into pulp. Why did she hate him so much? He’d thought he was the chief’s favorite! He’d killed her enemies for her and everything.

There was no way he was ever going to show his face in public ever again. He’d just never leave this hiding spot, and slowly fade away.

“The chief hates me, and made me look bad in front of you,” Blacknail whined in response.

Saeter sighed again, and then looked thoughtful.

“She doesn’t hate you, Blacknail. That’s just how Herad is. No matter how much she acts like it sometimes, she isn’t a hobgoblin. She wasn’t punishing you, in fact in her own weird way she was actually helping you out,” he explained, while managing to keep a straight face.

“Really? ” Blacknail asked hopefully.

“Yep, do you know how many men, er people, she’s ever agreed to train personally?” Saeter asked.

“No,” Blacknail replied.

“None, which means you really are her favorite. Now come out from under there, and I’ll buy you all the meat pies you can eat,” Saeter offered reluctantly.

Blacknail’s ears perked up. Now that his master had mentioned food, the hobgoblin realized that he was hungry. He hadn’t had breakfast yet, and meat pies sounded like just the thing. Blacknail reluctantly got up and crawled out from under his bed.

It had been getting kind of stuffy under there anyway.

“Fine, let’s go eat. I want some cheese,” he told his master.

“I offered meat pies, so if you want cheese you’ll have to get it yourself,” Saeter replied.

“Fine-ss, I know a place I can take some from, anyway,” Blacknail muttered.

“You know you have money, right? You could just buy some bloody cheese; you don’t have to steal it,” his master pointed out.

The hobgoblin gave Saeter an uncomprehending look. What was this now?

“Buying means taking, doesn’t it?” he asked in confusion.

“No, it doesn’t; buying means trading. Humans trade money for other things they want. It’s why we get paid, and want coins,” Saeter explained.

That was stupid! Why would Blacknail give his shiny coins away, when everything he wanted was just lying around?

“Why not just pick up the things you want-ss?” he asked his master.

Saeter gave the hobgoblin a questioning look. Blacknail returned it.

“Because you can’t steal everything you want, and it’s often a lot more work than just buying stuff,” Saeter answered gruffly.

Who said anything about stealing? Blacknail wasn’t a thief. His master sure got confused sometimes. Good thing he had Blacknail around to help him out!

“But I like my coins. I want-ss to keep them,” the hobgoblin explained.

“Ha, you don’t even use them for anything! In fact, you lose half of them,” Saeter replied.

Blacknail hissed in annoyance. That wasn’t true at all; he didn’t lose them. He just put them somewhere safe and hidden, and then forgot about them… Okay, he kind of lost them.

“When we get to the market I’ll show you how to buy stuff. In fact, we won’t be coming back until you purchase some stuff for yourself. Think of it as a skill I’m teaching you,” Saeter told him.

Together, the two of them headed out of Herad’s compound and towards the market. As usual the city was bustling with life, and the streets were full of people. Merchants were calling out to customers from their colorful stalls, and their wares were piled up in front of them.

Saeter went over to one, and after a brief exchange with its owner he walked away with several delicious smelling meat pies. He handed them to Blacknail, and then grimaced in disgust as the hobgoblin inhaled them down within seconds.

“Thanks, master,” Blacknail told him, right before burping.

“Slow down, you don’t need to eat so quickly, or while I’m looking. Anyway, now it’s time for you to buy some stuff, so we’re going to wander around until you find something you like,” he told the hobgoblin.

Blacknail sighed, and tried to think up some excuse to keep his coins. He couldn’t think of anything though, so he reluctantly nodded his assent. He still thought it would be much smarter to just take something no one else was using…

“Where’s the cheese?” he asked Saeter.

Several minutes later, after some bargaining with a confused, and more than slightly frightened, shop keeper the two of them headed back to base. As he walked Blacknail was twitching with anticipation and hugging a huge wheel of stinking cheese to his chest, while trying to resist the powerful urge to immediately bite into it. He wanted to taste it so bad!

“You’re so tasty and delicious. I will hide you away in my room, and eat you for days,” Blacknail told the cheese.

This caused Saeter to give him a concerned look.

“You’re not taking that back to your room. It would stink up the entire floor,” Saeter told him.

Blacknail wasn’t sure why that was something people would complain about. The cheese smelled great to him, almost like meat that had spoiled only the tinniest bit. The hobgoblin licked his lips in anticipation.
Blacknail tore his gaze away from the tasty treat he was holding in order to see where he was going. As he was looking around his eyes wandered across a nearby stall, and the false faces it was selling.

The merchant that was running the small shop didn’t seem to be doing a lot of business, but the occasional person stopped to take a look at his wares. His booth was covered in wooden carvings, including several of the masks that had caught the hobgoblin’s attention. Most intriguingly, like Blacknail the shopkeeper wore a long hooded cloak that concealed his features.

Blacknail knew the merchant wasn’t a hobgoblin though, because he was large even for a human. He also would have noticed the smell of another hobgoblin immediately if there was one so close by, and the idea of a one selling wooden carvings was just silly.

However, the hobgoblin really liked the look of some of the work, so he wandered over. Most the little statues were of animals, but a few were of people going about their everyday business. Blacknail didn’t see one of someone being mugged though, which was a pretty common part of life in Daggerpoint.

The cloaked man looked up as Blacknail approached, yet remained silent as the hobgoblin examined his wares. Blacknail was most interested in the masks; he liked how fierce they looked. One was of a snarling wolf, and another beaked mask bore the image of a tyrant turtle. The turtle one was so life-like that Blacknail hesitated to pick it up; he was afraid it would bite him.

Saeter walked up beside him and examined one of the small figures. It was perfectly crafted statue of a harpy in flight. He stared at it for a few seconds before saying anything.

“This doesn’t look like normal wood to me,” he whispered as he turned to look at the seller.

“You are a craftsman yourself, then?” the other man asked.

The merchant’s voice was smooth and clear, so much so that its uniqueness drew Blacknail’s attention. He couldn’t make out any of the man’s features though. His clothing concealed everything. Blacknail tried sniffing the air for his scent, but could only smell the wooden figurines. They reminded him of something…

“I dabble in wood carving sometimes, yes. Nothing like this, though,” Saeter told the man respectfully.

Blacknail’s master was gazing at the man inquisitively, and seemed off guard. His posture was tight and his eyes were slightly wide, as if something had startled him.

“Indeed, you obviously know something of my work. I hadn’t expected to find anyone here with such knowledge,” the cloaked man replied slowly.

Blacknail shuffled over a bit and bent down to examine another figurine. Then, when he thought no one was looking he tried to look up into the man’s hood. He ended up disappointed though, because all he managed to glimpse were the edges of a wooden mask, like the ones on sale.

The merchant turned to Blacknail, and the hobgoblin quickly looked away. If the other man was going to conceal his face, Blacknail sure wasn’t going to let him see his! Wearing clothing like that was kind of rude.

“And you travel in very interesting company, forest walker,” the large robed shopkeeper said.

Saeter stiffened, but then nodded reluctantly.

“I want a mask too. I like the turtle,” Blacknail interjected as he waved a hand in front of the merchant’s face.

This man sure was slow. The other shopkeeper had practically shoved his goods into Blacknail’s hands.

Saeter winced at the hobgoblin’s behavior, and reached over to grab his shoulder. He was interrupted though, when the shop keeper stood up.

“Then you shall have one, but not of a turtle. I have something more fitting for you,” he replied as he reached under his stall.

A second later the shopkeeper pulled out several items. First, he handed Blacknail a new mask that was different from the ones on display, and then he set two long poles on the stand in front of him.

Blacknail stared at the mask for a second. He wasn’t sure what it was supposed to be. It most resembled a smiling human, but the proportions were all wrong. He liked it though. It was intimidating in its own way, and the mask looked like it was having fun.

“What’s it supposed to be?” he asked.

“The spirit of hunger,” the man explained.

The shopkeeper than turned to Saeter and handed him the two poles. Saeter’s eyes widened in surprise when he got a good look at them.

“These are bow staves. I didn’t think you made those,” he replied in shock.

“Ignorance is the root of knowledge. Everything grows, or it dies. Remember that,” the cloaked merchant replied.

Saeter nodded and then reached into his money pouch to withdraw a gold coin, which he handed to the man. The man took it and nodded in thanks before sitting back down, and turning away from both his customers to watch his surroundings. It was clearly a dismissal, and Blacknail found it more than a little rude. No wonder the man had so few customers; he was kind of a jerk.

Blacknail wasn’t sure if he wanted this mask; he liked it, but the turtle was also pretty frightening. He reached over to pick the turtle mask up again, but Saeter grabbed his arm and pulled him away.

“Hey, I’m not done buying stuff!” Blacknail exclaimed.

“You’re done now; we need to get back,” Saeter told him as he dragged the hobgoblin down the street.

Blacknail frowned in annoyance, but followed his master.

It didn’t take them long to get back to Herad’s base. Blacknail got more than few stares from the other bandits as he carried his massive wheel of cheese inside.

“Just put the cheese in that cupboard,” Saeter told the hobgoblin as they entered the main building.

“What if someone steals it? I need to hide-ss it somewhere close, were no one will look. I need to watch-ss over it always, it’s mine!” Blacknail argued in concern, as he hugged it close.

“No one is going to steal it; it’s a huge lump of foul smelling cheese,” Saeter replied in exasperation.

“Exactly!” Blacknail exclaimed, as he gave one of the bandits walking past them a suspicious glare.

There was no way he was going to leave his precious treat where other people could steal it. Humans were all thieves…

Just then Khita appeared from around the corner and saw them.

“Herad’s looking for you two, and I wouldn’t keep her waiting,” she told them.

“Oh, why?” Saeter asked curiously, while Blacknail tried to hide behind the huge snack he was carrying.

The hobgoblin wanted to meet with Herad right now about as much as he wanted to try and swallow his sword. He shivered shamefully at the very thought of talking to her again. He still hadn’t completely gotten over the humiliation of their last meeting.

“I think she wants to train with Blacknail again. I can’t believe he’s being taught by Herad personally. I’m just so jealous of him! I bet she’s a much better teacher than Vorscha; all she does is tell me to do drills,” Khita complained bitterly.
Blacknail glared maliciously at Khita. She was such a foolish human; Blacknail would gladly let her take his place. There was no way he could face Herad right now. The very thought made him queasy and gaseous.

“Well...” Saeter responded.

He probably would have said more, but he was interrupted. There was a wet thud as a large wheel of cheese hit the floor. Saeter whirled around just in time to catch Blacknail before the hobgoblin could make a run for it.

“You’ll be fine, except for all the bruises,” he told Blacknail reassuringly.

The hobgoblin didn’t believe him. He whined as he tried to pull away, but Saeter kept a solid grip on him. Briefly, Blacknail considered cutting his own arm off, so he could escape.

“The boss is up in her room,” Khita told them, as she stared in confusion at Blacknail’s response.

“Right,” Saeter grunted.

He then dragged the whimpering hobgoblin up the stairs and to Herad’s chamber.

“Now, don’t be a bloody coward!” Saeter hissed as he shoved Blacknail through her door.

Herad looked up from her desk as the two of them entered. Blacknail smiled nervously as he fought down his panic, and Saeter gave her a respectful nod.
“Ah, I was just looking for you two,” she told them, said as she looked back down and scribbled something across a piece of paper in front of her.

“Well, here we are. What do you need?” Saeter responded.

“Galive has become a thorn in my side. He’s taken over a lot of Fang’s gang, and is obviously under Zelena’s thumb. All those men make him the biggest threat to me right now, and I would prefer not to have to fight him directly,” Herad explained.

“What would you like us to do about it?” Saeter asked.

“I need him dead,” Herad said, before dropping her pen and looking up at them.

“Sure,” Blacknail answered happily.

He grinned happily at Herad, and his earlier queasiness disappeared. This was much better than another round of training. He’d rather fight the entire city than go through that again.

“He’s not ready,” Saeter responded sternly.

“Oh relax, Saeter. You’re like an old mother hen fussing over its chicks. The hobgoblin can take care of himself. It’s not like I’m throwing him away without preparation. I wouldn’t risk such a useful asset, if I didn’t think he could succeed,” Herad said with a dangerous grin.

“You’re asking him to try and fight a Vessel with a small army of killers at his disposal,” Saeter told her.

“No, I’m not asking. Now let’s go over the details,” she responded coldly.

Blacknail sighed, and took a step away from Saeter. His master really needed to stop trying to argue with the chieftain. That never worked.

“Now, I can’t have my favorite assassin going out unprepared, or anyone learning his true identity. So, I had some gear prepared for you,” Herad explained as she gave the hobgoblin a comradely smile.

Blacknail straightened up proudly at Herad’s words. So he was her favorite after all! He felt all giddy inside. He’d show her that he deserved such an honor.

Herad picked up a small sack from her desk and handed it to Saeter. The old scout reached inside and withdrew a glass vial of Elixir, which he then passed to the goblin. Next, he pulled out a large roll of bandages.

“To hide his skin, it’s rather distinctive,” Herad explained as Saeter gave it a dubious look.

“If you’re worried about people figuring out he’s a hobgoblin then I guess he could use the mask he just got as well,” Saeter remarked.

Blacknail thought that was a great idea. He reached into his cloak, and then held the wooden mask up in front of his face. Herad stared at its stretched features and the intricate patterns of lines that decorated it.

“That’s an interesting mask. Where did you get it?” she asked curiously.

“I bought-ss it, with money,” Blacknail replied cheerfully.

Saeter hesitated before responding. He looked like he couldn’t decide what to say.

“From a stall at the market,” he explained after a second.

Herad eyed him doubtfully, but chose not to pry. She turned away from the old scout and looked at Blacknail instead.

“Now he looks like a real assassin, and one worthy of being in my service,” Herad observed with a vicious grin.

“He’s still not ready,” Saeter muttered.

“Well, one of you is going to do it. So decide amongst yourselves, because I don’t really care. Now get out of here, and I don’t want to see either of you until the job is done,” Herad told them with an annoyed scowl.

Saeter marched out of the room. Blacknail followed him out.

“I want to do it, you can stay-ss here,” Blacknail told his master as they walked through the hallway.

“We’re both going to do it. I’m not letting you mess this up!” Saeter responded as he ground his teeth in frustration.

That sounded like even more fun than going alone! With both of them working together, and his new but foul tasting Elixir, this job was going to be too easy! Blacknail grinned in anticipation, and his smile matched that of the mask exactly.









ATT 3







Blacknail and Saeter stood across the street from their target and observed the people coming and going from it. Both of them had their hoods up, and were taking shelter from the afternoon sun within the shadows of a nearby building.

A huge rectangular stone building rose before them. Its walls were straight and decorated with intricate carvings of people and animals. Stone pillars several times taller than a man surrounded the building. They supported a wide peaked roof, which extended past the walls. At one point it looked like there had been statues between the pillars as well, but all that remained of them now were ruins and rubble.

Saeter’s arms were crossed in front of him, and he scowled in disgust as he looked it over.

“A few years ago, Galive appointed himself a priest of Cor-Dius. I’ve met few people in my life less priest-like than him, even by the shadow god’s lax standards. It’s hard to argue against a man with a small army though. Anyway, every priest needs a temple so Galive commandeered this one. He’ll be in there somewhere, all we have to do is find him,” the grey haired scout told the hobgoblin.

Blacknail nodded sagely as he considered Saeter’s words. Before leaving Herad’s lair, the hobgoblin had donned his new and improved disguise. Under his usual hood his face was covered by the wooden mask, and his skin was wrapped in bandages that concealed its color.

What’s a priest?” he asked a few seconds later with obvious confusion.

Whenever the hobgoblin thought he’d learned all the humans’ words, they came up with new ones. Saeter let out a frustrated sigh before responding.

“Someone who thinks they can talk to the gods,” Saeter explained

“Everyone can talk to spirits. You do all the time, like after you had that fight with Red Dog, and you asked them to make a spine toad crawl up his butt,” Blacknail pointed out.

“Um, sort of. The thing is priests think the spirits talk back to them,” Saeter replied with a smile.

“Do they?” the hobgoblin asked curiously.

“No, I’ve yet to meet anyone who has heard the voice of a god. If the gods communicate with us then it’s through the world around us. Perhaps, the rustling of the leaves in the wind are their whispers,” Saeter replied seriously, as he looked up at the clear blue sky.

“So, that means that you do think the gods talk to people?” Blacknail asked uncertainly.

Saeter turned towards him and gave him an annoyed glare.

“Shut up, you’re just a hobgoblin; what do you know?” the old scout growled irritably, as he absentmindedly tried to swat Blacknail across the side of his head,

The hobgoblin saw it coming though, and easily ducked out of the way. What had he said to annoy his master? Humans could be so confusing sometimes.

“I’m morbidly curious about what your plan for getting to Galive is,” Saeter asked a few seconds later.

“I have a great plan, and it’s a very nice and tricky one! I’m going to sneak inside his home, wait until no one else is around, and then stab him-ss a whole bunch of times. Maybe I’ll wait-ss until he’s asleep; humans are stupid and like to sleep in the same place at the same time every day,” Blacknail answered excitedly.

“That’s pretty much what I thought,” Saeter grunted disdainfully.

“It’s a perfect plan,” Blacknail responded irritably.

“Sure it is, let’s just work on the details a little,” Saeter told him sarcastically. “For instance, how do you plan to get in? Also, do you even know what Galive looks like?”

Blacknail looked back across the street at the bandit’s lair. It was a large sprawling structure with plenty of places to hide. A small stone wall circled around what had once been the temple’s grounds. Blacknail wouldn’t have any problem scaling it, but doing so would make him very visible to any watchers.

The center portion that used to be a temple was stone, but a large wooden addition had been constructed beside it. Only, a few parts of it had a second floor, and as a result most the windows were small and barred.

It certainly looked to be a larger challenge than Fang’s lair had been, and then he’d known where to go. Blacknail had just sort of assumed it would be obvious which human was Galive, and which room belonged to him. It usually wasn’t that hard to figure out. Couldn’t he just go after the loudest person with the fanciest room?

“I’ll go-ss in a window,” Blacknail told Saeter hesitantly.

Saeter snorted in disbelief and eyed the hobgoblin critically.

“Even if you managed that, how would you find Galive? You have no idea where his room is,” Saeter told the hobgoblin cynically.

“It worked last time,” Blacknail whined.

“It almost didn’t, and you got lucky!” Saeter sternly pointed out.

Blacknail scrunched up his face as he scowled in irritation. He had so not gotten lucky; it had been all skill!

“Do you know a better way?” he asked grumpily.

“I think I just might. It’s like hunting; you have to know your prey,” Saeter remarked, as he gave the hobgoblin a knowing glance.

Several hours later after the sky overhead had grown darker, and evening had set in, Blacknail found himself following Saeter through Galive’s front door. They weren’t alone; dozens of other men and women were all around them. The rhythm and roil of many different conversations surrounded them as they walked calmly into their enemies stronghold.

A dozen men wearing long black cloaks stood guard around the building, one of which looked directly at the pair for a second before turning away. Saeter and Blacknail apparently didn’t stand out.

“Look at those idiots. Thanks the gods Herad doesn’t make us wear a uniform,” Saeter muttered to himself as he walked.

Torches and been placed around the yard and up the walkway that led into the old temple, and their wavering orange light threw back the darkness of the night. Blacknail didn’t like it; he preferred the dark. With all the stone pillars around, the torches cast a host of shifting shadows that was actually harder to see through.

“Why is our prey just letting us, and all-ss these other people, just walk-ss into his home? It’s so stupid!” Blacknail asked his master uncertainly.

The hobgoblin was very confused; was this bandit chieftain suicidal, or was this a trap? It sort of seemed like a trap to him.

“Like I said, Galive thinks he’s a priest. And what’s a priest without a congregation?”

“I dunno, what’s a congregation?” Blacknail whispered back nervously.

Saeter snorted in amusement before responding.

“In this case, it’s a big party. Galive throws a feast every week. Supposedly it’s in Cor-Dius’ honor, but really it’s just so he can show off,” Saeter told the hobgoblin with obvious disapproval.

“Oh!” Blacknail replied excitedly. A feast meant that there would be food!

The pair made their way through the crowd that was entering the building, and then down a wide stone hallway. Blacknail froze as the guards gave them a brief look over, but after seeing that the pair had no obvious weapons they waved them through. A few seconds later Saeter and Blacknail walked into a huge round chamber.

Crude wooden tables and benches filled the center of the floor, and a long counter ran along the far wall. A lot of humans were sitting down, or moving about the room. Quite a few of them were also crowded around the counter to get drinks.

Long simple black tapestries and quite a few lamps hung from the walls, and a raised platform stood in along another of the walls. More black tapestries hung around the stage, and a large bronze statue stood at the back of it. The statue was of a man in a hood, and he was holding a dagger in one hand and a flaming brazier in the other.

Blacknail’s eyes were wide open in surprise as he looked around. The room was actually quite impressive. It didn’t even seem like the inside of a building to him, but more like a large cave.

He wanted one of his own just like it, except he’d replace the statue with an even bigger one of himself! If he killed Galive would Herad let him keep this one? Would the statue look better with him holding a sword or Galive’s severed head?

Saeter saw Blacknail staring off into the distance, and whacked him across the back of the head to get his attention.

“Just stay close to me and don’t make a scene. For now we just have to wait,” Saeter told Blacknail, as they pushed their way towards a relatively empty corner of the room.

Up against the wall was an unused wooden bench. Saeter took a seat along its length, as far from anyone else as possible, and Blacknail sat down beside him. The old scout then leaned forward and scanned the throng of people around them.

“We’ll just stay here until Galive shows himself…” Saeter told Blacknail, or he would have if the hobgoblin had still been there.

Blacknail had smelled something delicious, and wandered off to find it.

“Bloody damnation,” the hobgoblin heard Saeter swear, as he slipped through the crowds and out of sight of his master.

Blacknail’s stomach was grumbling and there was no way he was going to pass up an opportunity to fill it. Besides, there was really no reason for him to stay there, and he’d get back to his master in just a few minutes anyway.

As he weaved through the crowds, the hobgoblin observed the people around him. He made sure to avoid walking into the direct line of sight of anyone who looked threatening, and he also kept an eye out for conveniently unattended food.

Almost all the humans had drinks, but most of the ones with food were sitting down. Blacknail wanted nothing to do with the crazy human liquid that made them even crazier, but he definitely wanted something to eat. It would be hard to sneak food from the people sitting down though; they were kind of eating it…

He also couldn’t take food from the people walking around with it. It was busy enough in the hall that people were watching where they were going, and making sure they didn’t drop their food if they bumped into someone.

So Blacknail decided to head towards the smell of cooking meat, that was where the freshest morsels would be anyway. After sniffing and looking around for a few seconds, he noticed that most the humans were getting their food from a man behind a counter. Blacknail headed that way.

How would he get the food, though? It seemed to be kept out of sight until someone arrived to take it. The other men behind the counter were probably making it…

After giving it some thought, Blacknail decided to simply wander over to the counter, and loiter around until an opportunity presented itself. The drooling hobgoblin thus casually walked over to it and leaned against the counter in a totally unremarkable manner.

Now he just had to wait, and the tasty smelling meat would be his. Yep, he was just another human doing stupid human things. There was absolutely no reason to look his way!

Much to the hobgoblin’s alarm his plan almost immediately went wrong. The man behind the counter noticed his approach and turned his way. He gave Blacknail a frown as he looked him over.

“Well?” the man grunted.

Blacknail flinched and panicked at the unexpected question. What had he done wrong, and what did the human want? He didn’t understand!

“I’m human,” he blurted out, before cringing at his own stupidity.

“What? It’s three copper for chicken and bread, and it’s four for pork. Ale is extra. What do you want?” the bearded man asked Blacknail.

The hobgoblin stared blankly at the speaker in surprise. Right… he could just buy the food. That made things simpler.

“Chicken,” Blacknail responded, as he leaned back and attempted to look calm and collected.

A few seconds later the plate of food was placed in front of him, and Blacknail gave the nice man three coppers. It wasn’t his money though; he’d somehow acquired it from someone’s pocket on the way over.

The roast chicken smelled so nice, and its flesh looked soft and juicy. Blacknail wanted to start eating it right away, but he couldn’t until he took off his mask. With a frustrated sigh he wandered back over to where Saeter was sitting.

“Where in all the hells have you been, and where’d you get the grub?” Saeter asked angrily as the hobgoblin approached.

“I bought some food, I was hungry, and I stayed out of trouble,” Blacknail replied smugly, as he took off his mask and chewed a bird leg.

Saeter stared at him for a few seconds; he didn’t seem to know what to say.

“Bah, whatever. Just don’t wander off again. We have a mission,” he told the hobgoblin.

“I have food now-ss anyway,” Blacknail replied without concern.

“You sure have been getting uppity lately. Remind me to schedule you more sword practice,” Saeter told the hobgoblin.

Blacknail opened his mouth to reply, but froze when the atmosphere around him suddenly changed. The formerly loud and wild sounding room had grown completely quiet. The unnatural suddenness of it unnerved him, and he hissed in alarm as he looked up.

“And here’s the man himself; that’s Galive,” Saeter remarked calmly.

The steady and sure sound of his master’s voice reassured Blacknail somewhat. The hobgoblin swiftly found the source of the disturbance as he looked around the temple antechamber.

Everyone was now facing the same direction and focused on the same thing. A man had walked out onto the raised stage across the room, and he was the center of attention. This new arrival was alone on the platform, but quite a few of the black cloaked men ringed the stage and kept people away from him.

Blacknail instantly knew that this had to be Galive. Not only did he have an air of authority, but the warriors were clearly protecting him.

Herad’s enemy was tall, and muscled. Long black hair fell down his back, and he was dressed in dark expensive looking clothes. Like the guards below him he also wore a long black cloak, but his was lined with silver. He was rather similar to Herad actually, except for the friendly smile on his face.

“Welcome, my fellow bandits and dwellers in darkness to this blessed festival. Tonight we gather together to worship our divine patron Cor-Dius, he who keeps watch over those who move in secret. So, feast, rejoice, and drink to your heart’s content, for how better to show our appreciation than in revelry!” Galive announced enthusiastically, as he raised his hands dramatically above his head.

His voice was loud and clear as it echoed throughout the stone chamber. As soon as he was done speaking, the crowd burst out into cheers and joyous laughter. Ale splashed up into the air as it escaped from people’s raised mugs. Blacknail grimaced in distaste at what he saw; the humans were getting that stuff everywhere…

Galive was basking in the crowd’s adoration, but after a few minutes he stepped down from the stage. As the guards moved to protect him, he walked over an empty table that had been set aside and took a seat.

Immediately, a few other figures detached themselves from the crowd and moved towards him.

Most of these people were turned away by the black cloaked guards, but a few were let through.

Among these was a group of three women wearing next to no clothing, and several tough looking men. Galive smiled and invited the women to sit next to him, and they were soon draped around him. The men took seats across the table from Galive and started talking amongst themselves.

“What now, master?” Blacknail asked as he watched.

He didn’t think it would be a good idea to go after the man now. He had a lot guards around to protect him.

“Take a second to memorize his face. When they retire for the night you can go over there and catch his scent, and then you can track him to his room when things quiet down,” Saeter explained.

Blacknail sighed; he didn’t feel much like waiting around. Normally, he would enjoy lying in wait for the perfect time to strike, but all the movement and noise in the room had him at the edge of his seat and bursting with energy. He wanted to do something now!

“I could-ss go over there and listen in. They wouldn’t suspect it, since humans are-ss terrible listeners with tiny little ears,” Blacknail remarked.

“That’s pointless. They won’t be saying anything important, and you’d only be drawing attention to yourself,” Saeter replied.

Blacknail groaned and leaned back against the wall. His master sure knew how to take all the fun out of assassination…

The hobgoblin impatiently started looking around for something interesting to watch. Mostly, all he saw was humans staggering around, shouting, and making fools of themselves. It would be so easy to stab some of them…

The minutes passed and Blacknail grew more and more frustrated. Eventually, with an annoyed hiss he sprung to his feet and tried to find something to do. This time though, Saeter reached out and grabbed his shoulder before he could getaway.

“Sit back down and wait,” the old scout told him as he pulled the hobgoblin back onto the bench.

Blacknail grunted as he sat back down. He was so bored! Why couldn’t he just wander around a bit?

Several hours passed, and they seemed like an eternity. Saeter only allowed him up to purchase more food and drinks, and even then he accompanied the hobgoblin to the counter.

Well, at least he got to eat as much as he wanted…

Eventually, the celebration started to die down, and things quieted down. Some of the noisy humans began to leave and others simply collapsed onto tables, chairs, and even the floor.

As Blacknail was throwing another bored look around the room, he noticed movement from his prey. The hobgoblin immediately sat up and focused completely on Galive; his eyes narrowed behind his mask and his ears perked up as he stared.

The man had gotten up, and was headed for a doorway that led further into the building. He had two of the women from earlier on each of his arms, and his guards were pulling back and following him as well.

Saeter had noticed this as well.

“Let’s go,” he grunted to the hobgoblin as he stood up.

Finally! Blacknail smiled as he and his master walked across the room towards the now deserted table. They made their way past drunken humans, and the garbage they had left behind. Bodies and empty tankards littered the floor.

When they reached the now deserted table Blacknail immediately started sniffing around. He could detect the scent of several distinct humans. So, he quickly leaned down over where Galive had been sitting and started smelling it.

He was so engrossed in this that he didn’t notice the man approach him from behind.

“What in all the hells do you two think you’re doing?” one of Galive’s guards asked them.

The huge muscled thug had drawn his sword, and was standing behind Blacknail while glaring suspiciously at the masked hobgoblin and his master. Blacknail stiffened in alarm, and his hand crept towards one of his daggers.

Out of the corner of his eye he quickly glanced around the room, and noticed several other guards looking their way as well. That wasn't good; if it came down to a fight then things were going to get messy quickly. 












ATT 4









Before the hobgoblin could act and draw his weapon, Saeter quickly spoke up.

A huge content smile appeared on his face as he turned towards the thug, and that kind of freaked Blacknail out. His master's face just didn’t look right unless he was glaring or scowling.

“We were just checking to see if any of the big wigs dropped any coins. We already spent all of ours, but we still need some more drinks,” Saeter muttered brokenly, as if he was drunk.

The old scout swayed slightly as he waited for Galive’s minion to respond. The guard eyed them critically for a second, but then snorted in disgust.

“If you don’t have any more money then get out of here. A man of your age should bloody well know better than this,” the cloaked thug told Saeter, before turning around and walking away.

When the other man was gone the smile immediately dropped from Saeter’s face, and a familiar scowl reappeared.

“Ya, fuck you too,” he muttered as he turned back to Blacknail.

“Did you get it? We need to move,” the old scout then asked him.

“I got it; the human Galive can’t hide from me!” Blacknail whispered excitedly.

“He doesn’t need to hide, he’s a bloody Vessel and an experienced fighter. In anything like a fair fight he’ll rip your scrawny green ass apart,” Saeter growled back.

“I’ll be very sneaky,” the hobgoblin replied defensively.

Blacknail wasn’t too worried about it. Galive wouldn’t be the first Vessel he’d faced, and fair fights were for idiots and humans anyway.

“You’d better; don’t take any foolish risks. We can always try again another night,” Saeter explained.

“Yes, master. What-ss now?” Blacknail asked.

“Now you’re on your own. I’m not much good at sneaking around a building like this. Find Galive and kill him. Just don’t let anyone see you, especially not Galive,” Saeter ordered him sternly.

“Yes, master,” Blacknail whispered back gleefully.

It was time for the hunt to begin, the oh so delicious hunt. Blacknail licked his lips and started salivating just thinking about it.

“I’ll be outside across the street and a bit down the escape path we planned out,” Saeter told Blacknail.

The old scout then gave Blacknail a farewell nod, and started walking towards the front entrance. Blacknail watched him go for a second, before turning around and smirking at the door Galive had gone through.

At last, it was time to have some fun! Galive was going to regret making him sit still so long! He would also regret making Herad angry too, of course. Either one was really just a bad idea.

Now what was the best way of tracking down his prey? Blacknail slowly turned and regarded the room around him. There were still a lot of random residents of Daggerpoint around, but none of them were looking his way. There were still several of the cloaked guards standing around the perimeter of the room, though.

Two stood by the bar, two more were by the main entrance, and one was stationed by the door Galive had gone through. As Blacknail watched, the last guard glanced his way. Blacknail knew that he was acting somewhat suspicious, so he casually turned around and mingled with the remains of the earlier crowds.

He then looked around the room. There was no easy way into any of the doors that led inside; they were all guarded. He’d have to make his own way in, and that meant he needed a distraction. What would work?

After a few more seconds of thought, Blacknail headed over to the table closest to the door Galive had gone through. There were two men and one woman sitting at it, and they all seemed quite drunk. The woman seemed unsteady and was leaning onto the larger of the two men. Blacknail grinned as he walked past them. They would work perfectly.

For his plan to work he still needed another human, and none happened to be nearby. That was easily solved though; all he had to do was use a human trap. Blacknail nonchalantly strolled up behind the people seated at the table, and placed several coins on the ground behind them. He then took a seat at a nearby table, and waited.

Within a few minutes a human took his bait. A man from across the room noticed them, and walked over to pick them up. As he passed Blacknail the hobgoblin got up and quietly shadowed him.

Just as the man was about to reach down and pick up the coins, Blacknail tripped him. The man grunted in surprise as he fell over and hit the woman at the table, and she screeched in alarm. Immediately, her large companion got up and pushed the other man away.

“You little bastard, what do you think you’re doing?” the larger man roared angrily.

“Shit, it was an accident,” swore the other man as he picked himself off of the ground.

Blacknail rushed over to assist him. The hobgoblin extended an arm and helped the man get up.

“Thanks,” the confused man told him, as he stood up.

“You dropped this,” Blacknail told the man as he pressed an item into the man’s outstretched hand.

“So, it’s a fight you want,” roared the bigger man as he drew a knife.

“Um, what...” the smaller man replied, as he twitched in nervous surprise.

He then looked down and noticed what he was brandishing in his hand. He was holding up a dagger of his own, the one Blacknail had put there. He paled slightly and opened his mouth.

“No, I…” the man started to say.

He didn’t have time to finish speaking; his opponent lunged towards him, and the smaller man had to defend himself. Laughter and shouts of excitement soon filled the air, as everyone else began to notice that a fight had started. A crowd soon formed.

By this time Blacknail had already slipped away, and mingled into the crowd that had rapidly formed to watch the fight. The noise and mob quickly grew large enough to attract the attention of the guards, and several rushed over, including the one that had been guarding the door.

With a smug smile Blacknail broke away from the others, and walked through the now unguarded entrance while everyone was distracted. He giggled merrily to himself as he moved. It was so easy to fool humans sometimes! Why did they even bother placing sentries?

The hallway on the other side was dark, and Blacknail happily scurried into the shadows. He stopped for a second to listen for signs of movement nearby. A second later, when he was sure there was no one nearby he began to follow Galive’s trail.

After a few seconds he heard someone approaching so he slipped into a side room until they had passed by. Blacknail was finding it very easy to stay out of sight. The temple had a lot of dark unused rooms in it for him to hide in.

It was hard to follow Galive’s scent though. The bandit’s trail was mixed up with that of many other humans, and it had been muddled up by how many times Galive had walked these halls. It was hard to figure out which trail was the freshest.

Thankfully, Blacknail didn’t really need to use his nose. As he moved out of the dark hallway and into better lit areas of the temple he heard talking up ahead, and thanks to Galive’s rather boring speech from earlier he knew exactly what the man sounded like.

Blacknail couldn’t make out what was being said, but he definitely knew which direction the man lay in. It was just a matter of time until he found his prey. The hobgoblin stalked forward eagerly, but soon ran into a rather annoying obstacle. The room up ahead of him was brightly lit, and four of Galive’s cloaked henchmen were playing cards in the middle of it.

Blacknail couldn’t think of any way of sneaking past them, or any way to take them all out silently. He hissed in frustration and tried to think of a solution. A few moments later he heard someone coming from behind him, so he quickly slipped into another side room and out of sight.

He waited for several moments until the person had walked past, then Blacknail peeked out from around the door frame. As the hobgoblin took in the sight of another dark cloak a great idea occurred to him.

Blacknail quickly took out his coin purse and lunged forward. Before the man could react the hobgoblin had swung his makeshift weapon and smashed him across the back of the head. The man immediately slumped and started to collapse. Humans were apparently weak to coins in more than one way.

Before the thug could hit the floor Blacknail caught him and dragged him into the side room, and then behind a pile of crates. The hobgoblin then claimed the defeated warrior’s cloak for his own. It was rather nice looking, and much smoother feeling on his skin than his own.

The grinning hobgoblin pulled the cloak on and then walked back out into the hall. When he reached the occupied room up ahead he simply flipped the hood up, and kept walking. None of the men playing the game did more than casually glance his way as he walked into the room.

Blacknail fingered the dagger and the sling he had up his sleeves and ready to go just in case, but he didn’t need them. The humans were engrossed in their game, and Blacknail was soon through the far door and out of their view.

He then stopped to listen again. A few seconds later he swerved left and headed towards a staircase; the voices sounded like they were coming from up above.

Once up there he stepped out into another hallway, and then quickly darted into a empty looking room before anyone came. The room was rather large but it only contained a few chairs and crates. Blacknail had to stifle a sneeze, as he realized there was also a lot of dust in it as well.

The hobgoblin could feel the floorboards tremor slightly as a group of people approached, so he moved out of sight. He hid up against the wall; behind table had been flipped on its side.

The pack of humans quickly passed, but Blacknail didn’t move. He was now close enough to Galive that he could make out the chieftain’s words. In fact the man sounded like he was in the very next room.

“Listen, I appreciate the sentiment, but you can’t stay in here,” Galive told someone with obvious frustration.

“Zelena sent me to protect you, and that’s what I plan on doing. Need I remind you what happened to Fang? He also thought he was safe in his hideout, but Herad’s assassin got to him,” the other voice explained.

“I’ve done everything else you asked; I switched rooms, I doubled the guards, and I’ve let you tag along, but this is my home and you’re staying out of my bedroom! This is not a debate,” Galive responded.

“You’re putting yourself at risk,” the other man told him.

“Maybe, but how would anyone even get in here? This is the second floor, there are guards outside, and the window is too small for a man to slip through. I’m far from helpless as well; I’m a Vessel after all,” Galive told him.

“A good assassin can get into anywhere,” was the other’s reply.

“I guess you would know. You’re the most expensive knifeman in Daggerpoint and after all, Malthus,” Galive said.

“I am the best, and that’s why you should listen to me,” the other man replied.

The bandit chieftain grunted disdainfully before responding.

“I thought Zelena had bought out the entire Assassin Guild, anyway. If that’s true, where did Herad’s knifeman come from?” he asked Malthus.

“Zelena has entered into such an agreement with us, but we only have a monopoly on knifemen in Daggerpoint. Herad seems to have picked her killer up from outside,” the assassin explained.

“Huh, I heard she’s been wandering around the countryside down south. What, did she randomly come across him in the middle of the forest?” Galive laughed.

“I don’t know. I’ve tried to find out, but I haven’t had much luck. Herad is keeping him hidden, even from most of her own men. Normally, that wouldn’t stop me, but I suspect someone else is covering for him as well. Some of the guild informants have gone silent recently,” Malthus admitted with obvious frustration.

“Seems like Zelena is paying you guys way too much then,” Galive pointed out.

“That’s not your concern. You just need to worry about yourself. This mysterious assassin doesn’t even need to enter your room to kill you; he could poison your food or drink,” the assassin turned bodyguard explained.

While crouched in his hiding spot Blacknail smiled to himself. That was a great idea. He wondered if he could do that right now…

“All my food is checked anyway. Herad is far from my only enemy. You’re welcome to test it yourself though,” the chieftain replied.

The hobgoblin hissed in annoyance. Apparently, he couldn’t poison the man after all. Oh well, he would remember the idea for later. He was sure it would come in handy eventually.

“He could also use some sort of magical device, or throw a firebomb into the room,” Maltheus added.

Blacknail didn’t have either of those, but they sure sounded cool! He was definitely going to ask for some of those when he got back.

“That’s enough of this, I gave you an order. You can stay here or guard the window from outside, it’s up to you. Now, I’m going to go tell the girls to join me and you won’t be there to watch, got it?” Galive commanded the assassin sternly.

“As you wish, I’ll stay here and guard the door,” was the other man’s reply.

Galive then huffed and walked away. Blacknail didn’t worry though, he knew his target would be back. The hobgoblin just made himself comfortable, and prepared himself to wait for the right moment to strike.

A few minutes later he heard the sound of Galive returning, and he wasn’t alone.

“I’m going to show you ladies a great time,” the chieftain bragged as he approached his room.

This was quickly followed by quiet chuckling and excited murmurs from the females accompanying him.

“So, you think you’re a great lover, eh?” one of them asked.

“Of course I am. Cor-Dius is the god of things done in darkness, so as his head priest I’m obviously the greatest lover in the city, if not the world,” Galive bragged as he opened his door and stepped inside.

There was more murmuring, before the door shut and blocked the noise. The assassin snorted in disgust as soon as Galive was safely out of earshot. He apparently didn’t agree with the chieftain’s high opinion of himself.

Just as Blacknail was settling back down to wait, noises began to erupt from the other side of the wall he was leaning on. He heard the creaking of a bed, followed by high pitched human squeals, and the sound of flesh slapping against flesh.

The hobgoblin groaned quietly to himself. He really didn’t want to sit there and listen to humans mating. Hopefully, it would be over soon.

However, the noises actually soon grew louder, and groans of pleasure were added to the mix. Blacknail stuck his tongue out in disgust as he plugged his fingers into his ears. The noises were giving him a huge headache.

“Stupid pink-ss humans,” he hissed, as his imagination started supplying images to go along with the noises. The hobgoblin now had another reason to kill Galive.

After what seemed like hours, but was probably actually much less time, the noises finally stopped and the room grew quiet. Blacknail heard a groan of relief from the man guarding Galive’s door, and nodded in agreement. He was also glad they had finally stopped.

After enough time had passed that the hobgoblin was sure his target and his company were asleep, he put his plan into motion. On the outside wall of the room there was a small cross shaped window. Blacknail was pretty sure it was exactly the same as the one in his target’s room.

It was too small for all but the smallest humans to fit through, but Blacknail thought he could slip through. Hobgoblins were very skinny, that was part of the reason they were so attractive.

Silently, he crept over to the window and looked outside. There was a guard holding a lantern down in the yard below. The man seemed to be patrolling the perimeter of the temple. He was doing a terrible job of it though, which was typical for a human.

Blacknail took a second to take off his new cloak and put it away; it was comfy and he’d decided to keep it. He then looked out the window and observed the below guard's routine for a few minutes. When the hobgoblin was satisfied that the man was unlikely to look up and spot him, he squeezed through the window and outside.

It was a tight squeeze and getting his head through was uncomfortable, because his brain was so big, but Blacknail managed it. There was a small ridge on the wall outside so the hobgoblin grabbed it and began to shimmy carefully along it, and towards the window into the next room. His claws dug into the wood and gave him nice firm handholds.

After a few minutes of climbing and clambering along the wall, Blacknail managed to make it across the outside wall without alerting the guard below. The hobgoblin let out a small sigh of relief when he reached his destination, and saw it was indeed the same type of window he had just come through. It would have been really awkward if it hadn’t been.

Blacknail carefully reached up to get a solid hold on the windowsill, and then hauled himself over to it. As he hung there and the light of the guard’s lamp passed below him, he carefully pulled himself up to the window opening. There was a heavy blue curtain in the way, so he gently pushed it aside.

The hobgoblin grinned wickedly and shivered with anticipation, as he peeked inside. His prey was right there, and was sleeping defenselessly. Soon the hunt would be complete, and the sweet taste of victory would be his!

For a second the clouds above shifted and the moon shone brightly in the sky. Blacknail's thin clawed shadow stretched out and into the room. Seeing this, the hobgoblin giggled and then moved eagerly in for the kill. 








ATT 5









There was a lamp on a dresser against one of the walls, and it lit the room that lay on the other side of the window. The hobgoblin that hung outside could thus see its occupants just fine; all four of the humans within were lying next to each other on the big bed that dominated the room.

Blacknail could clearly hear the soft sighing of their relaxed breathing as they slept. His skin tingled pleasantly as he gazed upon his helpless prey, and he started to slip through the window.

Unfortunately, he’d misjudged the size of the opening slightly, and his head got momentarily stuck. After a second or two of trying to painfully squeeze his skull through the tight frame, he succeeded and popped through. A soft thud echoed forth as Blacknail lost his balance and landed on the floor at the base of the window.

He froze for a moment to make sure he hadn’t disturbed anyone, but the only sound he heard was the gentle breathing of slumbering humans. Feeling confident, the hobgoblin crept up to the bed.

It wasn’t that fancy of a bed, but it certainly was huge. Blacknail thought it could easily fit a dozen humans lying side by side. Why did this man need such a huge bed? Maybe it was some sort of human status symbol?

Blacknail loomed over Galive’s slumbering face and smiled smugly. The bandit chieftain didn’t seem so tough now! He was just prey. In fact, it would be so easy to toy with him a little before finishing him off…

The hobgoblin reached over until his hand hung over the man’s sleeping face. His claws were a hair’s breadth from the man’s eyes when he froze. No, fooling around now would be a bad idea. It would be really messy, and would probably make a lot of noise. Blacknail frowned in regret, as he pulled his hand back and drew his dagger. It was best to do this quickly.

Suddenly, Galive stirred slightly and started murmuring something. Blacknail panicked for a second and jumped slightly in surprise, before he realized the man was still unconscious. He was just talking in his sleep. Feeling curious, the hobgoblin leaned over to listen.

“Oh ya, that’s the way. Spread that honey around,” Galive whispered.

Blacknail blinked in confusion. What was this now? What could this weird human possibly be talking about? Well whatever, he was here to kill Galive, not try to understand him.

Blacknail stopped wasting time. He quickly grabbed the Galive’s long dark hair and pulled it down, as he dragged his dagger against the man’s exposed throat. Blood poured from the long jagged wound and onto the sheets, as his knife bit deep into Galive’s flesh.

Galive’s dark eyes shot open and fluttered briefly before going dead. Blacknail smirked as he stared intently into their confused depths. When he was sure the man was dead, he stepped quietly away. That was one less bandit chief that would be trying to take his and Herad’s territory, and it hadn’t even been hard to get rid of him.

Blacknail was just about to make his exit, when the woman to the right of Galive’s bloody corpse stirred in her sleep. The movement caused Blacknail to instantly focus on her.

Some of Galive’s blood was pooling beneath the woman’s bare shoulders, and was staining her long blonde hair. It was also clearly disturbing her slumber.

She stirred again and Blacknail realized he had to do something, before she woke up and raised the alarm. He stalked back over to her, and tried to come up with a solution. He couldn’t remove the blood; there was too much of it and he wasn’t that thirsty. He also couldn’t move woman without waking her…

With an annoyed sigh Blacknail leaned over her, and cut her throat too. When he was sure she was dead, and that no one else was about to wake up, he tiptoed over to the window and made his exit. He managed to make it through without getting his head stuck this time.
As Blacknail crouched on the windowsill he observed the yard below him. The guard from earlier was still out there, but he was walking away from the hobgoblin. The man was just about to turn the corner of the building and disappear out of sight.

With his mission accomplished Blacknail was beginning to feel impatient, so he climbed down the exterior wall as far as he could and then simply dropped the rest of the way. He landed unharmed on all four limbs, and then dashed for the stone fence that encircled the temple. He hit it at full spend and then vaulted over it onto the street on the other side. With that done, he’d successfully escaped from Galive’s lair unharmed.

As he raced through the dark and dirty streets of Daggerpoint towards safety and his rendezvous with Saeter, the hobgoblin giggled happily to himself. That had been too easy. The bandit chieftain had been supposed to be so tough, but he hadn’t been a problem for Blacknail!

That other assassin guy, Malthus, had been an idiot as well! Blacknail giggled again as he turned into an alley. The fool had just stood there outside the door as Blacknail slit the throat of the man he was supposed to be protecting! It was hilarious how bad the man was at his job, or maybe Blacknail was just that good.

Obviously, Blacknail was an amazing assassin; probably the best ever! He was like Herad’s fearsome unstoppable shadow killer guy! When he returned with news of Galive’s death there was no way Herad would beat him up ever again. In fact, she would probably tell everyone how amazing he was, and then give him some pie.

Blacknail reached the corner right before his destination, so he slowed down and looked for any sign of Saeter. A brief inspection didn’t reveal any traces of him, and the hobgoblin grew slightly concerned. Had something happened to him?

“Where are you, master?” he muttered to himself.

Blacknail began to creep around stealthily as he searched. He moved from shadow to shadow as he wandered around the area near the meeting place. He didn’t find anything, until he stumbled upon a faint scent trail.

It led into a nearby building so Blacknail followed it in. All the structures in this part of the city were small and tightly packed, and this one didn’t stand out. It did appear to be abandoned though; the missing front door was subtle clue.

Blacknail walked into the pitch black interior, and then headed up the stairs to the room on the second floor. He was careful not to make any noise, because he didn’t know what to expect. Also, creeping around all sneaky-like was just more fun.

When the hobgoblin got to the top of stairs he saw a dark figure looking out a window through a doorway. He froze for a second, but soon realized that it was just Saeter.

Before he started moving again, an idea occurred to him. His master didn’t appear to know that Blacknail was here… so wouldn’t it be fun to surprise him!

Blacknail grinned gleefully to himself. This was going to be so much fun! As he stepped through the doorway he felt something tug gently on his ankle, and then heard a faint clattering noise. He looked down to see what it was, and realized that he’d stumbled over a piece of string had been tied to a pile of sticks.

How had that gotten there? Well, hopefully it hadn’t ruined his surprise.

Blacknail looked back up to see something shiny. It was Saeter’s unsheathed sword point, and it was less than an inch from his face. The surprised hobgoblin went very still, as his eyes widen in alarm. Yep, the surprise was ruined, and this had definitely been a bad idea.

“The Deep Green has yet to spit out a beast that can sneak up on me, hobgoblin, and that includes the likes of you,” Saeter whispered threateningly, before relaxing and dropping his blade.

“I was just having fun. I wasn’t going to do anything bad,” Blacknail whined.

“If I thought you were, I’d have already skewered you. Missions aren’t the time to be having fun. That’s how people get hurt,” Saeter replied gruffly.

Blacknail nodded enthusiastically in agreement. He’d certainly almost been hurt. His master grunted and his hard expression softened. The hobgoblin almost thought he detected a slight smile on the man’s lips.

“How’d the mission go; did you get Galive?” Saeter asked.

“Of course, I started a fight, crept through the shadows, went in and out some windows, and murdered the sleeping human. There was nothing to eat,” Blacknail explained cheerfully.

The old scout rolled his eyes in an exasperated manner after the hobgoblin finished speaking. Blacknail frowned at his master’s response. What was wrong with his answer? It covered all the important bits.

“You can tell Herad the details. Did that Elixir of Mahedium’s come in handy?” Saeter inquired.

Blacknail mouth fell open slightly, as the question caught him off guard. He had kind of forgotten he’d had it. There were definitely a few times a boost of speed and strength would have been useful though…

“It was too easy, I didn’t need it,” Blacknail bragged dishonestly.

Saeter gave him a suspicious glance, but didn’t bother to question the hobgoblin.

“Come on let’s get back to base, winter’s approaching, and it’s getting bloody cold out,” Saeter told the hobgoblin as he walked past him and headed downstairs.

The hobgoblin sighed regretfully as he followed the old scout. His master probably shouldn’t have waited out in the cold for him; he was going to catch the sniffles. Obviously, he’d been worried Blacknail was going to mess things up, so he’d stuck around. Why couldn’t his master have just trusted him? He was very trustworthy!

After several minutes of walking through the now almost pitch black street, Blacknail was starting to wonder where they were going. They weren’t headed anywhere near Herad’s base.

Saeter soon turned around and scowled at Blacknail.

“Why don’t you lead the way, waiting around for you so long has left my legs sore,” he told the hobgoblin.

Blacknail wasn’t sure why that mattered. Wouldn’t he have to walk the same distance anyway? Well, whatever…

“We’re going back to the lair?” he asked, just to make sure.

“Of course, we bloody are. Where else would we be headed?” Saeter huffed indignantly.

“Nowhere-ss, sorry,” the hobgoblin replied, as he quickly took the lead.

He took a second to decide on the fastest route, and then within minutes they were approaching Herad’s stronghold. The guards out front simply nodded in greeting when they recognized Saeter, and Blacknail gave them a friendly nod back. The pair then walked through the front entrance and into the room on the other side.

As usual, there were several bandits sitting around the table there playing a game of cards. This time however, Khita was one of them. Judging by the pile of coins in front of her, and the dissatisfied looks on several of her opponents’ faces, she appeared to be winning.

The young redhead glanced their way as Saeter and Blacknail entered, and smiled cheerfully at them. She seemed to having fun.

“You’re back! How did your top secret mission for the boss go? I know she sent you out to do something, all hush hush,” she asked.

“If you know that, then you shouldn’t be asking,” interjected a large male bandit that was sitting across from her.

“Bah, you’re just upset that you’re losing,” Khita responded, as she beamed at Blacknail.

The bandit scowled angrily at her, and one of his eyebrows started twitching.

“No, you’re lucky that the boss likes you so much,” the man muttered angrily.

Blacknail agreed with him, but he found himself giving the man a steady disapproving glare. If anyone was going to kill Khita, then it was going to be him! The bandit met his stare for a second, but then hurriedly looked away.

“Where’s Herad?” Saeter asked Khita.

“She was in that big room down the hall to the left, the one with all the couches, the last time I checked,” Khita replied.

Saeter grunted his acknowledgement, and then unceremoniously left the room. After one quick glance back at the man who had challenged him, Blacknail followed him out. It only took a few seconds for them to reach the room Khita had mentioned, and Herad was indeed there.

She was sprawled comfortably over the edge of one of the couches. A platter of food and drink had been set out on a side table in front of her, and several of her usual guards were also there. Most of them were standing around the room, but two had seats of their own.

Herad smiled eagerly when she saw them, and pulled herself up into more of a sitting position.

“Clear the room,” she then announced.

With a quick nod of acknowledgement the guards got up and left the room. They closed the doors behind them.

“Since you’re both back, I take it that Galive is dead?” the chieftain asked them.

“So the hobgoblin tells me,” Saeter replied.

“I totally killed him. I cut his neck deep as he slept, and he bled everywhere!” Blacknail answered cheerfully.

Herad ignored Blacknail, and raised an eyebrow dubiously at Saeter.

“You think he’s lying?” she asked curiously.

“Ha, no. He went in, and he came out alive. That means Galive is dead,” Saeter huffed.

“You never know. Maybe they found out about your hob’s secret weakness for sweet cakes, and bribed him,” she replied with a chuckle and a grin.

Blacknail scowled in annoyance. That was just insulting. He would never betray his tribe for a sweet cake! There weren’t enough cakes in the whole world for that. Of course, the world wasn’t that big, and mostly seemed to be made up of trees.

Herad saw his look and instead of growing angry she smirked. She then reached out and grabbed one of the pastries from the platter, and tossed it up into the air towards Blacknail. Instantly, the hobgoblin caught it and shoved it into his mouth.

“Thank-ss you so much mistress,” he told her happily as he chewed. All his previous feelings of irritation had been completely forgotten.

“If only all men were so easy to please,” Herad remarked, with a look towards Saeter.

“You mean control,” Saeter replied dryly.

“That too,” Herad added with another smug grin. “Saeter, I’ll have you get a report from Blacknail and give it to me tomorrow. His full reports are… different.”

“They certainly are,” Saeter agreed.

Herad then turned to the hobgoblin.

“For now, just tell me about anything important or unexpected that happened, and this time leave out any details about how things tasted or smelled. I don’t need to know about that,” Herad asked, as she grimaced with disgust.

Blackail sighed in disappointment. That was usually the most interesting part, though! He took a moment to recall everything that had happened on his mission.

He’d walked there with Saeter, there’d been some humans, he’d eaten the chicken, he’d tricked some more humans, bleh bleh, and then he’d killed Galive and ran away. Oh wait, there had been one thing.

“There was a man, an assassin. He was there to protect Galive, but he sucked at it,” Blacknail told his chieftain.

“That’s interesting. You overheard them talking?” Herad asked.

“Yes, he was sent by a Zelena human,” Blacknail replied.

“See, Saeter? I knew they were working together. Galive swore he was a neutral party, but I wasn’t fooled! That bastard lied like a village peddler; for all that he was supposed to be a priest.” Herad exclaimed excitedly.

“I didn’t disagree with you about that,” Saeter pointed out.

“I guess you didn’t, for once,” Herad commented with a roll of her eyes.

“If that’s everything, then I’d like to get some sleep. I also wouldn’t mind a hot cup of tea,” Saeter told her.

“Fine, I’d hate to keep you up past your bed time. You two can go rest,” Herad answered dismissively.

“It’s not my bedtime. I’m going to go out and find some food,” Blacknail interjected.

“You’re coming with me. Now is not the time to be wandering around,” Saeter replied as gave the hobgoblin a stern glance.

“But I’m still hungry,” Blacknail whined.

“Grab something from the kitchen,” Saeter told him as he gave him a light push towards the door.

“Fine, but I’m eating whatever I want,” the hobgoblin replied as he opened the door.

“Go ahead, just keep out of trouble,” his master said as they passed by the guards from earlier.

After almost an hour of ransacking the kitchen and terrorizing the chef, Blacknail had stuffed himself enough that he began to grow sleepy. Saeter had already left so the hobgoblin yawned and headed for his room.

Once there, he disrobed and began rearranging his blankets for maximum comfort. The hobgoblin then curled up on his bed and almost immediately went to sleep. He’d earned his rest.

It wasn’t to be as long a rest as he’d hoped, though. Several hours later, he twitched in his sleep as an unexpected rhythm penetrated his subconscious.

When the quiet sound repeated itself, the hobgoblin stirred and frowned in annoyance. He opened one eye slightly and saw that it was still dark outside. He didn’t like being awakened like this, so hopefully whatever the annoying thing was it would soon stop or die.

It sounded like footsteps. In fact, it sounded like several people were trying to move quietly, and it was coming from the roof...

The hobgoblin growled softly as he came completely awake. His tribe was under attack! 









ATT 6








Blacknail immediately pulled himself up from the tangle of sheets around him, and growled menacingly. The sound of his anger echoed throughout his small room, as he shot to his feet. Someone was trying to be sneaky and invade his tribe’s lair!

“Enemies,” he hissed to himself.

The hobgoblin felt his drowsiness burn away under the relentless waves of his rage. His lips rose to reveal his teeth as he snarled. Whoever these people were, they were about to get a very nasty surprise. He was going to stab them, a lot.

Blacknail didn’t waste any time. He quickly began throwing on his clothes and arming himself, as he carefully listened in on the enemies' progress.

The footsteps were slowly but steadily crossing the roof. At first the hobgoblin assumed they were coming to attack him, but he realized that was unlikely. No one knew who he was, or where he’d stashed his cheese.

That meant they must be after Herad! They were assassins, and aiming to murder Blacknail’s chieftain the same way the hobgoblin had killed the other chiefs.

Well, it wouldn’t work, because they were much worse at it than Blacknail. The hobgoblin had already discovered them, and not being detected before reaching the target was the most important bit.

He pulled on his mask, slipped quietly through his door, and stalked quickly forward down the hallway towards Herad’s room. The hallway was dark except for a single candle set on a small table, and there was a sleepy looking guard leaning against the wall beside it.

Blacknail growled as he noticed the man’s eyes were closed. What kind of pathetic warrior went to sleep in the middle of a job?

The man was apparently a light sleeper though because the hobgoblin’s outraged growl woke him. He blinked and turned to see what was going on, and then jumped in alarm when he saw the masked and cloaked hobgoblin descending upon him.

“Shh, quiet,” Blacknail hissed as he raised a finger to his mouth. “There are-ss people on the roof,”

“What?” the man whispered in confusion, as he began to recognize Blacknail and started calming down.

“Assassins on the roof!” Blacknail whispered back.

Why did he always have to repeat himself? Human hearing wasn’t that bad, even if they had tiny pink ears.

Herad’s guard flinched as the hobgoblin’s words finally sunk in. He then threw a quick glance upwards, as if he expected to see something. Blacknail sighed in frustration; he wasn’t impressed.

“We need to raise the alarm,” the man said a few seconds later.

“No, then-ss they would run. Give-ss me door key, and then go raise alarm, silently. Herad would-ss want us to warn her, and then trap them so they end up dead,” Blacknail argued.

There was no way Herad would want to pass up an opportunity to kill some of her enemies. She was pretty consistent that way.

The guard seemed to agree with Blacknail’s judgment of Herad’s character, because he nodded reluctantly in agreement and then handed Blacknail the key.

“I’ll be right back. You wake the boss then. Better you than me anyway; she’s not a morning person,” the man told him.

He then quickly disappeared into a side room, and several seconds later the hobgoblin could hear him begin whispering to someone else.

Blacknail was tense and nervous as he unlocked the door and walked through it. Not because of the assassins, but rather because he was pretty sure the guard was right about how Herad wouldn’t like being disturbed. She would however like not being informed of the assassins even less, which meant there really weren’t any good options.

The chieftain’s room was dark, except for the slivers of moonlight that squeezed through the cracks of the one small shuttered window, and the light of the candle in the hallway that shone out from under the closed door behind Blacknail.

It was however more than enough light for the hobgoblin’s sensitive eyes. He could make out most the details of the room, including the bed Herad was sleeping on. The bandit chieftain was curled up under her sheets and her sleeping face was pointed his way.

As he approached Herad, Blacknail very carefully calculated a minimum safe distance that was out of reach of a sword. He didn’t believe for a second that she didn’t have one shoved somewhere around the bed, or that she wouldn’t use it on him if he angered her.

Once he had gotten as close as he dared, Blacknail took a second to study Herad. She looked different somehow, but the hobgoblin couldn’t immediately figure out why.

Then he realized her eyes weren’t as shadowed and menacing as usual. Did Herad wear makeup? No wait, that was just silly; of course it was actually war paint. That made much more sense.

The creaking of wooden supports from above brought Blacknail back to reality. He knew he needed to wake his chief up before the assassins arrived, but he couldn’t figure out how to do it safely. Yelling was out of the question, and so was touching her. Maybe he could poke her with a long stick?

Blacknail looked her over again. She actually didn’t seem all that dangerous at the moment. In fact she seemed kind of vulnerable, so he should probably just go shake her awake. That would be quietest way to do it after all. He took a tentative step forward…

“I can think of three reasons a hobgoblin would be creeping around in my bedroom after dark, and you’ll only survive one of them,” Herad told him, as she lay unmoving in bed with her eyes closed.

Blacknail instantly froze, and he felt a cold shiver work its way through him. His eyes widened as he realized he’d just almost gotten himself killed. Good thing he was a coward.

“There are bad assassins on the roof! When I, your ever loyal servant, heard them I told your guards. Then I came in here to tell you,” Blacknail whispered to her nervously.

The bandit chieftain grunted and opened her eyes. Her cold gaze bore into him as she studied his face. She was still scary, even without war paint.

“Good, because you’re not my type, and it'd be a shame to have to kill you for being too ambitious,” she told him, as she sat up.

Her movement caused her blankets to shift and slip off of her shoulders. Underneath that, she was wearing a loose plain white shirt and long dark pants.

“How many?” she asked, as she stood up and pulled on a leather jacket that had been lying beside her bed.

“Five or six,” Blacknail replied uncertainly. He was just grateful that his answer had apparently been the right one. What had the other two been?

“They’re coming for me?” Herad asked as she pulled a sheathed sword and hilt out from under her pillow.

“Sounds like,” Blacknail whispered back.

There was suddenly a slight creaking noise from the roof above, and both of them looked up. Herad then narrowed her eyes and then turned to the window. It was the only way in other than the door.

There was then a creaking noise from behind them, as the entrance swung open slightly. Both Herad and Blacknail tensed and reached for their weapons. However, it was only several of Herad’s guards. When they saw that their boss was up and about they stopped, and waited for orders.

Herad studied them for a second before motioning silently for them to back off. The man in front nodded, took a step back out of the room, and then carefully shut the door behind him.

The bandit chieftain then moved over to her bed and pulled several pillows out from underneath it. She then stuffed them under her blanket, so that it looked like someone was still sleeping there. With that done she crouched down beside the bed out of sight of the window.

Blacknail had been wondering where all the spare pillows had gone, they’d disappeared suddenly right after he’d piled them all on his bed to make himself more comfortable.

The hobgoblin ignored that for now though, and tried to find somewhere to hide. Another creak, this time from the roof right above the window, meant that the hobgoblin had to move quickly.

He didn’t see anything large enough to hide behind, except for the bed, so he crept up to the window and then pulled himself up over it and into the rafters above. Humans rarely ever looked up; it was a weakness of the species.

Herad gave him a dubious look, but then just shook her head and crouched back down out of sight. Blacknail was fairly sure that meant she trusted his judgment, and why wouldn’t she?

Almost immediately, the shutters below Blacknail shook ever so slightly. A slim hooked blade poked out from between them, and then slid upwards until it hit the latch. There was the faintest of clicking noises as the blade knocked the latch loose and unlocked the window.

As the hobgoblin watched from above, the shutters swung open ever so slowly. A second later, a man wrapped in dark clothing crept through the window and into the room. He quickly glanced around the room, and stared apprehensively at the dummy beneath Herad’s sheets for a few seconds, before tiptoeing off to the side.

The assassin was wearing a black hood and had a dark grey scarf wrapped around the lower part of his face, but Blacknail recognized his scent. It was Malthus, the assassin who had failed so badly at being Galive’s bodyguard.

A soon as Malthus was out of the way his companions followed him in, until all five of them were inside. Blacknail watched with interest as Malthus raised a hand and signaled to his men using some sort of sign language the hobgoblin didn’t understand.

Almost instantly, the assassins spread out and stalked stealthily towards Herad’s bed. Blacknail waited expectantly for them to step completely into the trap, but halfway there Malthus froze and hurriedly signaled his men.

Instantly, the two men closest to the window turned and ran for it. The other three, including the leader, drew their swords and began backing up slowly. Up in the dark rafters Blacknail pouted in disappointment. Somehow, they’d obviously noticed the trap, and that was no fun.

Several things then happened all at once. Blacknail dropped down onto the back of one of the fleeing assassins, and then lashed out and kicked the other one savagely in the head.

Meanwhile, Herad rose up from behind the bed with her blade drawn and launched herself at the other three assassins. The ringing of clashing blades drew the attention of several of Herad’s guards, who had been waiting in the hallway. They threw the door open and moved to join the fight.

As Blacknail grappled his opponent to the floor, Herad engaged two of the assassins in a swordfight. The third attacker stepped back and quickly reached into his robe, before pulling out a beaker and throwing it violently towards her charging minions.

The glass container hit the floor and spilled liquid everywhere as it shattered. Herad’s thugs stepped onto the mess as they ran towards her, and then began tripping all over themselves as their feet slid out from under them.

The man wrestling Blacknail finally went limp as the hobgoblin withdrew his knife from out under his ribs. The assassin Blacknail had kicked earlier had gotten to his feet and was crawling through the window, so the hobgoblin grabbed the booted foot closest to him, and pulled him back into the room.

The vial thrower assassin used the time he had bought himself and his companions to turn back towards Herad. He was however too late to prevent Herad from parrying one of his companion’s blades and then unleashing a lightning quick slash that sent the assassin’s severed hand falling to the floor.

“Plan Dawn,” Malthus barked as he ducked under a slash from Herad.

Hearing this, the assassin who had thrown the beaker broke away from the fight, and made a dash for the window. He ran right past Blacknail as he fled. The hobgoblin was now wrestling with his second assassin, and he wasn’t doing nearly as well as he had against the first.

The man had got in a lucky blow at the start, and kicked Blacknail’s knife away. The masked hobgoblin had more, but he was too busy trying not to get choked out by the larger and stronger human to draw them. He also wished he wasn’t wearing the mask so he could just bite the stupid man’s fingers off, or that he hadn’t forgotten to take his Elixir again.

Herad was now locked in a brutal sword fight with the assassin leader. Both of them launched attack after attack at each other with furious precision. Their blades flashed through the air so quickly that they were almost impossible to see. It was obvious that both combatants were Vessels, no one else could move so swiftly.

Herad was slowly forcing the man back though. She smiled cruelly as she fought, and seemed to be having quite a bit of fun. The assassin leader on the other hand looked nervous. He was obviously having trouble avoiding some of her attacks, and already had a few superficial gashes in his clothing.

The man who was fighting Blacknail suddenly lurched backwards, and then surprised the hobgoblin by punching him heavily in the side of the head. Blacknail’s mask absorbed most of the blow, but it also shifted slightly to the side and blinded him.

The now blind hobgoblin could only flail about and try to grab his opponent’s hands. This didn’t work very well though, and a few seconds later he lurched backwards as something slammed into his stomach.

By this time the third assassin had reached the window, instead of diving through it though, he turned and pulled something out of his coat.

“Dawn,” he yelled at the top of his lungs, which caused everyone to look his way.

Blinding light then burst forth and enveloped the room. Swearing rang out as everyone tried to shield their eyes.

“Fucking mage,” Herad hissed.

The leader of the assassins had been facing away from the light and prepared for it, so he wasn’t blinded. He took the opportunity to slash at Herad’s neck. The bandit chieftain must have sensed something though, because she threw herself out of the way of the attack. The assassin’s sword ended up only grazing her shoulder.

He didn’t try for a second attack. The man turned and fled towards the window, as Herad and her men tried to organize themselves and regain their footing.

The assassin that was grappling with Blacknail pushed him aside and tried to rise to his feet. As Blacknail lurched backwards he growled in frustration. Rage and confusion pulsed through him, until he couldn’t take it anymore and he ripped his mask off.

His opponent froze and his eyes widened in terror as the hobgoblin’s inhuman visage was revealed. Blacknail didn’t waste the opportunity. He grabbed one of the man’s wrists, and then before the man could recover he lunged down and savagely bit into it with his now exposed teeth.

Screams filled the room as the hobgoblin dug his teeth deeper into the human’s flesh. The iron taste of blood filled his mouth, and excited him. Filled with a sudden bout of hungry energy the hobgoblin let go of his opponent’s ruined arm, and then dug his fingers into the man’s eyes.

The hobgoblin's long sharp nails cut through his gloves, and then deep into the man’s sockets. More tortured screams rent the air.

As the man lay helpless and writhing beneath him, Blacknail took the time to look around the room. The other assassins had already fled. Only Herad, her minions, and several corpses remained.

Herad blinked and dropped the hand that was massaging her eyes. She looked at Blacknail and ground her teeth together furiously.

“Leave the wounded one, you idiot. After them!” she yelled at him.

Blacknail immediately grabbed his fallen mask and jumped to obey. He leapt off his defeated prey and launched himself at the window.

In mid air he grabbed the window sill and swung himself around to the outside wall, where he sank his claws into the wood and began to climb after the assassins. He could hear them running across the roof, and see the discarded piece of rope they had used to escape on the street below.

With inhuman agility the hobgoblin pulled himself onto the roof and scrambled after the fleeing assassins. Instinctively, he knew that the best way to catch them was to make sure they didn’t know they were being followed. Also, Blacknail wasn’t sure what to do with them when he caught them. They still outnumbered him, and Malthus was apparently a much better swordsman than he was a bodyguard.

So the hobgoblin kept his head down and used the angle of the roof to hide himself from sight. When the remaining pair of assassins reached the end of the roof they disappeared. Blacknail scurried over and saw them on the ground below him, he also saw the rope they had used to get there. As he watched they ran across the dark city street and into an alley.

Blacknail slid down the rope and hurried after them. He couldn’t see them, but he could still hear their heavy footsteps and follow their scent.

His quarry twisted and weaved their way through the city as they tried to lose any possible pursuit. Blacknail found it highly amusing. All their efforts were utterly pointless against him; he followed after them though the alleys and back ways of the city without any problem.

Soon, Blacknail arrived in a familiar part of town. The trail of the assassins who had tried to kill Herad led up to the front entrance of a large colorful building that the hobgoblin didn’t immediately recognize, because he hadn’t really looked at it from the front before. It was the place he’d met Luphera.

A suspicious growl escaped from Blacknail’s lips, as he stood at the opening of a nearby alleyway. The darkness of night hid him as he glared at the building, and considered this new development.

Was Luphera involved in the attack on Herad? It wasn’t impossible, she had bragged about having minions and connections. The idea upset Blacknail for some reason. He wasn’t sure why though; it wasn’t like they were of the same tribe, and he didn’t really even know much about her. In fact, she was very unsettling to be around.

What should he do now? Could he just return to Herad and tell her where the assassins had gone? Did she expect him to kill them before returning? He probably could head back now without being punished, but Blacknail realized he didn’t want to. He wanted to know exactly what was going on, and whether Luphera was involved.

Yes, perhaps it was time to be a little more… aggressive with the woman. He had let her weird perfume and behavior put him off guard before, but now he was done being on the defensive.

He would find her and get answers, but this time there would be no stupid games. He would simply take what he wanted, no matter who he had to kill. 












Att 7







Blacknail growled as he made his way around the building and towards the back exit. The way was familiar and he’d been here enough times now that he wasn’t really paying attention, and thus he almost walked right into a pair of guards.

He heard them coming only seconds before they turned the corner. Startled, Blacknail immediately ducked behind a large barrel of rainwater and out of sight. A man and a woman with sheathed swords and leather armor then stepped into view, and headed his way.

Blacknail’s stomach twisted as he watched them from concealment. He wasn’t in a very good hiding spot, and if the two thugs got too close or walked behind the barrel they would see him. He cursed himself for not paying attention.

The hobgoblin held his breath as the two humans walked right by him. One of the pair suddenly stopped walking, and threw a look backwards at the barrel. She stared at it for a few seconds, and frowned when she didn’t see anything out of the ordinary.

“What are you doing?” her partner asked.

“Nothing, I just thought I heard something, but there’s nothing there,” she replied before turning back around and walking away.

“This is Daggerpoint, if you jump at every shadow you’ll be spending the entire day on your toes,” the man remarked.

“Maybe, but that just means it’s also one of the places where you’re most likely to get a knife in your back,” she replied, before they both turned the corner and disappeared again.

Blacknail sighed with relief as soon as they were gone. When the humans had passed him by, and he’d become exposed, he’d instinctively crept around to the other side of the barrel and back out of sight. His instincts had served him well, but then again they almost always did.

The hobgoblin stood back up and then continued on his way. He still burned with anger, but now he was struggling to keep it contained. Nothing good ever came from letting his fury loose.

He prowled through the alley and towards Luphera’s window. When he got to corner that overlooked the passage behind the building he stopped and peered stealthily around it.

The sun was now starting to rise. The tips of its rays had just begun to shine over the grungy buildings of the city. This gave Blacknail a very good view of the two guards that were standing by the back entrance of his destination.

Both of them were large armed men with purple vests, and one of them had placed a lit lantern on top of a nearby crate. The windows of the building behind them also shed light out on the back street. None of the sources of illumination were that strong, so together they cast a confusing maze of shadows onto the dirty cobblestones and mud of the alley.

Blacknail studied the guards from the mouth of the alley. Why were there all these guards around suddenly? There had never been so many before. Were they expecting him?

It didn’t matter though. There was no way he was going to let a few stupid humans stop him. He would get the answers he wanted. He didn’t know why he felt so driven to question Luphera, and he didn’t really care.

The hobgoblin glared at the guards furiously for several seconds, and then several more. Okay, he had no idea how he was going to actually get past them…

There were a lot of shadows to work with, but it would still be difficult to sneak past them up into a window. No, he’d have to get rid of them somehow. How would he do it though?

He could sneak up to them and try to take them out quickly before they could raise the alarm, but that would be risky even with Elixir. A distraction might work, if he could come up with a good enough one.

He didn’t feel like sneaking around anymore, though. He was angry and wanted to hurt someone, and these men were undoubtedly connected to the assassins that had awakened him in the middle of the night! He really liked sleeping on his bed.

So he would use a distraction, and then attack them! Why do one when you could do both? Even so early in the morning Daggerpoint was never a quiet city, so a little noise ought to be fine.

The hobgoblin waited until the men were looking the other way then made his move. He stalked silently out of the alley and through the shadows. He kept the cool stone wall at his back until he reached an empty wheelbarrow someone had left at the side of the street. He ducked down behind it and carefully prepped his sling.

Blacknail then took out his vial of Elixir, lifted his mask, and gulped it down. Ugh, it still tasted like dirt, but he was going to need every bit of speed he could muster. When he was sure no one was looking again he gently lobbed a stone from his pouch down the street, so that it clattered against a wall on the other side of the guards.

“What was that?” one of them asked, as he took a step closer to the noise to get a better view.

“Probably a rat, they get pretty big here,” the other man replied without concern.

That was when the second stone from Blacknail’s sling took him in the back of the head. The thug immediately crumpled as a muffled cracking echoed through the alley. His companion jumped and began to turn back around, but Blacknail had already sprung out of hiding.

With savage ferocity he descended on the man, and Elixir burned through his flesh and bone as he leaped. With inhuman speed the hobgoblin’s blade slashed through the air and sliced into the man’s unprotected neck. The guard barely had time to gasp, before he was dead on his feet. Then he crumpled and hit the ground.

Blacknail froze and scanned the windows around him for any sign that he’d been seen or heard. When he didn’t see anything he switched to focusing on listening. A few streets away a horse neighed, and the pounding of footsteps and creak of wheels came from everywhere. None of that was unusual though, so it didn’t sound like he’d alerted anyone.

The hobgoblin then crouched down over the body of the man he’d hit with his sling, and listened for any signs of breathing. Nope, nothing; the human was dead. Blacknail grabbed the corpse’s feet and dragged it out of sight behind a pile of wood. He was breathing slightly harder when he went to get the other body.

“Stupid fat city humans, they should-ss get outside more,” Blacknail muttered as he strained to move the second corpse. The people of Daggerpoint were even more bloated than normal humans.

When that was done, he scowled at the blood trail he’d left in the dirt. A few seconds later he shrugged and turned to look up at Luphera’s window. It probably wouldn’t matter; most humans were blind and couldn’t smell at all anyway. Why did they even have noses?

Quickly, Blacknail began climbing up the stone work and wooden struts until he reached the opening on the second floor. He didn’t have a lot of time. He wasn’t stupid enough to believe that even humans wouldn’t eventually find the bodies; soon the guards he’d taken out would be missed.

Blacknail reached the window and peeked over the windowsill. He didn’t see anyone there so he pulled himself up and crawled inside. The bedroom was basically the same as before. The furniture was still lavish and comfortable looking, but only the faintest hint of the incense remained in the air.

Blacknail remembered his first visit here, so the first thing he did was double check the bed to make sure no one was hidden among the sheet, and then just to be sure he looked under the bed as well. There was no one in either of those spots, so Blacknail relaxed.

After taking a second to scratch an itch, he then turned towards the room’s only door and headed carefully over to it. As he approached someone on the other side spoke up.

“Are you sure you don’t want anything to drink? I have both wine and tea?” Luphera asked someone.

Blacknail’s ears perked up as he recognized her voice, and his heart beat a little faster. His prey was close. The only reply to Luphera’s question however, was a disdainful grunt from someone with a deep masculine voice.

“What, do you think I’ve poisoned it or something?” she chuckled at the unseen man.

“I’m not one of your clients, Luphera. I’m here to keep a watch on you until all this is over with, not fraternize,” the unseen man responded in a rather unfriendly tone.

Blacknail stalked silently over to the door, and very carefully pulled it open ever so slightly. He then peered through the tiny crack into the room on the other side.

Luphera was seated on a lavish purple couch, and wearing a delicate white dress. She had a bored look on her face as she regarded the only other person in the room.

A large man stood by the far door, with his arms crossed in front of him. Blacknail instantly pegged him as a companion to the men he’d followed here. He was dressed the same, but looked a bit different than any of the attackers. His eyes were narrowed as he glared hostilely at Luphera.

“Is that what I do, fraternize?” Luphera asked with obvious amusement.

“No, what you are is a whore and a gossip monger,” the man told her coldly.

“And you’re an easily replaced murderer, so I wouldn’t be so quick to judge another’s profession,” she replied coolly.

Blacknail eyed the two humans as they glared at each other. He was fairly sure these two weren’t friends. He wasn’t the best reader of human tone and body language, but he was fairly confident about this. Of course, that didn’t mean Luphera wasn’t involved in the attack.

“What I am is loyal, unlike you, and our master knows it,” the man countered.

“I’m not loyal? You’d think that after all these years of service Najget would trust me more. He certainly values my services,” Luphera mused.

She then turned away from the man for a second and looked around the room. To Blacknail it almost seemed like her gaze stopped on him as it passed by the door, but that was impossible. He was much too sneaky to be discovered.

“Silence, whore. You’re not supposed to use the guild master’s name, ever,” the assassin growled angrily.

“You and the master are far too fond of your little drama. As if there’s anyone around to hear it but us,” she replied condescendingly as she turned back towards him and rolled her eyes.

Blacknail heard it; he grinned happily from behind the door. He’d just discovered a secret! He had no idea what a guild master was, but he was sure it was important. A secret name sounded very… sharp. Maybe, he should make one up for himself, like Sneaky Death Killer!

“Shut your mouth, I’m through getting lip from you. If you speak to me again then you’ll regret it, no matter how useful you are to the master,” the man snarled furiously.

“You would very much regret raising your hand against me,” Luphera replied coldly with more than a hint of condescension.

“I guess we’re going to find out,” the assassin growled, as he raised a fist and stepped towards her.

Blacknail wasn’t sure what was going on here, so he considered his options. He had a limited amount of time, so he should use any opportunities that came up. He also had to make sure he could act without raising the alarm, though.

He tried to remain detached, but his snarl grew tighter as he watched the man march across the room towards the woman. For some reason he felt protective of Luphera, and he didn’t know why. It wasn’t like they were of the same tribe. He supposed that he just liked talking to her, or maybe her perfume was rotting his brain.

It wasn’t because he… liked her, though. Blacknail shuddered. She was just another fat pink human woman.

“What, you’re just going to hit a defenseless woman, Farghus?” Luphera sneered.

“And I’m going to enjoy it,” the man replied.

The big brute loomed over the woman as he approached. Luphera didn’t react to him, except to deepen her scornful scowl. She did however flinch and shield her face when he swung his heavy fist down at her.

There was a cracking noise and a crash as Luphera was sent sprawling onto the floor. However, she didn’t scream or even moan in pain. She just pushed herself up and stared back up at the man with eyes that burned with dark fury.

Her dress had slipped off her left shoulder as she’d fallen, and also slid up to reveal her long slender legs. Blacknail found himself staring at them, and quickly looked up. This meant he met her eyes though, and the controlled fury within them tugged at something primal inside him.

“That was stupid,” Luphera spat angrily, as she cradled her sore arm.

“Why, you going to do something about it?” the man laughed.

“No, I’m not going to do anything about it. I don’t need to,” Luphera replied icily, and louder than she had to.

Rage and the dark instincts of a predator guided Blacknail’s silent steps, as he stalked forward with murderous intent. Luphera’s assailant never knew what hit him.

One second he was sneering down at Luphera, the next Blacknail’s hand was wrapped around his mouth and chin, as the hobgoblin’s other hand pushed a dagger up under his ribs where it tore his insides apart. Then Blacknail started twisting the knife, because he enjoyed the feeling of it.

The man choked and blood bubbled out of his mouth as his body’s strength drained away. He couldn’t say anything or scream for help though, because Blacknail held his mouth closed. He tried to reach up and free himself from the hobgoblin’s grip, but he was already too weak to do anything but struggle futilely.

“Shhhh, no talking please. I’m trying to be quiet,” Blacknail whispered into his ear.

Blood poured from the gash in the man’s side, and seconds later he collapsed. There was already enough blood on the floor that there was a wet smacking noise as he hit the carpet beneath him.

Calmly, Luphera got to her feet and gave Blacknail a polite nod of greeting.

“You’ve completely ruined that rug,” she told Blacknail, as she fixed her dress.

Blacknail just stared silently at her menacingly… because he had no idea how to respond to that.

“Well, I guess I shouldn’t complain. I was hoping you’d drop by tonight after all. That’s a lovely new mask by the way,” she told him.

“Thank you,” Blacknail replied stiffly.

He had no idea what was going on here. Was Luphera friend or foe? He hadn’t really attacked the man to save her, but rather because he’d sensed weakness and an opportunity. He decided just to ask her, since he was here to get answers from her after all.

“Who was he, what’s going-ss on here? Also what do you know about the men who attacked Mistress Herad?” the hobgoblin hissed at her menacingly.

Luphera didn’t seem scared though. One of her eyebrows rose, as she considered him for a second.

“That was one of Najget’s hired assassins. He’s the owner of this establishment, and several others like it. He’s also the one who sent those men after Herad. He uses this place to collect information, and I’m one of the best brokers in the city. I despise the man though, and will gladly help you kill him,” Luphera explained.

Blacknail stared at her blankly for several seconds. That had been really frank… he had kind of been expecting to have to play some sort of game or trick the information out of her.

“Why would he challenge Herad?” Blacknail asked suspiciously.

He’d never heard of the man before, and Herad was rather vocal about her enemies and what she wanted to do about them. So, why would he try and pick a fight with her? That sounded like a great way to get killed.

There was also something about Luphera's posture and tone that bugged him. He thought he detected some hostility from her, which didn't make sense. Why would she be angry at Blacknail? Hadn't he just saved her?

“He wasn’t challenging her, and the attack wasn’t entirely his idea. Lately, he’s become a little paranoid about the loyalty of some of the employees, so he’s been hiring men from the Dark Guild. They pretty much own him now, and since Zelena bought them out that means she controls him,” Luphera explained.

Blacknail had definitely heard of Zelena. Herad had made her opinion on the other woman really obvious quite a few times. Blacknail didn’t know where she would get that many burning needles though…

Blacknail shook his head to clear it and looked back up at Luphera. He wasn’t quite sure what was going on here, but it seemed like this Najget worked for Zelena. That meant he was an enemy, and thus Blacknail should probably kill him. It's what his mistress would want him to do.

“I see, so…” the hobgoblin began to ask, before Luphera cut him off.

‘…so, you need to go downstairs and kill Najget. He usually stays hidden in various hideouts across the city that even I don’t know about, but right now he’s here and vulnerable,” Luphera told him.

Blacknail was caught off guard again. He didn’t like being told what to do, but that did sound about right…

“This may be your only chance to get him. He has a few guards, but I’m sure Herad’s faceless assassin won’t have a problem getting past them. You have quite the reputation after all,” she told him appreciatively, as she met the masked hobgoblin’s eyes and smiled charmingly.

Blacknail found himself standing a little taller, and grinning happily. Obviously, he'd been imagining any hostility from her.  He was a great killer, and this probably was the right thing to do… 











ATT 8









Luphera fluttered her eyelashes as Blacknail considered his options. He did really feel like killing someone. He was also very good at it, so he could probably murder Najget without any real difficulty. The feat would also certainly impress Luphera…

Wait, what was he thinking? Why would he want to impress her anyway? She was just a human woman, not a prospective mate, and she wasn’t even of his tribe! Not that he trusted everyone in Herad’s tribe though. Some of them weren’t nearly as dependable as him.

The hobgoblin’s confident look turned to one of suspicion as he met Luphera’s gaze. He didn’t even know if Najget was a real person.

“How do I know you’re telling the truth?” he asked her doubtfully.

“Well, I haven’t raised the alarm,” she pointed out, with a friendly smile.

It was a nice smile… No, he had to concentrate. There might not be a lot of the perfume from before in the air, but there was still a lingering trace of it, and that was apparently enough to mess with his head.

“Yes, but if you were noisy I would have stabbed you,” Blacknail countered.

“Oh, stop being so paranoid, Blacknail. Haven’t I always helped you out? Now, I just need you to do one small thing for me, kill Najget. It’s what you should be doing anyway!” she exclaimed assertively.

“Maybe,” Blacknail mused. It did sound like fun, but Saeter had once told Blacknail that paranoia was the only thing that kept you alive. His master was also really old, so he probably knew what he was talking about.

Even if Luphera wasn’t outright lying, she still might be playing down the danger involved. There were an awful lot of guards around, and Blacknail didn’t even know where Najget was, or what he smelled like.

Luphera moved closer and leaned against his shoulder, and her body was surprisingly soft. As the hobgoblin watched her warily, she gave him a pleading look.

“I would be ever so grateful for your help, and I’m sure we can work out some sort of reward. I’ve heard some very interesting rumors about what’s under that mask, and look forward to finding out if they’re right. I hope they are; it would be a novel experience, even for me,” Luphera told him seductively, as she gently dragged one of her fingers down his arm.

Blacknail immediately took a step back away from her. He didn’t like the hungry look in her eyes; he wasn’t used to being on the receiving end of an expression like that. The sudden mad beating of his heart also unnerved him, it hadn’t been caused by fear.

“You’re so shy. Not at all what one would expect from your reputation,” Luphera purred as she took another step after him.

“I still don’t trust you” Blacknail replied as he hastily backed away again.

Instinctively, the hobgoblin glanced around the room for something to hide behind, even though he knew it would be pointless and stupid. Luphera’s attention was becoming more than a little uncomfortable.

He didn’t know what to say to her, or even what to think. He just knew he wanted out of the room. He had no reason to put himself at risk to kill someone right now.

“Maybe later, I have-ss to get back,” he muttered, as he turned away from Luphera and her unsettling eyes.

“Please Blacknail, I need your help,” the woman pleaded.

Blacknail ignored her, and immediately fled towards the window he’d used to enter the building. Once outside the fresh air would clear his head. Before he could get more than a few feet though, he heard a commotion from outside the window.

The sudden sound of several people shouting filled the air. Someone was raising the alarm! They must have discovered the bodies.

“Shit,” Blacknail hissed.

Almost immediately, he heard heavy footsteps from below as people from the building flooded out into the street. There were at least a dozen of them, and there was no way Blacknail could escape that way anymore. He’d let himself grow distracted, and had talked to Luphera for far too long!

“You were followed!” someone shouted angrily from outside.

“Impossible, I took precautions. No one could have followed us back here,” a familiar voice replied. It belonged to one of the assassins he’d followed here.

“So I suppose these two corpses by the door are just a coincidence?” the other person replied sarcastically.

“That doesn’t matter now. Someone’s here, but he won’t be leaving in one piece. I want people watching every possible exit until we catch him,” a third man added.

Luphera walked up beside the frozen hobgoblin.

“It seems like you left a mess out there when you came in, and now you’ll have to find a different way out if you want to leave,” she told him.

“Yes,” Blacknail grunted unhappily. He was fairly sure he detected a hint of smugness in her voice.

“I suggest heading out into the hall and taking a left. There’s a window in that room you might be able to escape out of. I wouldn’t say it’s very likely though,” she told him.

Blacknail knew that tone of voice. It was one human’s used when they thought they were so smart, but they rarely were.

“What’s your plan?” he asked her sullenly. It was probably going to be terrible.

“Well, if Najget were to suddenly die, then I’m sure I could take control of the situation. Then you could just hide somewhere, while I have the house guards kindly ask the assassins to leave,” Luphera suggested.

The hobgoblin thought it over. Apparently, Luphera was actually that smart because her plan might actually work. Most of the humans inside the building seemed to be heading outside and forming a perimeter to stop him from leaving, which also meant picking a window and trying to make a run for it was probably a bad idea.

“Fine, I’ll kill the man for you,” Blacknail sighed reluctantly.

“You might want to get going then, time isn’t on your side,” Luphera pointed out.

Blacknail nodded and quickly headed for the door that led deeper into the structure. He was more than happy to get away from Luphera for now.

“Najget is the old man in purple with the moustache, and try not to kill anyone but him and the assassins,” Luphera called after him.

Blacknail grunted vaguely in reply. He didn’t think he was going to have much choice but to kill anyone that got in his way if he wanted to survive this mess.

The hobgoblin quickly shut the door behind him, as he stepped into the empty hallway on the other side. Once out there, he took a second to listen to the surroundings.

He heard floorboards creek as people moved all around him. To his left was a door and a heavier human, who had a sword hilt slapping against his thigh as he walked, was about to walk through it.

The hobgoblin didn’t have the time or the patience to do this quietly. He was going to have to do this fast and brutal.

Blacknail swiftly pulled out the vial of Elixir and gulped the rest of it down. Then, he stepped to the side of the door and drew his blade. When the door swung open and another assassin stepped out, Blacknail was out of his line of sight.

Then before the man even noticed the hobgoblin’s presence, Blacknail stepped into view and slashed savagely down at the man’s head. The man’s eyes widened in the split second he had before Blacknail’s sword smashed into the side of his head.

There was a wet crunch and the man collapsed into a bloody heap on the floor. Blacknail pulled his blade out of the man’s skull, and then stepped over the man’s corpse and continued on his way. This wouldn’t be the last human he killed before the night was over, and he couldn’t afford to waste any time.

As he passed by the open doorway, he saw the window that Luphera had mentioned as a possible escape route. Briefly, he considered abandoning the plan and just jumping out of it, but then he sighed and quickly reconsidered. There would be people watching all the exits, including that window.

So he reluctantly kept going and picked up speed as he dashed towards the stairs at the end of hallway. Now was not the time for stealth. The sound of people getting up and moving towards him could be heard from many of the adjacent rooms, and he planned to be long gone before they showed up.

Just before he reached the stairs something creaked slightly from below, like there was someone climbing the stairs. Blacknail smiled and instead of slowing he sped up. As he turned the corner and began to rapidly descend the stairs, he caught sight of a purple vested guard with a drawn club.

Blacknail’s downwards charge surprised the man, and the guard flinched and froze for a split second. That was all the time Blacknail needed. Instead of drawing his weapon or slowing down, the hobgoblin simply leaped towards the man and kneed him in the face.

There was a muted crack as the two individuals collided. The purple vested guard's head snapped back, and he began to tip over backwards. Blacknail didn’t really feel like trying to roll down the rest of the stairs, that sounded very painful, so he grabbed the man’s shirt and fell on top of him.

The man’s back hit the stairs, and then repeated thuds were heard as he started to slide down the steps. Blacknail still had a tight grip on the guard’s shirt and was perched on his chest. It was bumpy going but he managed to ride his opponent safely down, until they hit the wall at the bottom and stopped.

Blacknail then hurriedly got to his feet. His opponent seemed to be unconscious, or dead. Sometimes it was hard to tell. The hobgoblin had effectively taken him out and done it quickly, but unfortunately it had been far from sneaky.

He had already attracted a lot of attention. Blacknail could already hear people heading towards him. He looked up from the unconscious man to see he was in another hallway. It was empty except for one shocked looking woman standing at a doorway.

A second later the woman gasped in shock, threw herself out of the hallway, and then slammed the door behind her. Blacknail was more than happy to let her go. He had enough problems with human women right now, and had to find his target.

He just wished he knew what Najget’s voice sounded like, so he could track him that way. All he could do now was head towards anyone that sounded like an old human male, and Blacknail thought there was a good chance of there being more than one of those here.

Quickly, the hobgoblin got up and dashed down the hallway. Where had Luphera said to go? Oh right, Najget was supposed to be past the last door to the left.

As the hobgoblin raced down the hallway one of the doors in front of him swung open. A second later another of the purple vested guards stepped out and turned to face Blacknail. He was right in the hobgoblin’s way.

This guard also had a club and he swung it at the hobgoblin. Blacknail ducked under the weapon and then shoved his attacker aside as he raced past. There was no point in sticking around to fight.

Before the guard could pick himself up, the hobgoblin had reached the door and thrown it open. Blacknail then stepped through into a large sitting room that was lit by several brass lanterns that hung from the ceiling.

Heavy bookshelves lined the walls, except for where two large windows and another door were set on the opposite side of the room. Tasteful chairs had been placed around several large round tables, and there were several comfortable looking couches as well. Fancy red curtains framed the windows, and there were a few scattered books lying out on the tables.

There was however no one that looked even remotely like a Najget. The room wasn’t empty though, there were two assassins in it, and one of them looked really familiar. Blacknail groaned in frustration. He didn’t like this turn of events at all, but at least there were windows he could jump out of.

“At last we meet, Faceless One! I’ve been looking forward to this for awhile now. You’ve been making me look bad, but that ends today… because I’m going to kill you,” Malthus shouted triumphantly, from the center of the room.

Blacknail rolled his eyes. Here was another stupid human that liked to say the obvious. The hobgoblin just wished the man wasn’t also a much better swordsman than him.

Malthus and his companion drew their blades and headed for Blacknail. Both of them were still dressed in their dark leather armor and cloaks, but they had removed their face masks and dropped their hoods.

This was actually the first time Blacknail had gotten a good look at Malthus. The other times they’d been close the assassin had been cloaked and hooded or out of sight. He was a slightly taller than average man with a thin face and brown hair that was almost long enough to reach his eyes.

The hobgoblin watched the assassins approach and tried to come up with a new plan, one that didn’t involve getting sliced into tiny green bits. Fighting Malthus would be a really stupid thing to do, so he needed to get out of here.

He couldn’t go back the way he’d come though, and Malthus was blocking the way forward. So, some trickery seemed to be called for.

“We have met though, Malthus. I’ve seen-ss you around many times, you just haven’t seen me,” Blacknail shouted contemptuously.

Malthus’ face grew slightly more lined as he frowned at the hobgoblin, but he also slowed his advance. He appeared to be trying to come up with a good comeback. Blacknail grinned beneath his mask. It had worked; the man really liked to talk.

“Yes well, now you’re going to pay for being so arrogant as to think you could get past me twice. You were simply lucky the first time that Galive wouldn’t let me do my job properly,” the assassin replied.

“I wasn’t lucky, you’re deaf-ss and stupid. While you stood there by the door like a frog on a log-ss I was cutting Galive’s throat open and laughing-ss at you. Good thing Galive wasn’t paying you anything,” Blacknail countered viciously.

The hobgoblin and Malthus were slowly and cautiously approaching each other, but there were still several tables and couches between them. Blacknail began to circle a bit off to the side, while trying to look like he was just seeking a better position.

“I’ll restore my title as the city’s best Knifeman when I string your corpse up from the city gate. That’s what usually happens to assassins who operate in Daggerpoint without the Dark Guild’s permission,” Malthus shot back.

“No you won’t; I’m a far-ss better hunter and killer than you’ll-ss ever be. You’re just a soft and weak city man, but I come from the Deep Green and I’m Herad’s chosen killer!” Blacknail bragged.

The two assassins were fairly close now. Malthus scowled as he stepped around a couch. He seemed both annoyed and more than a bit confused by the hobgoblin’s words. Maybe Blacknail needed to talk slower so he could understand. A second later the assassin’s gaze focused on the hobgoblin’s mask.

“Let’s fight properly; face to face. Why hide behind a mask now? Let me see the visage of the man I’m about to kill. Only one of us is going to leave this room alive anyway,” the man proposed.

Blacknail snorted in amusement. That sounded so dumb. Weren’t assassin’s supposed to be sneaky?

“No, besides you’ve a got a friend there,” Blacknail replied scornfully, as he pointed to the other man beside Malthus.

The hobgoblin wasn’t in the habit of doing what his enemies told him. If Malthus wanted him to remove his mask then Blacknail intended to keep it on. The hobgoblin snuck a glance at the far door. Thanks to his maneuvering, Malthus and the other assassin were no longer directly between him and it.

“Don’t worry; he won’t interfere in our fight. He’ll just make sure you don’t attempt to run. I want to take care of you myself. My pride demands it,” Malthus replied.

Blacknail’s pride demanded that he never act as stupid as Malthus. The more the assassin talked the more convinced Blacknail became that he was an idiot.

“No, he can fight too. I brought friends of my own,” Blacknail said smugly, as he pointed at the window behind the assassins.

The pair looked startled for a second and quickly glanced towards the window and the new threat, but there was nothing there. Blacknail had been lying through his teeth.

While the two assassins were looking at the window, he quickly drew the sling and stone he’d been stealthily preparing as he talked to them. With lightning fast speed he whirled the stone and sent it flying towards Malthus’ companion. Blacknail was fast but the sound of the sling spinning through the air alerted the assassin, so he had just enough time to flinch.

The stone smashed into the assassin’s arm as he raised it to protect himself. Blacknail grunted in disappointment. He’d been hoping to do damage to somewhere more vital or for a fatal strike.

“Fuck,” the assassin roared in pain, as his blade dropped to the floor. He cradled his arm against his chest and hissed in pain.

“You vile bastard!” Malthus cursed, as he realized his companion was now out of the fight.

“I didn’t trust you. Now it really will be just you and me,” Blacknail said, as he shrugged without apparent concern.

The assassin’s face grew red with fury, and his grip on his sword tightened until his knuckles went white.

“You have a bloody sling? What kind of weapon is that for an assassin?” Malthus swore.

“It works, so it’s a great one,” Blacknail replied with an amused chuckle.

Malthus’ companion was still hopping around in pain and clutching his arm. He’d made no move to retrieve his sword.

“Fuck, this hurts! I think the bastard cracked my arm,” he told Malthus.

“Fine, go get medical attention. I don’t need you for this,” the other man replied.

“You sure?” the injured man asked.

“You can’t fight, so go!” Malthus hissed back angrily.

The injured assassin nodded and began stumbling away towards the far door. The hobgoblin and the remaining human were now only a dozen feet apart.

“I’m going to kill you for that!” Malthus told Blacknail, as he turned back to face him.

The assassin’s black cloak fluttered behind him, as he kicked the last chair between them out of his way. The enraged Vessel’s eyes gleamed with hatred, and the light from the bronze lanterns overhead reflected off the edge of his blade, as he charged the hobgoblin. 













ATT 9












 The hobgoblin quickly drew his sword. There were no more obstacles between Blacknail and the skilled assassin he’d just pissed off, only a small section of floor. Blacknail really wished he’d had time to dig a pit or set up a snare trap there. That would have made his survival much more likely.
All of a sudden Malthus lunged across the distance separating them and stabbed towards the hobgoblin’s chest. Blacknail side stepped the attack and then countered with a quick downwards slash of his own.

The assassin easily knocked the hobgoblin’s attack aside and then launched a flurry of attacks at Blacknail. The hobgoblin hissed in frustration as he blocked and weaved his way around the strikes. Blades flashed and cloaks swirled as the two combatants fought.

Blacknail knew he was in trouble. He was already having a hard time defending himself, and Malthus was obviously just testing Blacknail. He’d seen the assassin move much faster and more skillfully when he’d fought Herad. The difference in ability and experience between them was just too great.

Blacknail jumped backward to avoid a lightning fast slash aimed at his chest, and quickly readied himself for the next blow. It never came though; his opponent relaxed his guard instead of following after him. Malthus grinned at the hobgoblin while Blacknail watched him warily.

“Good, you’re only a passable swordsman, but at least you’re a Vessel. There’s no other way you could have kept up with me just now. I was worried this was going to be too easy, but this might be somewhat entertaining after all,” Malthus arrogantly remarked, as he showed off by flourishing his sword through the air.

Blacknail rolled his eyes in exasperation. Who was the human trying to impress?

“If you want-ss a hard fight, why don’t you go fight-ss Herad? Oh wait, you did! You fought-ss my mistress, and then you ran away like a rat from a cat,” Blacknail laughed viciously.

“I’m going to kill you,” Malthus hissed angrily in reply.

“You already said-ss that, idiot,” Blacknail pointed out, as he started circling around to place a table between them.

Seriously, what was with humans and repeating themselves? It was annoying.

“Enough games,” the assassin roared as he lost his temper and charged.

Blacknail jumped aside, so that the large wooden table was between them. Malthus didn’t slow down though. The assassin jumped right onto the tabletop and lunged across it as he tried to catch the hobgoblin.

The man was fast; Blacknail had to give him that. Of course he was a Vessel, so he was cheating more than a little. Fortunately, the hobgoblin had just taken some Elixir as well.

As the assassin was sailing over the table towards him, Blacknail dove under it and rolled safely away. If there was one thing that being beaten up by Herad had taught him, it was how to burn the Elixir within himself to avoid attacks by really fast humans.

“But I like-ss games,” the hobgoblin laughed, as he rolled to his feet on the other side of the table.

He could feel the Elixir flowing through his body and energizing his muscles. It tickled the inside of his skin.

The assassin’s face was twisted into a snarl as he stared across the table at Blacknail. He started walking around it towards the hobgoblin, but Blacknail started moving as well.

After several seconds of following him around the table Malthus tried switching directions, but Blacknail instantly switched too.

Malthus grabbed the table and flipped it on its side, then snarled in rage as he charged again. Blacknail ducked into the blind spot created by the table’s top, and then dashed away. When Malthus cleared the obstacle, the hobgoblin was gone and standing several feet away on the other end of another table.

Malthus ground his teeth together and his face went scarlet red. The tip of the sword he was holding shivered as he shook with rage.

“Fight me fair, you coward” the assassin yelled at Blacknail.

“No,” Blacknail hissed back.

“You are not amusing!” Malthus growled as he walked over to the table and stared hard at the hobgoblin from directly across it.

“Yes, I am,” Blacknail replied as he pushed the table forward and slammed it into Malthus’ gut.

“Ugh, hells and damnations,” the assassin wheezed painfully, before wincing and taking a step back to steady himself.

Blacknail couldn’t help himself, he began to chuckle. That had looked like it had hurt.

“Bloody bastard, you are going to pay for that,” Malthus growled as he straightened back up.

The assassin then quickly reached into a coat pocket with one hand and pulled out a vial. He pulled the cork out with his teeth and then drained the contents. He didn't lower his guard though, because his other hand kept his short sword pointed at the hobgoblin.

Blacknail felt his earlier levity drain away. There was no mistaking the contents of the vial; it was Elixir.

Malthus hurled the glass container aside and then wiped his mouth with the sleeve of his free hand. The assassin glared at the hobgoblin, as he gripped his sword with both hands and raised it over his head. Then he kicked the table forward.

The move caught Blacknail by surprise, but he managed to push off of the edge of the tabletop with one hand and slide backwards without being hit. Unfortunately, that was when the surface he was leaning on exploded; Malthus had brought his sword down and cleaved right through it with all of his strength.

Blacknail’s support was pulled out from under him as the wooden surface collapsed. He stumbled unsteadily for a second, and that was all Malthus needed. He charged through the wooden wreckage, and backhanded Blacknail across the face.

The hobgoblin’s mask absorbed some of the blow, but not all of it. He grunted as pain shot through his jaw and up into his teeth. He tasted blood as he staggered sideways. There was a second of blackness, and the next thing Blacknail knew he was laying down and the hard floor was pressed against his back.

He groaned in pain as he tried to clear his head. Where was he again, and why did he have such a terrible headache? He hadn’t drank any of that human poison they called ale, had he?

Blacknail was gripping something tightly with one hand. It felt like a sword hilt. Why was he holding a sword as he slept? That seemed kind of silly.

The sound of footsteps approaching penetrated his agony, and Blacknail swiftly looked over towards the source of the noise. It was a pair of black boots, and they looked really fancy and tight…

What kind of moron wore boots like that? Wait a second… it was Malthus! This wasn’t good. Blacknail rolled aside just in time. There was a heavy thud as a blade bit into the wooden floor boards that had been under his head a second ago.

Blacknail jumped back onto his feet, as Malthus raised his sword again and descended upon him. The assassin’s blade sliced towards Blacknail’s head, but the hobgoblin stepped out of the way. Their eyes met and they exchanged hateful glares for a second.

“That was very satisfying,” Malthus said as he grinned viscously.

“I’m still alive,” Blacknail replied.

“Not for long. You can’t run from me,” the assassin remarked grimly.

Blacknail begged to differ; Malthus’ anger and confidence was making his attacks easy to predict.

This wasn’t actually going so badly, other than that blow to the head he’d just taken. That had hurt a lot. All Blacknail had to do was keep dodging, and Malthus would eventually make a mistake. Then the hobgoblin could make a run for it.

“You can’t catch me,” Blacknail respond confidently.

“I don’t have to, you little bastard. You’re stuck here, and I’ll soon have reinforcements,” the assassin pointed out.

Oh, right; Blacknail scowled behind his mask, as he realized the man had a very good point. Should he just attack the assassin while he was off guard? He didn’t seem to have any other choice.
“Fine, it’s a challenge,” Blacknail replied coldly, before raising his blade and stepping forward.

Malthus smiled eagerly and raised his own blade. Their gazes met and the two swordsmen locked eyes as they closed in on each other.

That was when the hobgoblin grabbed a nearby chair and whipped it at his opponent. There was no bloody way he was going to fight Malthus fair. Blacknail still remembered seeing the assassin fight Herad, and he knew he was out matched.

There was a grunt of effort from Malthus as he knocked the chair out of the air. Blacknail threw himself forward and tried to skewer the human while his sword was out of position.

Blacknail was focused on Malthus’ eyes, and that gave him a hint of a warning. Something was wrong; the assassin’s eyes gleamed with confidence. Why would they do that? The hobgoblin hesitated in his attack right before he committed himself.

While the chair still partly blocked Blacknail’s view, Malthus’ left hand blurred and something shot towards the hobgoblin. Blacknail instinctively ducked, as a throwing dagger ripped through the air where his head had been less than a second ago.

Blacknail jumped back and raised his sword up into a guard. He stared grimly at his opponent as he reevaluated him. Malthus was much sneakier than he pretended to be. Blacknail was almost impressed.

As the hobgoblin watched, the angry expression slid off the assassin’s face. Malthus then grinned cheerfully and gave Blacknail a respectful nod.

“You missed,” the hobgoblin told him.

“Yes, I did. I honestly thought I had you there though. I spent a fair bit of time and effort setting that trick up, so what gave me away?” Malthus asked Blacknail.

Blacknail ignored his question and just stared at his transformed opponent. The man didn’t seem angry at all anymore. Had he been acting? Why?

“You like games too,” Blacknail replied accusingly.

“Ha, yes. You’ve got me here. I’m a Knifeman not a paladin. Did you really think a man with a reputation such as mine could be such a straightforward fool?”

The answer to that had been yes.

“Why-ss the act?” Blacknail asked suspiciously. He really didn’t like this turn of events.

The black cloaked assassin grinned and shrugged.

“It was fun; there’s nothing I like more than a battle of wits. Locking blades pales in comparison to matching minds. We’re assassins, so a duel between us should be about trickery and wits, not straight forward swordplay. Where would the fun be in just cutting you down without first proving myself superior?” Malthus explained.

“You didn’t look like you were having fun,” Blacknail pointed out.

“Oh, but I was. It was a very interesting fight, and besides I wanted to figure you out before I killed you. However, I must admit that I still have no idea who you are. You’re a very… odd man,” the assassin replied as he titled his head to the side and gave Blacknail an inquisitive look.

The hobgoblin chuckled in response. Apparently, Malthus wasn’t the only good actor here. In fact Blacknail was obviously by far the better actor; he was pretending to be a completely different species.

“Wrong, you’re very wrong,” he replied cheerfully.

The assassin frowned when Blacknail spoke, and he looked him over again.

“I don’t care what you say, you’re not a woman,” he remarked.

Blacknail laughed again. If it was the assassin’s curiosity that was keeping him from attacking then Blacknail was going to give him a mystery. Malthus had been a dangerous opponent even when he’d been acting like an idiot.

“No, not a woman, not a man, nor a child pink of flesh,” the hobgoblin sang out tauntingly.

“But you can’t deny being weird,” Malthus replied as his eyes narrowed and he continued to look Blacknail over. He appeared to be deep in thought.

“Fine, you win. I have no idea what you’re talking about, but I should probably stop letting you stall. I can always figure it out after I’ve killed you and stripped that mask off your face,” the assassin told Blacknail a few seconds later, as he brought his blade back up and stepped towards him.

The hobgoblin had much preferred it when the man had acted like an idiot. He needed a new plan, and he was running out of time. He had to somehow escape, and do it without getting a knife in his back.

Just then, there was a creaking noise as the door behind Malthus opened. Both the combatants slowed as they waited to see who was about to enter the room.

“Horse stink,” Blacknail cursed, as three more assassins entered the room.

The black cloaked figures swiftly started fanning out in an attempt to surround him. It wouldn’t take them very long to navigate through the furniture that filled the library.

“This is still a one on one fight,” the hobgoblin remarked.

“And it will still be one, as long as you don’t try to run,” Malthus replied.

Yep, that was what Blacknail had expected. It was time to leave. He didn’t really have anywhere to go, but he couldn’t stay here. He had a plan, but it was terrible, and was most likely going to get him killed. If he stayed here though, he was definitely going to die.

“Surround the intruder but don’t interfere,” Malthus yelled at his newly arrived companions.

Blacknail used this brief distraction to quickly grab another chair and throw it at Malthus. Before the assassin could responded with another knife Blacknail threw a stone from his pouch at him.

Instinctively, the assassin dodged it which ruined his throw. The knife sailed harmlessly across the room, and nowhere near Blacknail. The hobgoblin then wasted no time in making a mad dash for the nearest window. He sheathed his blade so he could concentrate on running.

Normally, Blacknail would have made a run for the windows earlier, but these ones were barred. Apparently, this Najget man didn’t want anyone accidentally walking off with any of his books, through a window.

The assassins behind him started shouting and chasing him as Blacknail raced towards the window, but there was no way a bunch of humans were going to catch up to him now that he had a head start.

Blacknail just really hoped he was going to fit through those bars. If he didn’t the last few moments of his life were going to be very embarrassing.

The hobgoblin ducked as something whizzed by his head, and then a knife ricocheted off the wall in front of him.

“Damn,” Malthus cursed from behind Blacknail. “I want you all to spread out and make sure he can’t double back. Those windows are barred so he can’t go out that way, but he might have a trick up his sleeve. He’s a cunning bastard.”

Good, the humans didn’t think he would be able to escape through the window, so they weren’t chasing him too quickly. He hoped they were wrong.

Blacknail was now only a few feet from the bars, and his feet were carrying him rapidly closer. He really didn’t like how close together they looked; it was going to be a tight fit. Swiftly the hobgoblin took off his mask and rearranged his pouches.

Before he hit the bars head first Blacknail grabbed them and pulled himself up. He then swung his legs and feet through first. They went through without a problem, but next came his chest. Blacknail felt his ribs compress painfully and push all the air from his lungs as they slid through the opening.

His mouth was forced open and he coughed as his breath burst from his mouth, and then it was his head’s turn. He turned his face sideways and tucked his chin into his shoulders he went through. At first it went smoothly and he thought he was alright, but then the back of his head smashed into one of the bars.

Momentum carried him through, but Blacknail collapsed bonelessly onto the ground outside. His eyes fluttered and he twitched as he lay in a twisted heap there.

“Hells, how the fuck did he manage that,” a surprised Malthus swore as the hobgoblin disappeared from his view.

Blacknail gave himself several seconds to recover and then picked himself up. He groaned and rubbed the back of his head until the shiny little stars had disappeared from his vision. He was very thankful that he wasn’t fat like a human, and that his bones were so bendy. They were supposed to be like that right?

Blacknail shook his head to clear it, and tried to focus. He was far from safe outside. Malthus and the other assassins couldn’t follow him, but the hobgoblin knew they had ordered most the men to watch the perimeter of the building, and that was where he was now.

The yard outside this part of the brothel wasn’t all that wide, and was bordered by a line of shrubs. The plants themselves were just there to conceal the dirty wall of the building next door. Really it was just a pretty alley.

There was nowhere for him to hide out here. Autumn had even stripped most of the leaves from the bushes. Most importantly, the hobgoblin could already hear footsteps approaching. What was he going to do now?

“There he is!” a large man yelled as he turned a corner and came into sight. Several other people were right behind him, and all of them were armed.

The hobgoblin hissed in aggravation as he saw enemies began to approach from the other side of the narrow yard as well. He was faced with walls on two sides and hostile humans on the other two.

He’d known that there would be lots of enemies outside, but had been hoping to spot an escape route through them. There wasn’t one though, and that left him with only one option.

Blacknail sprinted away from the window he’d just come out of, and then turned around and sprinted back towards it. Right before hitting the wall of the brothel he flared his Elixir and jumped as high as he could. His outstretched claws found purchase and he managed to catch hold of a second story windowsill. He had nowhere else to go but back into the brothel.

Blacknail smiled smugly as he pulled himself and began to climb up the wall. There was no way any of the big fat pink humans below would be able to follow him, so he was safe for a little while.

That was when a crossbow bolt slammed into the wood beside his head. The stunned hobgoblin stared wide-eyed at the vibrating projectile for a split second, before his gaze automatically turned towards the shooter. Below him a purple vested guardsman was reloading a crossbow, as other human thugs gathered around him.

“Damnation, you missed. Quick, reload; the slippery bastard is getting away,” one of them yelled.

"Uh-oh," Blacknail gasped in shock.

If that human hadn't had such terrible aim he could have just died! It was time to leave. With panic and Elixir lending him strength, Blacknail quickly flipped himself up and over the windowsill and back into the brothel. Hopefully his second trip inside today went a lot better than his first.













ATT 10








The cloaked hobgoblin found himself in another bedroom that was a smaller version of Luphera’s, and he wasn’t alone. A blonde woman in a lacy red shift was standing not too far from the window. She was deathly pale and staring at him in horror.

Blacknail slowly looked up and met her gaze. Her only reaction was a slight shiver; she seemed too scared to move. He had absolutely no interest in this woman, and she obviously wasn’t dangerous, so maybe he could just ignore her? The hobgoblin took one slow step forward.

Instantly, the blonde started screaming shrilly. The long high pitched sound ripped into Blacknail’s sensitive ears. He winced in pain, as a sharp ache developed in the back of his skull. Not only would the woman’s screams attract too much unwanted attention but it also was really annoying. He had to get her to stop.

“Shut up!” he yelled at her angrily.

She didn’t stop, and Blacknail groaned. This called for desperate measures. The hobgoblin took a step forward and grabbed the woman. He then drew his knife and waved it in front of her face.

“Quiet or I’ll stab-ss you!” he hissed in her ear.

Amazingly enough this actually caused her to scream louder, which Blacknail hadn’t thought possible. This human was too stupid and annoying to live. Why wouldn’t she just shut up!

The hobgoblin couldn’t take the noise any longer; something had to be done. He sheathed his knife, tightened his grip on the woman, and then pulled. A second later the woman was flying out the window, and much to the hobgoblin’s relief the screams finally stopped.

There was a thud and a grunt of pain from outside. Blacknail giggled in satisfaction and amusement. It sounded like she’d hit one of the men standing out there on the way down. Hopefully, it had been the crossbowman.

Blacknail knew he didn’t have a lot of time, so he hurriedly dashed out of the room and into another hallway. He’d lost his pursuit for now, but probably not for much longer. He needed to find this Najget man and kill him quickly. Then, hopefully all his problems would go away.

However, before Blacknail could even figure out which way to go he heard footsteps quickly approaching from both directions. He was cut off; there was nowhere to run.

“Cheese weevils,” Blacknail swore viciously.

He really should have just run back to Herad, instead of going to see Luphera. She was nothing but trouble, and lots of it. Especially her long legs…

Blacknail smacked himself along the side of his head to clear his thoughts. He couldn’t think of anything else to do, so he dashed up to a random door and silently opened the door a crack. Maybe he could find somewhere to hide until everyone stopped looking for him, or maybe Najget would walk by so Blacknail could kill him. That would certainly simplify things.

The hobgoblin peeked through the door and into the room on the other side. The chamber wasn’t empty; there were two women inside.

A scantily clad woman similar to the others Blacknail had run across was cowering behind a more muscular woman who was holding a sword. The swordswoman looked like she’d dressed in a hurry; she’d thrown on a jacket but wasn’t wearing a shirt beneath it.

Both of them were focused on the door, one in fear and the other with determination. Blacknail didn’t think it was a good idea to go in there, unless he wanted to get stabbed or screamed at again, so he hurriedly moved on to the next door.

The hobgoblin was unsurprised to discover that it led into another bedroom. This one was thankfully empty though, so Blacknail quickly slipped inside. Seconds later, he heard a large group of people stomp out into the hallway. Why did this place have so many beds? Did people come here just to sleep? That didn’t make much sense to him.

Other than the large four post bed with white hanging curtains, there were several other pieces of furniture in the room. A large heavy clothes drawer stood against one wall, and a small side table had been placed beside the bed. There was also a closet and another window, but Blacknail didn’t think it was a good idea to try and go back outside right now.

The sound of doors being opened and closed as men searched the nearby rooms, reminded the hobgoblin that he didn’t have a lot of time. He couldn’t see any better options so he rushed over to the closet and pulled the door open. He was tempted to try hiding under the bed, but that hadn’t really worked out all that well for him last time.

It was small and cramped inside, but Blacknail dove inside and closed the closet door behind himself anyway. Most of the space was taken up by clothes that were hanging from a rod. The majority of the clothes were dresses, but there were a lot of smaller more frilly bits as well. There was also a large brown sack lying on the floor.

Blacknail opened the sack and found it full of dirty clothes that smelled strongly of human sweat. He frowned at them and then looked around the rest of closet. There were no good hiding spots in sight. With a disgusted sneer Blacknail reached up under his mask and pinched his nose shut, before climbing into the sack. It would hide him for a few more seconds anyway.

As soon as he was discovered Blacknail planned on jumping the closest human, and then making a dash for the window. Since so many men were now searching for him inside the house, there were probably fewer humans guarding the perimeter. The longer he hid the more likely it became that he could slip through the remaining guards and escape.

He was beginning to think that Luphera had tricked him, and that he hadn’t imagined sensing some hostility from her after all. He wasn’t sure why she would be angry at him though. He’d done nothing but help her out.

Even if a man name Najget existed, she must have known that Blacknail wouldn’t be able to get to him nearly as easily as she’d said he would. If she had tricked him then she was going to regret it. He might have to flee for now, but someday soon when she least expected it he’d be back to get his revenge.

The hobgoblin had already drawn his knife, but for now all he could do was wait, and hope the humans looking for him were even stupider than normal. The clothes inside the sack really smelled bad. What had the woman been doing when she wore them that had gotten them so smelly?

The hobgoblin’s thoughts were interrupted by the sound of the room’s door bursting open. Several sets of footsteps then rushed inside. Blacknail instantly went still and quieted his breathing. He’d been hoping there would be fewer of them; it would be difficult to get past so many.

“I got the bed, you check the closet,” someone said from the other side of the closet door.

There was a ruckus and more than a few thuds as the men tore the room apart looking for Blacknail. Then the floor boards creaked as someone approached the closet. There was another creaking noise as the door was pulled open, and a flood of light illuminated the closet. Blacknail could make it out even from inside the sack.

“Anything in there?” one of the men asked.

“A lot of woman’s clothes,” the man by the closet answered as he looked around.

“Let’s get going then; we got a lot of rooms to search,” the other replied.

“One second, I should check this sack,” the first man said.

The man’s shadow blocked the light as he reached towards the sack. From within his hiding spot Blacknail tightened his grip on his knife. The second the man looked in the sack he was going to get a knife in his eye, and an angry hobgoblin in his face.

“You think the Faceless Assassin is hiding in a whore’s laundry sack? He’s probably on the other side of the building by now,” the second man chuckled in amusement.

The first man paused. His hand was hovering only inches from Blacknail. The hobgoblin’s heart started pounding as he readied himself to attack.

“Malthus told us to be thorough, and check everywhere,” the closer man told his companion.

“Fine whatever, just make it quick, you disgusting pervert,” the other man replied dismissively.

The man began to reach towards the top of the sack again. Blacknail tensed and held his breath. If he could take the first human out before he could make any noise then he should be able to make his escape.

“Stop! everyone who is not an employee is to leave the premises immediately. All house guards are to stop searching and escort them out,” a familiar female voice suddenly commanded from out in the hallway.

Luphera projected her voice loud enough that it echoed through the hallway outside the room Blacknail was in, and through all the adjacent chambers as well.

“What’s this?” the man reaching towards Blacknail’s hiding spot said, as he froze again.

A second later he stepped back and away from the concealed hobgoblin. Blacknail was more than a little confused as well. What was Luphera doing? He hadn’t killed the Najget person yet. Had she betrayed him, and come to finish Blacknail off herself?

“What do you think you’re doing? Stop interfering in my search!” Malthus yelled back from another room.

There was then the sound of heavy footsteps as Malthus stomped out to confront the woman.

“There is no more search, and your services are no longer required,” Luphera answered disdainfully a few seconds later.

“What? That hell begotten assassin is still running around this place! There’s no way Najget cancelled our contract now. You’re going to be in a lot of trouble when he finds out about this foolishness, woman” the assassin told her.

“What Najget wants also no longer matters to anyone but the gods; your men failed to protect him, and now he’s dead,” Luphera calmly explained.

“That’s impossible! I had two of my best men guarding him, and Herad’s knifeman never went anywhere near them,” Malthus replied with obvious shock.

Blacknail carefully nodded to himself. The annoying human assassin was right; he hadn’t even seen anyone who looked anything like the man Luphera had described.

“Nonetheless, all three of them are now dead. I don’t know how he did it, but this faceless assassin has made you and your guild look like fools, again. I understand this isn’t the first time he’s sneaked right past you and killed a man under your protection,” Luphera pointed out.

“No, I refuse to believe that the bastard escaped me. He must have had an accomplice that struck at Najget while he distracted us. That means he’s still here somewhere, and I intend to find him,” Malthus replied angrily.

Blacknail definitely hadn’t killed a group of three people. He would remember that. Had Herad sent backup, or had the humans perhaps done something stupid and killed themselves? Blacknail knew from experience that it was hard just keeping humans alive sometimes. Half of Herad’s band would be dead if he hadn’t kept getting them out of trouble.

“I know there’s more than one assassin here, and that’s the problem. You’re disturbing our business with all this violence, and it’s unacceptable. The only reason the assassin came here was to kill Najget because he allied himself with you,” Luphera replied coldly.

“We were just here to protect our employee; we can hardly be blamed for him having enemies. That’s why he hired us in the first place,” Malthus responded scornfully.

“Then why have so many of you Knifemen been coming and going? I’m not blind. You’ve been using this place as some sort of way station or hideout, and that’s unacceptable. This is a brothel not a den of assassins,” Luphera told him.

“We’ll leave when we’ve captured the masked assassin, and not before. We’ll be doing you a favor by getting rid of him anyway,” Malthus countered.

“I’m not an idiot. Now that Najget is dead, the other assassin will have no reason to stick around. He was smart and skilled enough to completely outplay you, so he’s probably already long gone. If I let you stay until you find him, then you’ll never leave. I have no intention of letting you control me the way you did Najget” Luphera argued.

“That’s not my intention! I want that bastard's head. He’s here somewhere, and I’m going to find him!” the assassin growled with barely contained fury.

“No, you’re not. This is my business now, and I’m telling you to leave! If you refuse then these gentlemen behind me and the many others like them throughout this building will forcibly remove you in the most unpleasant method possible,” Luphera ordered the man.

“We could offer you the same deal we gave your boss,” Malthus pleaded.

“Frankly, even if I required your services, and I don’t, I doubt you could deliver on any promises you made. Your track record lately has been truly pathetic,” the new mistress of the house told him dismissively.

“You’ll regret this,” the furious sounding assassin hissed.

“I doubt it. Now get the hell out of my brothel and don’t come back, unless it’s to spend your coin on our services,” Luphera commanded him coldly.

Muttering and the sound of footsteps filled the entire floor as all the searchers started giving up and leaving. Blacknail was relieved when the man closest to him walked away and shut the closet door. The closet grew dark again, and the hobgoblin took a second to scratch himself now that there was no one around to see. He was getting kind of hot and sweaty.

After a few minutes had passed the building around the hobgoblin grew quiet.

“Go make sure they’ve all left. I want some privacy,” Luphera then announced from where she was standing out in the hall.

“As you wish,” a male voice replied before fading footsteps signaled his departure.

“That means you can come out, Blacknail. It’s just me here now,” Luphera then said aloud.

That didn’t actually make the hobgoblin feel safe, or like coming out…

He was still more than a little confused as to what had just happened, but he knew he’s been tricked. He should never have agreed to help her out. She was a lying liar.

“I know you’re there, and we have important things we need to discuss. I have a message for Herad that you need to deliver,” the woman announced.

Blacknail sighed, and reluctantly pulled himself out of the bag. It didn’t smell very good in there anyway, and he couldn’t stay there forever.

He then stalked out of the closet and to the bedroom door. Silently, he peeked out into the hallway. Luphera was there, and she was alone. She also wasn’t armed; he’d been half expecting her to be carrying a loaded crossbow or something.

She was however wearing more clothes than Blacknail had ever seen her in before. A full length purple frock with golden embroidery covered her, and she also seemed to have a new air of authority to her.

The hobgoblin took a tentative step out into the hallway. Luphera turned towards the masked hobgoblin and smiled his way when she heard him approach.

“There you are. For a second I thought you were avoiding me,” Luphera joked.

Luphera was a little unsettling most the time, but now he thought he heard something weird in her voice. It made Blacknail uncomfortable, but he really wanted to know what was going on.

“I didn’t kill Najget yet-ss, but I was totally going to-ss,” he told her, as he carefully walked over.

Luphera just smiled at him, and winked conspiratorially.

“Nonsense, I have several guards that will swear they saw you do it. I’m told it was very impressive too,” she responded with a chuckle.

Blacknail had no idea why she was making that weird eye motion, but compared to some of the other things he didn’t understand about Luphera he supposed it was nothing. The hobgoblin was also sure he would have remembered killing a man in purple with a mustache with two guards…

Well, whatever. He would have killed the man if he’d found him first, so it was kind of like he’d done it anyway.

“I’m very good-ss at killing people,” he bragged, which caused Luphera to smile.

“So I’ve heard, it’s also very impressive how you led that idiot Malthus on such a merry chase, and avoided him so effortlessly,” she said appreciatively as she stepped closer to him.

“Yes, I’m very stealthy; even when I’m right beside them people can’t see me,” Blacknail told her arrogantly.

It was even technically true sometimes, like when it was very dark or when he was hiding in a sack. All of a sudden Blacknail felt Luphera’s hand on his shoulder. He flinched in surprise. When had she gotten so close?

Wait, he was doing it again! He was letting Luphera’s words and smiles distract him. He had to focus.

“You lied about-ss how easy the job would be. I think you tried to trick me. Why?” Blacknail asked her suspiciously.

Luphera’s grin broadened and took on a slightly sinister look. Blacknail instinctively took a step back away from her.

“I owed you one, or it might be more accurate to say you owed me one. I know that it was you who killed Galive, and he wasn’t the only one that died that night. There was a woman, and while I barely knew her, she was still one of mine,” Luphera explained.

Blacknail frowned as he thought about her words. He did remember killing a woman who had been in bed with Galive. He hadn’t really had a choice though; she would have messed everything up. Had she been of Luphera’s tribe and not Galive’s? Human tribes sure were complicated.

“Sorry-ss, I didn’t know she was yours. She was going-ss to mess things up,” Blacknail explained reluctantly.

Did this mean they were enemies now? The hobgoblin's left hand crept closer to the dagger he kept hidden in his coat, but Luphera didn't make any hostile moves.

“That’s alright, you didn't know, and you’ve almost paid me back now. There’s just one more thing you can do for me,” she told him as she walked closer.

Now Blacknail was very uncomfortable. He took another step backwards, but Luphera glided effortlessly after him. She was impressively nimble on her feet…

“Um right-ss, I need to go back to Herad… you said you had-ss a message for her?” Blacknail remarked nervously.

“Running away to another woman, eh? How mean. Well, you’re not going anywhere until I get a chance to properly thank you. Why don’t you take your mask off and relax with me?” Luphera asked him playfully, as she smiled knowingly.

“I can’t do that… I was told-ss not to, because um... magic,” the hobgoblin replied nervously.

The woman just smiled at his response though, and took his hand. Blacknail flinched.

“I don't believe you. Could the real reason be because underneath of it you’re not human? Don’t worry a bit of green skin isn’t going to scare me off. It sounds exciting, actually” Luphera told him excitedly with a hungry smile.

Blacknail’s eyes went very wide. He’d been kind of hoping it would though… and wait, she knew he was a hobgoblin. He’d been found out! How had she figured it out? He was a great pretender, and had acted exactly like a human at all times. Someone must have let the secret slip. It had probably been Khita, she practically never shut up.

“Why are you so surprised? Knowing things is my business, or half of it anyway. I look forward to showing you the other half very shortly,” Luphera explained flirtatiously.

Her closeness and the scent of her skin caused a shiver to work its way down the hobgoblin’s spine, and then come to rest below his gut. He smelled a lingering trace of the perfume from before on her clothes, and it began to do strange things to his head. 








INT : LOF 1 











Sir Masnin of Westspring Hill rode into town and wondered what difference a handful of peasants made. The town of Breststock did not seem to suffer for the lack of them.

The market square was filled with busy merchants’ stalls, and the locals were going about their business without any apparent concern for the alleged disappearances, or the party of seven armed strangers who now walked amongst them.

Lowborn wives examined goods from wooden stalls, as laborers moved and unloaded wagons across the wide cobbled streets. The town's buildings showed the wealth of the area with painted wooden doors and shutters; most were wide open to let in the day’s sun. They were obviously far from the frontline of the war here.

He'd expected a very different sort of welcome and wasn't sure what bothered him more, the idea that he'd volunteered for a wild hob chase, or that they would find what they had come looking for.

The only people the knight had spotted so far who showed any signs of fear were the condemned criminals on display and awaiting sentencing in their cramped cages. Their thin frames and fearful eyes marked them as petty thieves or debtors. It was always possible they were deserters from the army though.

The young knight quickly dismissed the criminals from his mind; he was unwilling to dwell too much on fear or poverty. He turned his attention back to the town, imitating the older knights that led his group.

For the last several days, he had been working to make a good impression with the senior knights and their leader, the paladin Sire Iolan. He was not just a holy warrior of the Order of Helio-Lustria but also a captain who held land and a title in the order’s name.

Masnin of Westspring had eagerly answered the paladin's call for noble men to join him on a mission for his order. He was the third son of a minor knight with no lands of his own, and that meant he would have to make his own way in the world.

Most young men in his position would have ridden off to war and joined the king’s army, but he had no intention of joining the legions of men who had died seeking their fortune in the wars. Despite all the promises, Masnin hadn’t noticed very many soldiers or knights returning home with titles or plunder. He hadn’t noticed very many of them returning at all.

The best way to avoid that, and the shame of poverty, was for him to join an order, but there were only two ways to do that. You could be sponsored at a young age and raised by the order, or a knight with a few brave feats to his name could be invited. Well, that or use connections his humble upbringing didn't give him. He would have to make do by displaying the dignity and skill of a true knight.

“If you keep grimacing like that you'll pull a muscle, and then your face will stay like that forever,” said a voice from beside him.

Masnin turned to the speaker, a man one or two years older than himself with newer armor than his own and a foolish grin on his face.

“What?” asked Masnin, caught off guard.

“That silly look on your face,” Sir Rusk said. “I've seen it happen before. For the rest of your life you'll be cursed to walk around looking like you’re constipated. ”

“I don't have a look on my face,” he replied, annoyed.

“If you say so,” the smiling Sir Rusk shrugged in reply.

Masnin tried to relax his face, not because he thought the other knight was right, but to hide his annoyance. Sir Rusk of the Toppling Hills had been his bane for the entire journey.

It seemed like all attempts to distinguish himself ended with him being overshadowed or ridiculed by the blond knight. Not only was he the perfect picture of a paladin with his new armor and broad shoulders, but he came from a wealthy and well connected family.

Masnin's own thin frame betrayed the past few years he had spent traveling the countryside and living off the hospitality of country lords. Not all of them had been very welcoming.

The young knight gripped the hilt of his sword and tried to banish his anxiety. If he was to have any chance of becoming a paladin, he would need to be ready to risk his life.
“This is the place sir,” reported Sir Annis, the paladin who was second in command of the mission.

“It’s as good a spot as any,” replied their leader, Sire Iolan.

Sir Annis, who was short but heavily built, led the group to a large and comfortable looking inn. One of the taller buildings in the town at three stories high, the inn was clearly meant for the better class of travelers; the kind of place he hadn't been able to stay at since he became a knight.

The sign that hung from the front of the building displayed the unlikely sight of a horse’s head with a burning lantern hanging from its mouth. It was a clear invocation of Mesa-Min the god of travelers and curiosity, as opposed to the seedier patron of darkness and shelter, Cor-Dius.

Masnin stood straight and watched intently as the expedition leader dismounted and marched up the stairs of the building. Captain Iolan then turned to address his men from the raised porch there.

“I'm sure you are all tired from your journey,” he said. “We have much work to do tonight and many things left to do before then. Annis and I will invoke the Writ and round up some support in preparation for tonight. I expect you all to be ready to go when we return, but other than that you gentlemen can relax and prepare yourselves. We should be back well before dark.”

With that said, the paladin turned and left. Annis followed behind him. The other riders began to dismount and tie up their horses. Those knights who had squires handed their mounts over to them to be taken away, and Masnin gave his to a nearby stable boy.

“Finally,” said Rusk as he led the others inside. “I thought we'd be riding all day and night without rest.”

Masnin didn’t reply. He considered it unseemly for a knight to complain or engage in idle banter.

They entered the inn and found it full of customers enjoying the common area. He and his companions all made their way to the bar, where a large and friendly man assured them he would handle bringing in their possessions and make sure their horses were taken care of properly.

Despite the friendly and professional atmosphere, Masnin couldn't bring himself to let someone else handle his possessions unwatched. He had little enough to steal, but that only made his scant belongings more precious to him. He walked back outside to watch.

The stable boy ignored the young knight as he did his work. Masnin grabbed his bag and was just about to leave when he heard the sound of the shutters being shut and locked. He turned back to the stable boy and saw him do the same thing to the stable doors. He frowned; it was already uncomfortably hot in the building…

“Do you usually shutter the windows during the day?” asked Masnin curiously. “It's a bright and warm day today with a few hours of sun left.”

The boy stopped and looked embarrassed.

“I just don't want to forget,” he replied.

Masnin eyed the young boy critically. There was something going unsaid and he wanted to know what it was. He casually moved between the boy and the door.

“Problems with theft?” he asked, trying to sound kindly.
“No,” the boy said very quickly. “I was just told to make sure is all,”

Masnin had been in enough stables to know this was far from standard practice, especially in such a thriving little town. Wheels turned in his mind, perhaps the missing people hadn't gone as unnoticed as it seemed.

“Oh, why is that?” he asked.

“Da, just said to make sure. Been doing it for a week. Ever since...” the boy said before stopping suddenly.

“Since what?” The young knight asked intently.

The boy however held his silence and just stared at him.

“By the light of Helio-Lustria, pup, just answer the question,” the knight exclaimed.

The boy just gave him an unimpressed look before looking at the exit. He clearly wanted to leave.

Masnin didn’t like being ignored though, and he wanted to know the answer to his damn question. The information sounded like it could be useful later, and he needed every advantage he could get.

The knight cast a suspicious glance around the stable. He would have to take extreme measures if he wanted answers, and it wouldn't do to be seen. He reached down to his belt and grabbed his coin purse. It was depressingly light in his grasp. He riffled through it until he felt the familiar shape of a penny in his fingers, and then he took it out and held it in front of the boy.

“Since what?” he repeated.

“Two nights ago, a guard went missing in the night. Everybody was talking about it because he had a wife and kids. And then people started talking about how others had gone missing, but nobody really noticed they were missing because they didn't have no families. That's all I know, honest,” The boy whispered back, as he took the coin.

Masnin stepped out of the boy's way. He grabbed his baggage from his saddle and turned to follow the boy out of the stable, and into the hallway that led to the common room.

When he returned to the common room, the only one of his companions he saw was Rusk, who was sitting by himself. He didn't really like Rusk but he was short on friends, and as fellow knights and brothers in arms they should learn to get along.

Rusk watched him sit down with a smile on his face and a mug in his hand. Masnin really hoped the man wasn’t getting drunk while they had a job to do. That would be embarrassing for everyone in their party.

“Where are the other two?” asked Masnin.

“They're just enjoying the town's hospitality,” said Rusk. “Seems like a friendly place, one appreciates handsome young knights on a holy mission.”

“You didn’t go with them?” Masnin asked with a raised eyebrow.

From what he’d seen of Rusk the man wasn’t one to pass up an opportunity to have fun.

“Good things come to those who wait.” Rusk said as he gave Masnin a look over. “You’re decent looking enough in a tall dark and broody kind of way. With the number of friendly young women around you should have no trouble finding companionship yourself,”

“Are they just friendly?” Masnin asked inquisitively.

“You suspect a sinister plot?” Rusk replied with a smile.

“I suspect that everyone here is not as carefree as they appear to be, and a companion who's handy with a blade might be more important than good looks,” the other knight answered.

Masnin took some small pleasure in Rusk losing his smile.
“Had's horn,” the blond knight said miserably. “And I thought the most difficult thing I would be called upon to do today was choosing a bed companion.”

“Not likely,” sighed Masnin. “We're probably going to be hunting ghouls.”

An hour later, Iolan returned and set them about their work. The paladin didn't mention what investigation he had done but his preparations were obvious.

The main streets of the town were lit by braziers and torches. Masnin noted that the largest braziers were decorated with the markings of Helio-Lustria, the god most opposed to ghouls. The veteran paladin clearly believed that there were ghouls about, and Masnin had no reason to doubt him.

He paired Rusk and Masnin together and assigned them an area of the town; a dark patch of twisting alleyways. The winding streets stopped the light from shining far and the untidy buildings that lined them cast shadows across every surface.

They were to patrol it together and summon aid with a horn if they encountered anything. Under no circumstances were they to split up or leave their area unless summoned by another horn.

Armed only with their swords and torches they walked the streets. Masnin would have preferred a silent vigil but that apparently wasn't an option.

“What did you do to piss off Iolan?” asked Rusk for the third time.

“Perhaps him giving us the most difficult patch is a sign of trust,” returned Masnin with obvious annoyance.

Why did it have to be him who’d angered their leader? Rusk’s behavior was much worse than his own. If anyone had done something wrong it had undoubtedly been him.

“Ha! More likely one of your brothers once bedded his nephew’s wife,” said Rusk as his eyes peered out into the dark. “Or one of the other knights is his nephew and he's removing the competition.”

“Sire Iolan is a holy knight of Helio, and I'd appreciate it if you didn't besmirch the name of my happily married brothers,” Masnin replied angrily.

“I..” Rusk started to say, but he fell silent as they both heard a scratching sound.

The two young knights stopped moving and considered the darkness around them. Neither one of them could see very well. There could be anything out there…

Masnin moved his torch slowly, trying to illuminate as much of the street as possible. From around a corner he heard the definite sound of footsteps on cobble. After a moment of hesitation he dashed forwards and around the corner.
He heard Rusk swear lightly and follow him. Turning the corner revealed a dark humanoid shape facing away from them. Masnin caught up to it quickly and readied his sword to strike, but something shoved him lightly from behind and sent him stumbling.

“Surrender now or die!” said a voice from behind him that Masnin recognized as Rusk. The other knight had hit him! Why would he do that and why was he talking to the...

“I surrender!” said the man who was apparently not a ghoul.

The figure turned to reveal a gaunt but unmistakably human face wearing dark clothing and a crude blue cowl. The man looked like the more dramatic kind of thief. He was definitely just a man though.

Masnin felt a wave of shame wash over him. He had been a single moment away from stabbing a man in the back. That was the very antithesis of knightly behavior, even if the man had probably been nothing more than a common born thief.

“I won't even ask why you’re skulking around,” said Rusk, with his blade still drawn. “But get inside or I guarantee you won't survive the night.”

While Masnin watched the figure nod and scurry back away into the darkness, Rusk turned his back to the man and confronted Masnin.

“You’re a little too eager for blood,” he commented gruffly.

“I.. I made a mistake. Thank you for stopping me,” Masnin said honestly.

“Yes well, the situation calls for quick actions. Just remember to temper them with caution. I imagine the town would become a lot less friendly if we left a trail of bodies behind us, and it seems like we might be here for a few days,” the blond knight replied, as he paused to consider the empty night.

Masnin just nodded in reply. Not only had he almost killed that man but he had no doubt scared away any ghouls in the area. When he voiced that opinion to Rusk however, the other knight disagreed.

“You said one of the missing men was a guard, so I think we may be dealing with brazen predators,” he said.

Suddenly, Masnin heard something. It seemed like a startled grunt from the direction the fool he had almost killed earlier had gone.

Once more he dashed forwards. The man could have put a bit of distance between them, but the sound had seemed to come from not that far away. Masnin held his sword out as he scanned his surroundings. The alley was empty; had he misheard? There was no place to hide here…

“What is it,” asked Rusk with concern, keeping close behind him.

“Shh, I thought I heard a sound,” Masnin whispered, as he stilled himself and tried to slow his breathing.

After several seconds of listening he heard nothing though, so he sighed. It seemed he'd embarrassed himself once more.

“Let's get out of the dark,” he said. “It's making me paranoid.”

Sir Rusk did not reply though, he was staring upwards. Masnin followed Rusk's gaze until it came to rest upon a piece of cloth that was hanging out of reach off the side of the sheer ally wall.

He immediately recognized it as the same cloth the man they’d run into had been wearing, but now it had dark patches that could only be bloodstains all over it.

Masnin was taller than Rusk so he caught the fabric with his sword and pulled it down. Something had shredded it and left a hollow sharp point stuck in the fabric. It appeared to be a claw of some kind…

“Ghouls?” asked Rusk nervously.

Masnin stared up into the night sky and considered the claw. It may have been his imagination but he thought he saw the stars flicker quickly as something large and as black as midnight passed overhead.

“By all the gods together, I certainly hope not,” he replied in spooked voice. 








INT: LOF2









Sir Iolan considered the cloth and the claw just as seriously as Masnin had, and with just as little enthusiasm. Rusk and Masnin had decided against sounding their horn, and instead they’d gone to meet the captain at the inn that they were using as their headquarters. This late at night, the common room was deserted except for Iolan, Annis, and a handful of their companions.

“You’re sure you heard the attack take place in the alley, not above it?” Sir Annis asked.

The paladin didn't sound disbelieving, just professional. Masnin tried to reply in the same tone.

“Yes sir, I have no doubt about that,” he replied stiffly.

Iolan grunted and turned to the mage he had recruited. The grey haired but hearty looking man had apparently shown up in town shortly after they’d arrived. He’d been sent by his guild to support the paladins in case there actually was a ghoul infestation. The Militant Order of Helio-Lustria had a charter from the king that allowed them to summon help from the mage guilds in such emergencies.

The mage wore a robe with the Fiery Eye on it. Masnin had seen a few of them before, however this one’s staff was more ornate and complicated than those carried by the fodder that the guild usually produced for the army. He was also older, with a trim white beard and lines under his eyes.

“What do you make of this, Roilg?” Sir Iolan asked the mage.

“I don't recognize the claw as coming from any particular creature. However, there is one test I can run that might be enlightening.” The other man replied in a baritone voice.

The mage then produced a glass vial from a pocket sewn into his vest. Masnin noticed that there were many more such pockets inside there. He had no idea what the mage could possibly need them all for.

Roilg the mage carefully poured a single drop of the clear liquid from inside the vial onto the claw. When the fluid hit the talon it let out a faint hiss, and wisps of quickly disappearing black smoke began swirling up from it. Masnin watched intently; he had rarely seen magic at work, even magic as mundane as this.

“Well, I can say with absolute surety that this talon came from a mutant, although I have no clue as to what manner of creature it started as. I’m relatively certain that’s it's not an herbivore though.” Roilg explained as he frowned down at the claw with a concerned expression.

Iolan cursed out loud, and at his side Annis paled a little. Their reactions shocked Masnin. Was a flying foe so hard to deal with? Surely these two veteran paladins had dealt with this sort of thing many times before. Masnin didn't consider it appropriate to voice his thoughts aloud, but Rusk did.

“Abominations such as a crystal host can be deadly foe, but surely they aren’t as terrible as an outbreak of the unholy plague?” the young knight asked from his seat at the inn's bar.

The mage snorted grumpily in response. Sir Iolan turned and considered the two paladin hopefuls. He considered the question worth answering though, which pleased Masnin.

“Ghouls can do more damage than just about anything. A full blown ghoul epidemic is a nightmare beyond imagining. They’ve gutted cities in the past, but that hasn't happened in ages. The unholy plague and its bearers are an old foe and one we understand, so they usually can be predicted and exterminated before they do too much damage,” Sir Iolan explained.

“Mutants however are cursed unpredictable things. They might, like this one, kill only one person a night, but stopping a powerful beast such as this is much more dangerous for the hunters. So far all we know about this thing is that it's a night hunter with claws and a taste for human flesh,” Sir Annis added.

“We know it flies,” interjected Masnin. He had seen enough to know that.

“Do we?” asked Sir Iolan. Then he smiled benignly at Masnin's answering frown.

“I don’t doubt your word, but crystal hosts can be tricky. Can you say for sure that it doesn't levitate, walk on walls like they were flat ground, or turn invisible?” the older knight clarified.

“Those are real possibilities?” asked Masnin in shock.

He didn't like considering that the gods would arm the enemies of humanity with such strange and powerful abilities. Had the creature really flown away? Now Masnin couldn't be so sure of what he’d seen or assumed.

Beside him Rusk looked just as shocked as him, which made Masnin feel better. Apparently, he hadn’t been the only one ignorant of all this.

“They are; all of those abilities have been documented by the guilds. Information on mutants is one of the few things shared amongst the guilds,” answered Roilg.

“So we will need a new plan for tomorrow night. This creature has already proven that the patrols are useless, and they were undertaken with ghouls in mind anyway,” Sir Annis told everyone.

“What do you suggest we do instead, then?” Sir Iolan asked his subordinate.

“I believe that tomorrow night we should get everyone off the streets, every last blackguard and streetwalker. Then, we bait the creature and lure it into a trap,”

“Bait? I can think of only one thing you could use to bait this man-eater. That seems like a deadly task, considering what we know about the creature. I doubt you're volunteering yourself,” commented Sir Iolan with a raised eyebrow.

“We could use the condemned in the square,” Sir Annis replied stonily.

The older Paladin's face showed no remorse at using living men as disposable tools. Sir Iolan looked thoughtful, but also more than a little reluctant. He didn’t seem completely comfortable with the idea of using men, even criminals, to lure the beast into an ambush. Masnin couldn’t read the mage’s face at all.

Masnin himself frowned as he considered Sir Annis’ plan. It seemed like it might work, no one was offering any other options, but there was a serious problem with it. It wouldn’t give Masnin a chance to prove himself, and he desperately needed to show these men his worth.

“I volunteer,” offered Masnin, surprising even himself.

The others all looked at him in surprise. Rusk seemed particularly shocked, and was looking at Masnin like he was crazy. Maybe he was, or maybe he was just desperate. He couldn’t live the rest of his life as a knight errant. The constant travelling and dependence on charity was already wearing him down.

“We already know it'll target armed men, because it killed that guard. The plan has a better chance of success if the bait can fight. If we use the criminals if might just snatch one up and disappear, but it’ll find a trained and armed knight a much more difficult target” he explained reluctantly to the other knights.

Sir Iolan gave the volunteer a long look, taking his measure. Masnin returned the look, and did his best to look stoic and brave. He wasn’t sure how well he succeeded.

“Fine, I accept your offer and acknowledge your courage,” proclaimed Iolan. “Helio-Lustria's blessing on you. May the sun god shield you against this creature of darkness.”

“You’re going to need it,” Masnin heard Rusk mutter quietly.

The young knight didn’t get a lot of sleep that night. He spent the next morning and afternoon thinking about all the things that could go wrong with the plan. They didn’t even know what the beast looked like…

Masnin was up early the next morning to help the paladins set up the trap. When dusk finally came and darkness blanketed the town, Masnin found himself sitting alone in the middle of a small unlit square staring into a large brazier filled with water. He cursed his courage and the fate that had led him here.

The brazier had been Roilg's idea. He’d raised the possibility that the creature wouldn't attack if its prey kept checking the skies for it. So he’d proposed using the reflective surface of the water as a mirror.

In it, Masnin could easily make out the stars above him. The young knight sighed. As last sights went he supposed the reflected night sky was a decent one. If only he could be sure that it wasn’t full of evil mutant beasts that wanted to eat him…

Masnin strained his hearing as he watched the reflection of the skies. Listening not only for the monster, but for the reassuring sounds of his companions and the town guards hidden away in the homes and shops around him.

The plan was that when he engaged the monster sharpshooters would fire on it from the windows above. Roilg was also around, but he hadn’t participated in the planning. He’d just said that he would do whatever was necessary.

That hadn’t reassured the young knight. In fact, it had almost made him think the mage was going to set the entire square on fire. He was a hard man to read.

As Masnin pondered all the ways he could die within the next few hours he felt an odd tingling sensation on the back of his neck as his hair rose. Instantly, he concentrated on the reflection in the brazier, and noticed a patch of stars flickering up in the sky above him.

He rolled. Not forwards, but backwards to his knees as an acrobat might do. As a country knight he'd been hunting enough to know that even the dumbest predators would try to predict how their prey would dodge them.

“Now!” he screamed, as he prepared himself for the worst. It was a wasted effort.

Standing before him was a creature seemingly made of living darkness that stood a story tall. It had swooped into the square without a sound and having missed him, spun around with speed that was just unfair in a creature that big.

The unseen thing seemed to swell and contract in size as it moved to strike him. It almost seemed to be a living shadow as it rose like a black wave to sweep him aside. His gut clenched with fear as he realized he wouldn’t be able to block the blow.

Luckily, the attack never came, instead a swarm of quarrels buzzed through the air and into the shape. The beast didn’t make a sound as it contracted back into itself, withdrawing. Just as soon as it had shrunk, it swelled again and somehow the writhing black mass launched itself upwards and into the sky. A gust of dusty wind swept into Masnin's face and forced him to shield it with his arm.

It seemed like the creature was going to escape when a loud crack filled the air and the unseen thing suddenly was thrown into the side of a building. The wooden wall the creature was thrown into wasn't solid enough to stop it. With a snap it burst through, landed inside the building, and disappeared.

Masnin's allies were busy though. A dozen armed men streamed out of the nearby homes and into the square to stop the creature from escaping. Masnin moved to join them, stopping with the rest just short of the building.

No one moved to enter it though, as it was filled with an eerie and unnatural darkness. Even as men began lighting the braziers and lamps outside on the street, the flames failed to penetrate the shadows.

“Aside,” came an authoritative voice.

It was the mage Roilg, who no doubt had been the one who had grounded the creature so dramatically. The mage walked up beside Masnin and frowned at the darkness. Quick as thought, his hands played along his staff like a musical instrument. His seemed to shift and change shape under his hands, and seconds later a stream of bright light burst forth into the building.

It failed to illuminate anything; if anything it only defined the darkness more. There were mutters of fear and shock from the guardsmen and even some of the knights, as they realized the inside of the building was impervious even to his magical light. It almost seemed to be a pitch black wall that you could reach out and touch.

There were murmurs of fear and whispers of “demon” from the men. Masnin himself felt a cold fear in his chest as he stared into that lightless abyss. If ever a true demon walked the world, it was this creature of darkness.

“Fear not darkness. Do not waver before uncertainty,” proclaimed Sir Iolan the paladin as he approached the darkness.

“It's just a mutant, and we’ve cornered and wounded it now. The darkness only hides it; it does not protect it from our steel. Fire into the building and finish the thing off!” he proclaimed.

His words had an effect. Men pressed forward and drew strength from each other. Masnin let out a breath he didn't know he had been holding. He relaxed slightly and got ready to move again. He still needed to impress the paladins; volunteering wasn’t enough, he would have to actually engage the creature.

The crossbowmen were still in the windows of the square. Only Sir Annis was in position to fire into the building. He raised his crossbow and fired. Nothing happened. With a practiced motion he reloaded and was about to fire again, when quick as thought the darkness flowed over him. He had just enough time to begin raising the crossbow when it engulfed him.

There was a terrible scream and a wet tearing sound. Masnin jumped in shock and took a fearful step back. It had killed the paladin so effortlessly, and he was probably next!

Men cried out in shock and quarrels were fired desperately at the living shadow. Roilg sent a wave of fire into it without apparent effect. It only illuminated the scared faces of the guardsmen with flickering orange light.

Masnin saw the dark creature subtly swell in the mage's direction and knew it was considering the mage. If the creature got to him then the fight would be over. The guards would surely flee, and they might be right to do so. The living darkness showed no weakness or fear.

Should he retreat? Nothing they’d done had seemed to work at all. Retreating was probably the smart thing to do.

What would he be running to, though? No, he couldn’t run. I would be better to die here with honor than to shame his family by fleeing.

He sprinted forwards at what he could only guess was the rear of the creature, and raised his blade. With a primal roar he unleashed all his pent up frustration and terror and channeled it into one attack. If he was going to die then there was no point in keeping it all bottled up anymore!

The edge of his sword sliced into the shadow and kept going. His heart missed a beat and he despaired. Just like the rest of his life his death would be pointless…

A sudden tug on his arms brought him back to reality, his blade had found purchase. He’d hit something!

His relief was short lived; the shifting darkness before him spasmed, and then reached out to envelop him. A second later, something slammed into him, and he was sent flying through the air.

He landed hard, and his armor scraped against the rubble and cobblestone that littered the street.

Masnin didn’t know how long he lay there stunned and staring up at the night sky, but when he finally got to his feet he found the situation had gone downhill.

Roilg was down, and lay crumpled up against a nearby wall, while a guard stood over him protectively. Masnin wasn't sure why the creature hadn't finished the mage off.

Without the power of the mage, the men were retreating from the unseen thing. Several braziers had been tipped over in the struggle, and their fiery contents had spilled across the road. Even with the very earth aflame no light penetrated the mass of shadows that moved among the guardsmen.

Masnin backed away and waited for someone to do something; for someone to bring order to the confusion. No one stepped up. Sir Iolan was nowhere to be seen, and Sir Annis was dead. The only one of their group he could see was Rusk, who seemed even less inclined to action than him.

The other knight noticed Masnin though, and quickly made his way over to him. Rusk kept one eye on the creature as moved. Masnin watched him come over numbly. He was tired and sore, he couldn't imagine what he could possibly do to help the situation.

Surely this was more than the gods could demand of him. He had been brave and valorous. It hadn't been enough. All he'd accomplished was to watch brave men die futilely.

Surely if the gods wanted more from him, they would send him a sign; a light to guide him.

Rusk was only a half dozen feet away from him when he stumbled and fell. His feet slipped out from beneath him and he landed on his ass with a crash.

Without thinking, Masnin moved to help the other knight up, and offered the only remaining knight a hand.

“What a cursed night,” the other man said raggedly. “I slipped on some unlucky man's blood. I'll take that as an omen. It's time to go.”

Masnin stopped and considered this. As Rusk regained his footing, the young knight's gaze took in the square. The creature remained standing in the centre, and the remaining men were more concerned with retreating safely than attacking it. All around the square dark liquid pooled around the cobbles of the street.

It was blood, too much blood. It couldn’t all have come from the soldiers. Masnin glanced down at his blade. It was faint, but the reflective surface of the steel was marred by dark red liquid.

“It can bleed…” Masnin exclaimed with sudden hope. It only seemed invincible!

“What?” asked a confused Rusk. “Did you land on your head earlier?”

“There’s flesh beneath the darkness; it’s bleeding!” Masnin said again, louder and clearer this time as he held up his sword for Rusk to see.

The other knight’s eyes widened as they took in the blood that stained Masnin’s blade. The fluid was clearly visible as the nearby flames reflected off the steel. Masnin didn’t wait for a reply. He yelled and charged the beast again.

The only way the mutant could be bleeding and yet still standing was if the veil of shadows that surrounded it were much bigger than the actual creature, and almost all the attacks were missing it. That meant it couldn’t be much bigger than a man.

The beast froze and stopped chasing a fleeing guard, as it somehow sensed Masnin’s approach. The young knight eyed the swirling darkness before him as he moved. He would probably only have one chance at this. Where was the actual beast?

Once again as he neared the darkness stretched out and consumed him. Masnin was instantly blinded. His heart pounded in his chest and his throat felt tight, but he took several steps deeper into the darkness.

He heard a scratching noise, and instantly he struck towards it. He felt his blade bite deep, and heard an inhuman screech echo through the darkness. Then something smashed into his breastplate and knocked him backwards. His blade flew loosely away from his numb hands.

He was sent sprawling across the ground, but he ignored the pain and pushed himself up onto his side. He needed to see the creature.

A little over a dozen feet away the dark mass of shadows that concealed the mutant was writhing energetically, but it was also shrinking. As Masnin and everyone else watched, the creature’s magic disappeared to reveal what lay beneath it.

Long twisted limps with tight membranes that stretched between them framed a skinny body, and a truly hideous face. Several arrows protruded from its flesh, and its furry hide had a long bleeding gash across it. It twitched there on the ground and its wings were tattered. The mutant was a giant bat!

Masnin collapsed again, and sighed in relief. As he lay there on the cold stone ground, the young knight breathed in the cool midnight air. This was what knights were meant to do, slay monsters. Masnin felt his earlier fear and frustration slip away as he reveled in his victory. He had been a hero and a true knight!

Even if he didn’t end up becoming a paladin, he would still always know that his life hadn’t been wasted. 









QOS 1








 The cloaked hobgoblin tiptoed silently down the shadowy hallway. The dull noonday sun shone in through the nearby windows, but he kept out of the light and in the dark. Since this passage was rarely used for anything but storage, it didn’t get a lot of traffic and the windows were the only source of light.

Blacknail could hear the creak and thud of people's footsteps moving around him, but none of them seemed to be moving in his direction, and that was good. He wanted to avoid detection at all costs. He’d come fairly close to being caught earlier when a guard had walked by, but Blacknail had managed to duck aside and hide behind a shelf at the last second.

His heart still hadn’t slowed to its normal speed and was thudding in his chest. It would be very bad if he was discovered, and Blacknail didn’t even want to think about the consequences. He had to stay hidden from the humans no matter what!

Of course that was never going to happen. He’d proven over and over again that mere humans couldn’t detect a hobgoblin like him. He was the dreaded Faceless Assassin, and Herad’s undefeated sneaky killer!

“What in all the hells are you doing, Blacknail?” Saeter asked from right behind him.

The unexpected voice slipped into the hobgoblin’s ears, and his heart exploded in panic. He jumped several feet into the air. He hadn’t heard anyone approaching! Oh no, it was master Saeter.

When Blacknail hit the ground, he was already dashing away down the hallway as fast as his feet would carry him. He’d been found; he had to escape, and quickly!

“Stop right there, you little green idot! Come back here, or I swear I’ll go get my bow and hunt you down through Daggerpoint and all the land beyond it,” Saeter barked loudly.

Blacknail believed him; he could hear the stubborn certainty in his master’s voice. When he used that tone there was no arguing with him, and he always did what he said he would, no matter how stupid or dangerous it was.

The hobgoblin stopped running, went completely still, and let out a pitiful whimper. This was the worst possible outcome; why did it have to be his master that had found him?

The urge to flee and hide was overwhelming, but he knew that wouldn’t work. Saeter would find him soon enough. He was incredibly annoying like that.

“Right, now come back here,” Saeter ordered impatiently.

The hobgoblin sighed and obeyed. With his head down he walked sullenly back to his master. He didn’t dare meet his eyes.

“Lose the hood, and look at me,” his master ordered next.

He sounded very annoyed, so Blacknail reluctantly pulled his hood down and met the old scout’s gaze. Saeter looked him over inquisitively for a few seconds, and his expression changed from an angry look to a concerned one.

The hobgoblin cringed and had to turn away a few seconds later. What if his master could smell something? What if it showed? His master spoke up.

“What bloody nonsense has gotten into you, Blacknail? You’ve been acting weird, and avoiding everyone since you returned from chasing those assassins. You told Herad that they got away after a brief fight, and she didn’t question it. She doesn’t know you like I do though, and I’ll eat my boots if that’s what really happened,” he asked the hobgoblin quietly, so that no one would overhear.

“Yes, it is. That totally happened,” Blacknail replied nervously, as his anxious eyes wandered around the room.

Saeter just glared at the hobgoblin stubbornly; he obviously wasn’t convinced. Blacknail withered under his master’s gaze for several seconds. The hobgoblin knew that Saeter wasn’t going to let up until he got an answer, so obviously he had to lie through his teeth.

Blacknail looked up and met his master’s eyes. He licked his lips with his long tongue nervously as his brain worked feverishly to come up with the greatest lie ever told.

“I got lost…” he muttered a second later.

His master crossed his arms and gave the hobgoblin an unamused stare.

Blacknail winced and groaned regretfully. Why had he said that? That was a stupid lie, and totally unconvincing! Why hadn’t he thought of anything better?

Overcome with shame, the hobgoblin flipped his hood back up to hide his face. He then crouched down in order to make himself as small as possible. Maybe if he just stayed like this his master would eventually get bored and leave…

Saeter groaned in annoyance at Blacknail’s behavior.

“Seriously?” he remarked in disbelief.

The old scout then reached down and pulled Blacknail’s hood off. He opened his mouth as if to say something, but then froze.

“Are you… blushing?” he asked in surprise, as he took in the hobgoblins face.

There was a startled look on Saeter’s face. Blacknail’s usual green features had a faint reddish purple cast to them, especially around the cheeks. It certainly seemed like he was doing the hobgoblin equivalent of blushing.

Blacknail opened his mouth to respond and deny everything, but then he stopped. He did sort of want to talk to someone.

Last night, his experience with Luphera had been very… different. The memory caused Blacknail to flinch, and he felt his face burn hotter. Luphera didn’t act or look anything like a female goblin, so why had he let her drag him around by his handsome nose?

He felt used, and he had no idea what he’d been thinking. That terrifying scent and her hungry smile had just done something weird to his head, and other parts of his body.

Luphera had invited him back, but there was no way he was ever going to do that! He felt dizzy just thinking about it. At first his instincts had taken over, but once they’d died down he’d had no idea what he was doing there.

What if he’d done something wrong…? No, there was no way he was ever going to go back! How was he supposed to be around humans now? What if they could smell her on him? Their noses couldn’t be that bad, could they? He didn’t want anyone to know.

Saeter coughed impatiently as he stood over the red faced hobgoblin. Blacknail’s mouth hung open, but he had yet to say anything.

“There’s this woman…” he muttered a second later, as the truth burst out of him unexpectedly.

Saeter’s face went through several stages. First his eyes narrowed in confusion, then he frowned doubtfully, then his eyes widened with shock and worry, until finally his expression settled into a look that portrayed deep but sad wisdom. The old grey haired scout reached out and put a hand on Blacknail’s shoulder.

“There always is,” he sagely told the confused hobgoblin.

There was a weird twist to Saeter’s smile, and his eyes also seemed a little odd. Blacknail didn’t care though, he was just relieved his master wasn’t... overreacting. He grinned happily as he began unburdening himself. There was no way his wonderful and ever so wise master would make fun of him.

“You see...,” a relieved Blacknail began explaining.

“Nope, keep it to yourself,” Saeter interjected quickly, as his one eye twitched.

“But…,” the hobgoblin exclaimed in confusion.

“Some things you need to solve for yourself,” his master explained simply with a blank face. “Now come with me, Herad wants us.”

Blacknail then watched in confusion as his master turned around and headed for the door.

“Ugh, I don’t even want to think about it,” Saeter muttered quietly to himself a few seconds later, as he shivered slightly.

What had just happened? The hobgoblin was glad his master didn’t seem to care, that was obviously the best outcome, but he also felt more than a little slighted.

Saeter should have at least listened a little bit. Not that Blacknail wanted to tell him anything, of course. Yet surely, the whole situation was interesting and worth talking about, right?

The confused hobgoblin was left there crouching on the floor of the hallway all by himself. He stared after his master for a second before his thoughts untangled themselves. Then with a start, he remembered that Saeter had told him that he’d been summoned by Herad.

Quickly, he got up and hurried after his master. No matter how embarrassed he was it would still be a terrible idea to anger the chieftain. He was fairly certain he couldn’t actually die of embarrassment, but he couldn’t say the same thing about being stabbed.

Blacknail quickly caught up with Saeter, and then followed him to the other side of the building. Their destination soon became apparent; it was the sitting room where they’d met with their mistress after Galive’s death.

Saeter walked right in, but Blacknail took a second to peek around the doorway before entering. He was still feeling more than a little shy, and didn’t want to run into any unpleasant surprises.

Herad was lounging back on a sofa in the middle of the room, and was scowling darkly at everyone she saw. The bandit chieftain definitely seemed to be in a bad mood. She was wearing pair of long black trousers, and a dark brown leather vest over a black shirt. She held a silver goblet up in one hand while her other hand massaged the pommel of a dagger sheathed at her hip.

Blacknail hesitated to walk into the room when she was so angry. However, Herad quickly noticed him standing in the doorway and glared at him, so the hobgoblin immediately straightened up and walked nonchalantly in as if he hadn’t just been hiding out of sight.

There were only a few other people in the room, and all of them were members of Herad’s tribe. Blacknail headed towards where his master stood in a deserted corner of the room. Once there, he kept to his master’s shadow and as out of sight as possible. He was still feeling a bit awkward about being around humans, and with Herad in such a bad mood it was best not to attract attention.

It took a few moments for everyone invited to arrive in the sitting room, but no one said anything as they waited. Their boss’ dark mood hung in the air, and no one dared break the silence. There were an awful lot of anxious glances being exchanged between the bandits, though.

When the last person arrived, Herad’s personal guards sealed the room. Blacknail jumped a little as the doors were slammed shut; not having anywhere to run made him fidgety and nervous. It was only then that Herad finally spoke up.

“I just got an interesting message from an information broker. It said they owed me a favor for services rendered by a subordinate of mine, and it was sealed with a lipstick mark,” she announced coldly.

No one said anything as Herad slowly gazed around the room and at everyone there one by one. Her eyes lingered on some people more than others, and thankfully they completely overlooked Blacknail. He was still hiding behind his master.

“I don’t know who exactly it was referring to, but I have my suspicions. Some people lack discipline, and have a bad habit of sticking their nose in things that don’t concern them,” Herad said as she glared coldly at Saeter.

The old scout was stone faced and kept his expression carefully blank, but when Herad looked away he gave Blacknail a dark suspicious look out of the corner of his eye. The hobgoblin quickly turned away and tried to look innocent. He thought he managed to pull it off.

“That’s not of immediate concern, though. What’s important is that the message contains a lot of details on Zelena’s movements and plans. Some of it is easily verifiable, but most of it isn’t. The sender also expressed concern about Zelena’s schemes to control Daggerpoint, and wished us luck in defeating her,” the bandit chieftain explained.

“We get tips and word from all kinds of information dealers almost every day, so what makes this one stand out?” someone brave asked.

Herad nodded and smiled darkly at no one in particular. Blacknail thought she was trying not to look at Saeter, although he wasn’t sure why.

“I’ve heard of this broker before, and the letter also contains information on my own movements. It lists things I’d thought I’d kept secret. Thus, I’m willing to believe most the information on Zelena is also reliable,” Herad explained.

“I’m guessing it’s not good news,” an older female bandit commented reluctantly.

“No, it’s not. As most of you know, I’ve managed to cripple or thwart practically all of Zelena’s schemes. She hasn’t been able to turn most the other chieftains against me, or at least she hasn’t been able to get their direct support for any sort of attack. They’re too afraid of me to risk that,” Herad remarked arrogantly.

“They should be afraid of you. You’re the deadliest fighter in the city, and from what I’ve heard you’ve been dispatching Zelen’s pet captains left and right,” another man replied proudly.

This time Herad’s dark eyes were hard and cold as she responded.

“All very true, but I can’t do everything myself. According to the information I’ve received, Zelena has abandoned her plan to turn most the other chieftains against me, and since her assassination attempt also failed, she’s now planning to simply purchase enough men to launch a frontal attack on us,” she explained.

Some of the bandits gasped in shock, others blinked in confusion, but most didn’t seem too concerned by the news. Blacknail himself understood what Herad had said, but he didn’t really know what to think about it. He had no idea how many people there were in the city, or how many warriors each tribe had. He just knew there were a lot.

“Even if she buys up all the loose scum and hired muscle in the city, and lures a fair number of hands away from other chieftains as well, she’d still have a very hard time defeating us in any direct attack. She didn’t bring all that many of Werrick’s men with her East,” Saeter remarked thoughtfully.

“Without Werrick’s veterans to stiffen their spines anyone they hire is unlikely to be of much use anyway,” another man added dismissively.

Several of the other people in the room apparently agreed with him, because they nodded and made approving noises. Herad wasn’t one of them.

“That’s true, and Zelena realizes this as well. Only an idiot wouldn’t, and while Zelena is many other things, she isn’t an idiot. That’s why she has purchased the services of a small group of mercenaries. According to the letter I received they’re due to arrive sometime next week,” she explained grimly.

The reaction to this news was more dramatic. Dark muttering and swearing filled the room.

“Where in all the hells is she getting all that bloody coin?” someone asked in surprise.

“Fuck,” someone else cursed.

“It can’t all be from Werrick’s spoils out west. Even he couldn’t be making that much from robbing and pillaging. Zelena’s throwing gold around like It’s well water,” another bandit remarked in frustration.

“Are the other chiefs going to allow that? No one’s ever brought a force like that into Daggerpoint. It’s going to make a lot of people nervous, especially the Governor,” someone else added.

“She seems to think she can get away with it,” Herad told them.

“It’s not that much different from hiring the normal thugs and rift raft. Half of them are deserters anyway. There are certainly no rules against it and the rules around here are pretty fluid anyway,” Saeter commented.

“And if anyone complains about it then she has a nice force of mercs at hand to silence them,” a scarred bandit added with dry humor.

“What are you planning to do about it?” Saeter asked Herad calmly over the din.

The old scout didn’t seem too concerned, and so neither was Blacknail. He trusted his master to know what to do.

“There aren’t that many options. Ideally, I’d just have Zelena assassinated, but word is the assassins have her squirreled away somewhere secret. That also means we can’t attack her before the mercenaries get here,” the bandit leader replied.

“And we can’t exactly start a fight with every chief whose minions might join her, or all the free agents in Daggerpoint,” Saeter pointed out.

“So we’re doomed?” another bandit asked nervously.

Herad snorted disdainfully in response, and threw the man a disapproving glare. He wilted under her attention.

“Having a group of mercenaries at her side hardly makes Zelena invincible. Bringing them into town will make her enemies, and we can use that,” she told all her minions in a voice full of steady authority.

Instantly, the room quieted and everyone calmed down. The panic hadn’t subsided completely though, a hint of it lingered in the room.

“How?” someone asked expectantly.

“Simple, we build up alliances of our own, and then crush Zelena’s coin bought soldiers. They’re mercs, so they won’t be sticking around. That means Zelena has to attack us, and that gives us the advantage. Now that we know they’re coming we can fortify the base, and prepare our forces. When Zelena attacks she’ll be walking into a trap,” Herad answered.

“Sounds like it could work. This is a nice defensive location,” Saeter added in support of his boss.

“What do we know about the sell swords?” someone asked.

“They’re an infantry company called the Leather Heels. The broker didn’t know much about them, except that they’re from down south and that they’ve seen a few battles,” Herad explained.

“Too bad Vorscha isn’t around, she’d know more about this company,” Saeter mused.

“It would also be nice to have her here for the fight. There’s no one I would rather have at my back,” another man added.

“She’s needed where she is, and couldn’t get here in time anyway. We have more than enough men for this plan, though,” Herad remarked confidently.

“I’m guessing you want us all to keep this to ourselves?” Saeter asked her.

“Obviously, a trap only works if the victims don’t know it’s a trap. None of you are to share this information with anyone, including your subordinates. I wouldn’t even be telling all of you this if it wasn’t necessary. Just remember, if you open your mouth I’ll find out about it, and then I’ll seal your lips permanently. No second chances; I don’t care if you’re drunk or even being tortured,” Herad told them threateningly, as she gazed around the room.

There were grim nods of acknowledgement from most the bandits present. No one seemed to think she was exaggerating. Blacknail made a mental note to remember to forget that this entire conversation had ever happened. He was taking no chances.

A few minutes later after Herad started explaining the details of her plan, Blacknail began to grow bored of all the talking. He sighed quietly to himself and stifled a yawn. That was when Herad spoke up in an excited tone that immediately caught the hobgoblin’s attention.

“Some of you might be questioning me, and thinking that I'm a poor bet, but that couldn’t be further from the truth. It’s Zelena that’s desperate here, not me. I’ve knocked that bitch on her ass every time she has tried something, and this latest stupid ploy of hers will be no different. When her last desperate gamble falls apart, and we flood the streets with the blood of every petty thug stupid enough to accept her coin, then there will be no one left to challenge me. I will be the undisputed ruler of my territory, and the top dog in Daggerpoint and beyond. Then, a new age will dawn in the North, my age, and all of you here will reap the benefits!” she announced eagerly.

Loud cheering broke out in the room, as the bandits’ greed and pride got the better of them. All trace of their earlier fear and uncertainty had disappeared. Herad saw their reaction and grinned hungrily. Her ambition and blood lust was plain as day.

Blacknail giggled and licked his lips, as he pictured all the fun things that were about to happen. It seemed like his tribe was about to go to war. It was about bloody time!











QOS 2







Now that all of her minions were solidly behind her, Herad started organizing them. Her short black hair fell over her forehead, as she leaned forward over the table in front of her sofa and gave out her orders.

“Corveyn, you’re in charge of defenses. I want work parties organized and this place fortified as much as possible. If you need funds then you’ll have them,” she said.

“Not a problem. I already have a few surprises in mind for our guests when they arrive,” a man who Blacknail assumed was Corveyn replied.

He was one of the men who had joined the tribe after they’d arrived in Daggerpoint. All these new hires were beneath Blacknail’s notice, unless they had something he wanted, so he hadn’t bothered to learn their names. He was Herad’s favorite after all, and they were just rookies.

“Saeter, I want you to get in touch with some of your old contacts. See if you can recruit a few more good men, or at least convince as many as possible not to join up with Zelena when she starts spreading that coin of hers around. They can’t spend it if they’re dead,” the chieftain told Blacknail’s master.

Saeter nodded calmly in acknowledgment, and Blacknail stepped out from where he’d been hiding behind him. The hobgoblin then smiled hopefully at his mistress. He wanted a job too!

However, Herad didn’t even glance his way as she issued orders to the other bandits. Blacknail pouted sulkily as he gazed Herad’s way. Why hadn’t she given him a job? He was far more useful than most of these lazy humans. Surely, there was someone who needed killing, or maybe some pies that needed stealing?

Herad happened to glance back his way, and she noticed his demeanor. The bandit chieftain rolled her eyes disdainfully, but then gave him a wicked grin. The hobgoblin returned her smile hopefully.

“Don’t worry, Blacknail. I’m sure an opportunity will present itself and I’ll find someone for you to hunt. It might even be someone in this room if they disappoint me enough,” she chuckled darkly and loudly enough that everyone in the room undoubtedly heard her.

Muted muttering broke out between the bandits as several people looked Blacknail’s way, and the hobgoblin heard his master grunt in disapproval. He wasn’t sure why Saeter wasn’t pleased, though. Blacknail was glad that Herad trusted him to hunt her enemies for her, and he enjoyed the fearful looks he was getting.

The new members were barely part of the tribe anyway. None of them had been around nearly as long as him! He’d joined the tribe a whole um… lots of months ago! That was practically forever.

In a tribe it was natural for the weak to fear the strong, and for them to be kept in their place. Everyone was certainly very afraid of Herad!

The fact that the chieftain had mentioned Blacknail personally obviously meant she considered him to be only one step below herself in position and toughness. Maybe his master was jealous?

“Alright, that’s enough gabbing from you lot; it’s time to get to work. Get on out of here,” Herad announced loudly.

Her voice cut through the commotion around her, and everyone else instantly grew silent and jumped to obey her. Soon, all of the bandits were walking through the doors and exiting the room. .

Saeter let most of the other bandits leave, and get out of the way, before heading out himself. Blacknail followed him closely, and as soon as they were alone in the hallway Saeter turned to him.

“Listen Blacknail, you shouldn’t be happy about being picked out like that by Herad,” the old scout told the hobgoblin seriously.

Blacknail frowned at his master’s comment. He didn’t understand why Saeter was upset.

“It means she trusts me, and that I’m dangerous!” the hobgoblin bragged cheerfully.

“Maybe, but it will also make your own comrades afraid of you,” the grey haired scout replied.

“They should be afraid of me; I’m much faster and smarter-ss than them. None of them could challenge me,” Blacknail pointed out arrogantly.

“That’s not the point, Blacknail. Herad’s words were meant to set you against the rest of the tribe. If they’re too afraid of you then they will see you as a threat, and then they won’t have your back later, or they might even try to take you out,” Saeter explained.

The hobgoblin gave his master a confused look. Wouldn’t most of them do that anyway?

“Obviously, I’m stronger than them so I don’t-ss need their help, and they won’t dare attack if they’re afraid of me,” he replied as if he was stating the obvious.

“And if they gang up against you, or simply leave you to die somewhere?” Saeter asked.

Blacknail squinted and scratched his long green nose, as he considered that idea. He didn’t like it. Humans sure were a sneaky race. How was a poor hobgoblin supposed to keep himself safe?

“What do you think I should do?” he asked his master reluctantly.

“You need to show them you’re more than just a killer, and that they’re your comrades and friends,” the old scout replied.

“So I need to outsmart and trick-ss them…” Blacknail mused aloud. “That should be easy; I’m a great actor!”

Saeter sighed in resignation, and gave the hobgoblin an annoyed look.

“Sure, whatever works,” he told Blacknail as he shook his head.

“You sure are tricky, master!” Blacknail replied happily.

“Go get your mask and gear, Blacknail. I may as well get started on recruiting for Herad right away, and that means you’ll be coming with me,” Saeter told him irritably, as they moved.

“Where are we going?” the hobgoblin asked curiously.

“We’re going to a bar. There’s some people there I should talk to,” Saeter replied.

“Why?” the hobgoblin asked.

“I need a drink; talking to you has given me a headache. Also, I used to move between the smaller bands a bit before I joined up with Herad, so I know some of the people. The kind of coin Zelena has will seem awfully tempting to them, but most should listen to reason,” Saeter explained.

“Bah, why is Herad worried about a few tribeless humans? She should just kill them all, if they’re going to become our enemies,” Blacknail suggested.

“That’s a bloody stupid idea! Try to actually use that skinny green head of yours, Blacknail. Fighting them would just hurt us, and we’re trying to recruit some of them, remember?” Saeter replied heatedly.

“Oh, you’re right-ss, sorry master,” Blacknail responded. “So first we recruit, and then-ss we make the new members fight the others for-ss us. If they die we don’t even have to give them shinnies!”

Saeter turned around and swatted the hobgoblin atop his head. Blacknail hadn’t been expecting it, so he didn’t manage to dodge the blow in time.

“Ouch,” he whined, as he took a step back and rubbed his now sore ear.

Saeter glared at him furiously, and Blacknail wilted under his gaze. What had he said wrong? He’d thought that was a great idea…

“We’re trying to avoid making more enemies, Blacknail. Daggerpoint is a pretty immoral place, but even here bloody killing sprees in the streets are frowned upon,” Saeter explained.

“Why would anyone-ss care what we do to our enemies?” the hobgoblin asked with honest curiosity.

Saeter sighed in frustration and gave the hobgoblin a brooding look. Blacknail met his gaze with a confused expression. It seemed like his master was thinking deeply about something unpleasant. He hoped he wasn’t about to be smacked again…

“You can’t just go around killing everyone, even in the North” Saeter explained a few seconds later. “This piss poor excuse for a city is still a city, and it needs to stay at least somewhat civilized. If everyone just started killing everyone else then Daggerpoint would fall apart. No one would be able to buy food, clothes, or build shelter. Soon after that almost everyone would be dead or have left.”

“But the strongest would-ss hold the territory; it would all be his,” Blacknail countered.

“So what? It’s the people that make the city valuable,” Saeter replied. “It’s not like the wilds, were you can make most things for yourself. In a city you need lots of people to buy, sell, and make things. An empty city is worth less than a mud pit.”

The hobgoblin tried to wrap his head around that. It sort of made sense to him, maybe.

“So, if I were to kill-ss the maker of tasty pastries then he couldn’t make any more-ss of them, and if I were to start killing too many people he might-ss run away,” the hobgoblin muttered thoughtfully.

Saeter rolled his eyes.

“Kind of; it’s a bit more complicated than that, though. If you scare away or kill too many other people then who will buy his goods? If there’s no one to sell pastries to then he’ll leave. The city is sort of like… an animal. It can take a few cuts and scrapes, but if you wound it too deeply or hit the wrong spot then it will die,” Saeter told him.

Blacknail nodded at his master’s words. He could picture that. All the people in a city were kind of like the different squishy bits inside a rabbit, they were even the right color.

The hobgoblin frowned as another thought occurred to him. Were there green bits inside animals? He then shook his head to clear his thoughts. He should probably concentrate on Saeter’s words; he could always search through the insides of a rabbit later.

“I think-ss I understand, master, but I still think there must be a less boring way-ss to do this,” Blacknail told the old scout.

“If you can come up with one then knock yourself out,” Saeter replied condescendingly.

Blacknail was a smart hobgoblin, so he knew his master didn’t want him to actually bash himself across the head. His words were just a weird way humans gave people permission, or so Khita had explained when Blacknail had woken up after the first time Saeter had used that expression.

“So, we can’t do anything too scary… I know! They’re weak and alone without a tribe, so I’ll come back at night and kill them from the shadow where no one can see,” Blacknail announced proudly.

Saeter eyed him critically.

“I’m not sure you understand how many of them there are. We’re talking about a good part of the people in the city. Even you couldn’t pull that off, and some of them are very skilled. I used to be one, remember,” he told the hobgoblin.

“How about just their leaders then, so the others will flee in terror?” Blacknail mused thoughtfully.

“Sure, that sounds fine,” Saeter replied.

“Really?” Blacknail asked hopefully.

“No, that’s a bloody stupid idea! There’s still far too many of them for that to work,” Saeter answered scathingly.

“Fine whatever, you said they all live in their own part of the city?” Blacknail asked sulkily.

There had to be some way to solve this problem that wasn’t as boring as talking. It wasn’t like humans were usually all that hard to murder.

“Well, they can hardly live in an area controlled by a gang leader, and the Governor’s territory is too expensive for them,” Saeter replied.

“Ha, it’s simple then. We’ll just burn all their homes down in the middle of the night, and kill them as they flee before us,” Blacknail suggested gleefully.

“Creepily enough, that might actually work. We’re not going to do it, though. That would definitely count as too much damage to the city, and every time you kill someone you might be making someone else your enemy.” Saeter told him.

“…but the flames would be so pretty,” Blacknail muttered to himself.

This was very complicated. He supposed his master had a point though. Killing that one woman who had been with Galive had made Luphera angry. There were just so many humans shoved into Daggerpoint that he supposed they all knew each other or something.

“So if we can’t kill people then what do we do?” he whined.

“I already told you. I’m going to go talk to some people, and you’re going to follow me,” his master replied.

“That doesn’t sound very fun,” Blacknail commented darkly.

In fact, it sounded very boring, and over the last few days the hobgoblin had slowly come to realize that talking wasn’t one of his strong points.

“Not everything is supposed to be fun; think of this as a chore if you want. Personally, I think sharing a few drinks with some old acquaintances sounds bloody great right now, so get moving, and stop asking me these damned annoying questions,” Saeter crankily replied.

Blacknail grumbled to himself but quickly headed over to his room to get dressed. A few minutes later he rejoined his master and together they left their band’s base and headed out into the city.

Saeter led Blacknail towards their destination. It was only just after noon, so Daggerpoint was busy and the streets were full of its myriad colorful inhabitants.

Merchants hawked their wares from stalls or store fronts. The more successful ones had bodyguards at their sides, to prevent theft or other problems. The others simply glared suspiciously at everyone that approached, and kept one hand on a weapon.

Small groups of thugs, and what passed for normal citizens, were also walking around. It could have been a scene from any other city, except everyone’s clothes were rough and practical looking, and almost everyone was visibly armed. Knives and swords appeared to be the weapons of choice, but several people had clubs, and one man was even walking around with a spiked mace in his hand.

The hobgoblin and Saeter weaved their way through the crowds while keeping their distance from most of the other people. The only interruption was when Saeter had to stop and drag an errant Blacknail away from where he was attempting to purchase an unidentifiable piece of meat on a stick, using money he had somehow acquired from another man’s pocket after bumping into him.

Saeter then took them off the main roads and through the less travelled alleys and narrower residential streets. They were about to walk around a tight corner when Blacknail realized they were surrounded, and about to be ambushed. They’d walked right into a trap.

The hobgoblin's ears went flat against his head, as he hissed a loud warning to his master. Saeter flinched and dropped his hand towards his sword hilt. Before he could draw his weapon though, several figures burst out hiding and rushed towards the pair, several very small figures.

The street children ran over and quickly surrounded the two bandits. They kept their distance though, and stayed out of attack range. Their clothes were ragged and filthy. Blacknail could see their ugly pink skin through the holes in it.

“Please sir, do you have any coins to spare? My sister is sick and I can’t afford food for us both,” a taller male begged with wide desperate eyes.

“My parents beat me unless I bring home enough coins, please help me,” a smaller girl whined.

“I don’t have any parents, they were killed by a gang of thieves,” a third said, in a clear attempt to upstage the others.

Saeter sighed and began to pull out his coin pouch, but he wasn’t as fast as Blacknail. The hobgoblin had also reached into a pouch, but he pulled out a handful of small stones, and then hurled them towards several of the children.

The youngsters saw the projectiles coming and quickly scrambled out of the way. The stones bounced off their turned backs and raised arms, or flew harmlessly past. Blacknail then hissed and charged them. He reached for the closest annoying little thing’s neck, but was stopped by a swift tug on the back of his cloak.

The children took this opportunity to make a break for it. They gasped, shrieked, and fled from Blacknail’s masked form as fast as their little legs could take them.

“What in all the hells do you think you’re doing?” Saeter swore angrily at Blacknail, as he held his cloak.

“Chasing away-ss the little thieves! If you let the small ones close they’ll take-ss your stuff,” Blacknail replied wearily. His master seemed really angry.

“They’re street children, you shouldn’t attack them! They might be annoying, but if you give them a few coins they’ll leave,” Saeter explained scathingly, as he glared furiously at Blacknail.

“But-ss, if I just chase them away then I don’t need-ss to give them any of my shiny coins,” Blacknail pointed out reproachfully. That was just common sense.

“Listen carefully, Blacknail. I know you don’t understand morality, but by the gods you’re going to understand this. You don’t need your coins as much as those children do. You don’t even spend most of them; you just hoard them!” Saeter growled angrily.

“I don’t understand,” a startled hobgoblin replied with wide eyed confusion.

“It’s called charity, Blacknail. You give some coins to others who need them more than you. Those children will starve or freeze in the winter without the money they get from begging, if they aren’t murdered by a random thug,” the old scout explained.

“They look fat-ss and healthy to me,” Blacknail countered defensively.

“That’s because you’re a stupid hobgoblin. Humans aren’t supposed to be dressed in rags and that thin” Saeter told him.

“But, there’s food everywhere-ss here. You humans pile it in the street. Look right-ss over there, there’s a cat! A morsel-ss like that is a tasty feast for a little goblin or person, and they’re not that hard to catch,” Blacknail pointed out.

“Humans don’t eat that stuff,” Saeter explained irritably.

“Why wouldn’t they, if they’re hungry? They’re just spoiled by human food,” the hobgoblin replied dismissively, as he glanced in the direction most of the children had run.

“They’d get sick, Blacknail! Human children aren’t goblins. They can’t eat garbage and hunt cats through the streets!” Saeter exclaimed.

“They could if you gave them slings, they’re not that slow and weak,” Blacknail replied.

Saeter sighed in defeat, and then gave Blacknail a hard intense look.

“Forget it, Blacknail. Just don’t hit any more children, ever. If you do then I’ll give you the worst beating of your life, and then get Khita to nurse you back to health,” Saeter told the hobgoblin.

“Fine, but I’m not giving them shinnies… I mean coins,” Blacknail replied darkly, before shuddering at the thought of being stuck defenseless with Khita for days. His master was a very scary human.

Saeter just grunted and continued walking down the now empty alley. Blacknail cast another suspicious glance back towards the way most of the small humans had fled, before hurrying after his master. 









QOS 3








Saeter led the hobgoblin through several more back streets, before they emerged back into a more public area. The street ahead of them was wide and mostly empty. It was bordered by worn down looking but well maintained homes. Everything had a well used feeling to it.

There were no crowds bustling about in this part of the city. Only a few tough looking men and women could be seen walking together in small groups. The people here seemed to like to keep to themselves; there wasn’t a lot of talking or noise.

Saeter and Blacknail silently passed these people by, as they made their way down the street. After several minutes of walking, Blacknail noticed a building that was clearly not a home of any sort.

It was much larger than the two houses that were on either side of it, even if it had the same worn down aura. Most tellingly though, there was a sign that hung out above the door, so Blacknail knew that meant he was looking at a human tavern. Unsurprisingly, it also appeared that Saeter was walking right towards it.

Blacknail sighed in resignation as they walked up the creaky wooden steps of the tavern. He could already smell booze and the door wasn’t even open yet. When Saeter opened the door, he sneezed wetly beneath his mask as the scent of alcohol and human sweat washed over him.

The inside of the building was uncomfortably warm and stuffed full of humans. Apparently, the reason the streets were so empty was because everyone was in here, and by the smell of it none of them had bothered washing. 

The floor of the tavern was rugged stone and totally uncovered. The walls were rough looking wood and completely bare of decoration.

There were a few tables and benches scattered about, but not enough for everyone, so a lot of people were standing around in small groups. Almost everyone inside was dressed in rough workmen’s clothing, including a lot of the women. Only a few women were wearing long plain dresses and shirts instead.

Saeter and the hobgoblin got more than a few glances as they moved into the room. Unlike outside, no one here was hooded. Blacknail hissed nervously as he realized he stood out from the crowd. He didn’t like being the center of attention.

The hobgoblin's posture stiffened, but Saeter ignored everyone else and walked up to the bar. A second later Blacknail hurried after him. He felt much safer beside his master.

The bald barkeep was round and fat even for a human. He lazily turned to look their way as they approached, and then he scowled in irritation. Blacknail didn’t think the man was reacting to them; it seemed more likely that he always grimaced like that at everyone. His thick face was certainly lined enough for it.

As the barkeep glowered thoughtfully at Saeter and Blacknail, a flash of recognition suddenly appeared in the large man’s eyes.

“Huh, I thought you were dead,” he grunted at Saeter.

“I’m impossible to kill, you should know that,” the old scout replied gruffly.

“You haven’t been by in a few years. At your age that usually means a man has retired or died, and you never struck me as the retiring type,” the innkeeper explained with a ponderous shrug of his shoulders.

“True enough,” Saeter responded as he took up position on the other side of the long crude wooden bar from the man.

“Who is your friend?” the innkeeper inquired, with a nod and a suspicious glance at Blacknail.

“He’s a friend of mine; you don’t need to worry about him,” the old scout answered.

The innkeeper didn’t seem convinced; he eyed the hobgoblin suspiciously. He also apparently wasn’t the curious sort though, because a few seconds later he just shrugged and changed the topic.

“Well then, what brings you back here? Don’t tell me you’re looking for work,” the innkeeper asked.

“No, I have a permanent employer these days. I’m just here to tickle some ears,” Saeter replied.

“Well the bulletin board's still over there. Feel free to post something,” the large bald man remarked.

“I’m looking for something a little more thorough than that. Maybe you could help me spread the word?” Saeter responded.

“Depends on what you want said,” the innkeeper explained.

He then looked past the pair at another group of patrons who were across the room. Saeter ignored his rude behavior and continued talking.

“I hear Zelena is going to be looking for some muscle soon. When her men come around I want it known that it’s a bad deal, no matter what they pay. The kind of deal that puts a man in an early grave,” he said.

The innkeeper huffed in annoyance and turned back to scowl darkly at Saeter.

“Not likely, and not even for you. I find it healthy to stay out of local politics, and that’s what this smells like to me,” he replied.

“I’m not lying. Zelena will use up anyone she hires and throw them away. Her plan is already a failure, and it’s just going to get anyone she hires killed,” Saeter explained irritably.

“Oh, I trust your word, Old Raven. I can’t say that about many men, but I’ll say it about you. That doesn’t change nothing though; I’m still not going to get involved. Men die every day here in Daggerpoint, and everyone here knows the risks when they take a job,” the barkeep responded grimly.

“I can pay up front,” Saeter offered.

“I imagine so can Zelena. It’s not about the coin,” the bald man replied.

Saeter sighed and frowned. He then looked around the room, and he didn’t seem to like what he saw. He grimaced as he took in all the people staring at him and Blacknail. The hobgoblin had started to nervously clutch the hilt of the sword at his hip.

“I don’t remember this place being so full before, and I can’t say the atmosphere has improved either,” Saeter remarked.

The barkeeper turned to look at his other patrons, and then grunted in acknowledgement. It was hard to tell what he thought, as his face seemed frozen in a never ending grimace.

“People around here have become suspicious of strangers lately, especially ones that hide their face. There have been some unusual disappearances that have put people on edge,” he explained darkly.

“What do you mean disappearances?” Saeter asked suspiciously.

“Missing beggars, loners, and sometimes people just aren’t making it home at night. People think it might be ghouls,” the large man answered reluctantly.

Saeter turned to give Blacknail a thoughtful stare. Blacknail stared back blankly in return. He didn’t like the look on Saeter’s look; it usually meant he was about to tell Blacknail to do something annoying.

“I might be able to help you with that. If there are ghouls around I should be able to track them down,” Saeter offered.

“How are you going to do that, master?” Blacknail asked curiously, as he leaned closer to his master.

Saeter turned towards the hobgoblin and rolled his eyes.

“I’m not; you’re going to do it,” he answered dryly.

“Oh,” Blacknail replied uneasily.

The barkeep gave the hobgoblin a dismissive glance, and then turned back to Saeter.

“Last time I checked, ghouls are hard to track down unless you have trained dogs. The Governor is the only man in town with them, and he doesn’t bother himself with unconfirmed rumors. I don’t think your friend there will be able to do it,” he said dismissively.

“Do you doubt my tracking skills?” the old scout replied coldly.

“No, but…” the barkeeper started to say before Saeter cut him off.

“Well this… fellow here learned from me, and he’s even better at tracking some things. You might even say ghouls are his specialty,” Saeter explained boastfully.

“Don’t expect any kind of reward for this; I’m not going to change my mind about interfering in the affairs of the chiefs,” the Barkeeper responded darkly.

“Bah, ghouls are everyone’s problem. I’m not looking for a reward; I just don’t want to have to worry about this crap later. Besides, I’m just going to find them, not exterminate them. That will be up to the Governor,” Saeter replied dismissively.

Blacknail groaned; he didn’t think that was very likely. Experience had taught him that if there was trouble around then Saeter would inevitably drag him into the middle of it. He would be very surprised if they didn’t end up in a fight or fleeing for their lives.

“Fine, do what you want then, Old Fool,” the barkeep told him.

“I always do,” Saeter replied.

The two men then began talking about the details, and other things that Blacknail didn’t find very interesting. He scanned the inside of the tavern, but nothing interesting caught his attention. Luckily, Saeter finished up his conversation after only a few minutes.

“Come on, Blacknail,” the old scout said, as he walked away back towards the door.

Blacknail followed his master, but before he reached the door he turned back towards all the men and women who were throwing him dark looks.

There was no way he was going to let some grubby looking tribeless humans look down on him. The hobgoblin straightened up and met their gazes.

Several looked away, but one or two glared back. The hobgoblin let his hand drop down to the hilt of his sword, and then he growled in their direction. Suddenly, no one was looking his way.

Blacknail grinned wickedly from behind his mask. None of these smelly humans dared to challenge him! The hobgoblin skipped happily outside, and the door swung shut behind him. Ha, of course no one dared confront him; he was far too scary for weaklings like these!

“Stop wasting time,” Saeter grunted, as he looked impatiently back at Blacknail.

“I’m right-ss behind you,” the hobgoblin replied.

Saeter shook his head disdainfully, and then proceeded to walk down the street. Blacknail just smiled as he sauntered over to his master. What were they doing again? Oh right, they were tracking down ghouls…

“Why are we-ss doing this? I don’t want to go near-ss any foul black bloods,” Blacknail asked with disgust.

Some of his memories from when he’d been just a mere goblin had grown fuzzy, but he still remembered his tribe’s fight against the ghoul things perfectly. He was unlikely to ever forget it, so he didn’t really need, or want, any new memories of ghouls. They wouldn’t be good memories.

“I wasn’t planning on confronting any ghouls today. I just want you to sniff around and see if there are actually any around,” his master answered.

“Bah, why are we-ss even doing that?” Blacknail asked.

“Because we can,” Saeter grunted in reply.

His reply didn’t really answer Blacknail’s question.

“I don’t do a lot of things I could-ss, usually because you won’t let me. Don’t steal that or don’t stab thems-ss you tell me, and those things sound like much more fun than ghoul stalking,” the hobgoblin commented.

“I meant we’re doing it because no one else but us can. Remember when I told you about cities and how they can fall apart?” Saeter asked.

“No,” Blacknail replied.

Saeter sighed again.

“It was like an hour ago! Daggerpoint is like an animal, remember?” Saeter clarified.

“Oh right-ss, but we’re not killing anyone right now, so we’re not hurting-ss the city or stopping pastries from being made,” Blacknail countered.

“We may not be hurting the city, but the ghouls certainly are. They’re a sickness, and if left alone they’ll kill the city,” Saeter replied.

“…and then-ss all the pastries and tasty treats will be gone,” Blacknail sighed in defeat.

Of course, they were the only ones who could do this. Everyone else in the city was apparently useless and stupid! How had all these humans survived without him around to save them constantly?

“Right. Anyway, we’re here now. Most the disappearances have happened on this street. Sniff around and see if you can smell any ghouls,” Saeter told him, as he stopped walking and stood in the middle of the empty street.

Blacknail reluctantly nodded and did as he was told. He leaned over and began to smell random cobblestones. When he didn’t detect anything that way, he moved over to the edge of the street and sniffed the barrels and alley entrances there.

“I smell nothing,” Blacknail told Saeter, after several minutes of wandering.

“Keep trying,” Saeter grunted in reply.

The hobgoblin sighed and started over again. After several boring minutes of smelling the same untainted, but still foul, scent of humans he decided to wander down into the nearby alleys. His master didn’t seem like he was going to let Blacknail stop.

He walked over to the nearest back street entrance. It was a fairly tight alley with two rough looking houses on either side of it. The hobgoblin walked into the shadows, and idly began sniffing random things. Then he froze, and started sniffing one spot again. Saeter noticed the hobgoblin’s sudden fascination with a broken piece of board.

“Did you find their trail?” he asked eagerly.

“No,” Blacknail replied, as he sniffed the piece of wood some more.

“Then, what in all the hells are you doing?” Saeter shouted in frustration.

“I smell familiar people-ss,” Blacknail responded.

“Who?” Saeter asked curiously.

“Two of the men-ss who serve the mage Avorlus,” Blacknail answered.

“They probably live around here,” Saeter remarked dismissively.

“They bled-ss here, and so did someone else. If they hunt other men here it would explain why their base reeks so much of human blood-ss,” Blacknail mused to himself.

“What!” Saeter exclaimed in alarm. “You should have mentioned that before!”

“All mages smell of blood, just usually only-ss their own,” Blacknail replied with a shrug.

“Come on, we’re going,” Saeter suddenly growled, as he spun around.

“What about-ss the ghouls?” Blacknail asked in disbelief.

“There are no ghouls!” a furious Saeter replied, as he began stomping back out into the street. “This might actually be much worse.”

Blacknail let out a defeated grunt as he followed his master. Of course, as soon as he was resigned to having to fight a pack of ghouls, he was told the situation was actually somehow worse. Did Saeter ever deliver good news? Why did Blacknail follow him around, again?

“Are we going-ss towards the worse things, or away-ss from them?” he asked his master with morbid curiosity.

Ghouls were more than dangerous enough for Blacknail, so he really hoped they were heading away from danger. He knew his master too well to believe that, though. Saeter had some odd, and more than a little crazy, ideas about what could be considered fun.

“Away. We’re headed back to see Herad,” Saeter grunted in reply.

Blacknail felt a wave of relief wash over him at his master’s words. Somehow, against all odds, Saeter had started to actually make sense! It must be Blacknail’s lucky day.

“Good,” the hobgoblin replied cheerfully.

He then followed Saeter into a nearby alley. As the pair walked into the shadowy passage, Blacknail heard something from behind him.

He spun around just in time to see two men enter the alleyway behind them and draw their blades. Blacknail hissed loudly in alarm, as he reached for his own sword.

“This better not be another group of street kids…” Saeter started to say.

Blacknail’s master turned around to see what had alarmed the hobgoblin, and stopped talking when he noticed the two men.

“I’m thinking you two aren’t here to welcome us to the neighborhood,” Saeter remarked, as he studied the pair.

“You’ve been sniffing around where you don’t belong, so now you’re dead meat,” the leader replied.

“That’s a bad idea; we’re part of Herad’s gang, and she takes attacks against her people personally,” Saeter explained threateningly.

“That never works,” Blacknail muttered darkly.

“Well, then we just won’t tell her about this,” the closer assailant told Saeter with cruel humor.

“See, it didn’t work! It never does,” Blacknail pointed out irritably.

Saeter turned and gave him an annoyed look.

“What should I have said, then? Do you want to take over the negotiations?” he shot back at Blacknail.

“Let’s just kill them. They don’t look so tough! The one in the front is too skinny, and the one in the back looks slow and stupid,” the hobgoblin replied.

“What did you just say about me, you little bastard?” the further of the thugs asked angrily.

Blacknail sighed and shook his head. Human ears sure were pathetic if they couldn’t even hear someone talking from that short of a distance away.

“Let’s kill these assholes, quick,” one of the thugs told the other.

His companion nodded and both of them pulled a vial out of their coats. Blacknail’s eyes went wide as he watched them chug down the contents. Everyone kept telling him that Vessels were rare, but that didn’t really seem to be the case…

“See, this is why you try to talk first,” Saeter told the hobgoblin irritably.

Blacknail grunted vaguely in reply, as his master turned to face their attackers. Saeter’s face twisted into a grimace as he considered them. He looked as if he’d just swallowed something unpleasant.

“So, I was right. You two work for Avorlus,” he commented darkly.

“How the fuck…” the dark haired one started to remark.

Before he could say more though, his companion shut him up by punching him in the shoulder and giving him a cold glare.

It was the perfect opportunity to hit them with a surprise attack, so Blacknail stealthy reached into one of his pouches for ammo. His fingers frantically searched the inside of the bag, but he didn’t feel any stones.

Oh right, he’d thrown them all at the pack of little thieves that had ambushed him. He’d forgotten to retrieve them because Saeter had started lecturing him.

“Dog teeth,” Blacknail muttered to himself.

If there had been just one Vessel Blacknail could probably have fought him off, and if he’d been alone he could have just run for it. With Saeter here, and with two Vessels as his opponents, he didn’t know what to do. 













QOS 4









Since he had no ranged weapons available, Blacknail drew his sword. Meanwhile, Saeter reached into his coat and took out a pouch of his own. The old scout then threw a quick glance at the alleyway behind them. The hobgoblin saw the movement, and knew what Saeter wanted to know.

“There are only two of them. I hear no one behind us,” Blacknail told his master.

Saeter nodded and turned back to watch the pair of thugs who were approaching. He eyed the two men warily.

“We’re running. Follow me,” he whispered a second later.

Blacknail’s eyes widened slightly in surprise, that was not what he had expected Saeter to say.

“They’ll be fast-ss runners,” he warned his master.

Blacknail really hoped his master had a plan. Normally he was all for running away from danger, but he wasn’t sure Saeter was fast enough to escape.

“Now!” his master grunted a second later, as he started running.

Instantly, Blacknail turned and sprinted away as well, and he shoved his sword back into its sheath. Within a few short seconds he pulled ahead of the old scout.

“Blasted cowards, don’t let them escape!” one of the Vessels yelled from behind them.

The pounding of heavy footsteps then reached Blacknail’s ears as the two thugs gave chase. The hobgoblin looked over his shoulder, and winced when he saw how fast their pursuers were running down the alley towards them. The men were moving at a pace a non-boosted human would have a very hard time matching.

At this rate they would catch up within seconds. Blacknail could increase his own pace, but Saeter probably couldn’t. Desperately, the hobgoblin searched his pouches for something useful as he ran. If only he had been a mage, then he could have used magic or something against them!

One of Blacknail’s hands came to rest against his coin pouch, and he let out a resigned sigh as a annoying idea occurred to him. The hobgoblin quickly reached inside, scooped the coins into his hand, and the whipped them back at their pursuers.

“Eat-ss this, pinkies!” Blacknail yelled as the swarm of glittering projectiles flew through the air.

The two Vessels barely had time to react before the coins showered over them. They both raised their hands to protect their faces, but not in time to stop the first few projectiles.

“Fuck,” one of them swore, as a coin smashed into his forehead and drew blood.

He stumbled and slowed momentarily to wipe the blood from his face. The second pursuer winced in pain as a coin bounced off his knee cap, and he slowed as well. Behind his mask Blacknail smirked smugly at them.

Idly, he wondered if this counted as charity. The two thugs had certainly needed the money, thrown at their ugly faces, more than he had. He would have to ask Saeter later, after they finished running for their lives.

Just ahead of Blacknail, Saeter rounded a corner and momentarily disappeared out of sight. When the hobgoblin caught up he noticed that his master was emptying the pouch he’d been holding onto the ground. It had been full of little spiky pieces of metal.

“Keep running,” Saeter told him, as he finished and picked up speed again.

“I never stopped! You’re-ss the slow one, you run!” Blacknail hissed back.

“Bah, whatever,” Saeter grunted in reply, and the annoyed hobgoblin had to suppress an urge to kick his master in the ass.

The two of them only managed to run a short distance, before their pursuers rounded the corner as well. The thugs were moving very quickly, and thus they didn’t have time to notice the presents Saeter had left behind for them.

“Ugh, bloody hells! My foot,” one of them screamed, as he stepped on a spike.

The other man instantly looked down, and his eyes widened in surprise at what he saw.

“Fuck, caltrops!” he exclaimed.

The first man stumbled, and then quickly hopped out of the way. He was limping and his face was scrunched up in pain, so he was clearly no longer in any shape to continue the chase. However, the second man had been warned. He was managing to awkwardly hop across the caltrops without stepping on any, so Blacknail picked up a rock off the alley floor, and launched it at his face.

The thug was looking down at his own feet, so he didn’t see it coming at all. There was a thud as the heavy stone bounced off the side of his head. He stumbled and stepped on a caltrop. As the hobgoblin watched, his leg gave out and tipped over sideways to land on his side. As he hit the ground several more spikes were driven into his body.

“Damn you to all the hells forever!” the man screamed shrilly in pain.

Ouch, Blacknail was fairly sure that guy was no longer a problem either. Maybe he should go back there and finish them off…

“It’s not worth it, keep running,” Saeter suddenly remarked, between heavy breaths.

The old scout had clearly understood the hobgoblin’s hesitation and body language. Blacknail sighed in regret, and continued running. He’d been hoping to at least go back and get his coins, and he wouldn’t have said no to having some fun with the two men who’d attacked them.

The pair burst out of the alley and onto one of the main streets. Without slowing Saeter led Blacknail right into the middle of the crowds. Men and women pressed against the hobgoblin from all sides, but he ignored them. Several minutes later, after it was clear no one was still following them, Saeter slowed down to a walk, and moved off to the side of the road.

He was huffing and breathing heavily. His face was red and looked exhausted, but the hobgoblin had barely broken a sweat. All this easy city living was clearly making him weak.

“I think we lost them,” the grey haired scout told Blacknail. “Now, we need to get back and have a talk with Herad, though.”

It didn’t take them long to reach Herad’s compound. They passed the guards and stepped inside without a problem. Blacknail eyed his master warily as he walked. Saeter seemed to be growing more and more animated the closer they got to Herad, and that made the hobgoblin nervous.

Saeter burst through the entrance to Herad’s room, and the door slammed into the wall behind him with a loud crash. His eyes burned with rage, as he stomped into the chamber on the other side.

Blacknail stayed out in the hallway, and cowered behind the two startled looking guards that Saeter had just blown past. All three of them gave each other shocked looks, and then peered wide eyed through the doorway to see what happened next.

Herad looked up from her desk. There was a look half way between annoyance and amusement on her face. She was also reaching under her desk for something that was probably a weapon, but she relaxed and smirked when she recognized Saeter.

“Down boy,” she ordered him loudly.

Saeter stopped a few feet from her desk, and then grimaced as he realized he’d unintentionally obeyed her. Herad smiled mockingly at him.

“Good boy,” she remarked as her eyes glittered with amusement.

Saeter’s scowl deepened and he gave her an irritated look. Blacknail let out a relieved breath. It didn’t seem like they were going to fight, or that his master was about to be killed.

“I’m not a dog,” Saeter grunted.

“Then don’t act like one, old man. Knock on the door before you enter, and don’t slam it,” she told him condescendingly.

Blacknail could hear Saeter grinding his teeth as he tried to hold in his anger. Luckily, this just seemed to amuse Herad.

“I’m here because there’s something you need to know,” he said, a few seconds later.

One of Herad’s eyebrows rose as she gave Saeter an unsurprised look.

“Well, I didn’t think you stormed in here to invite me to dinner, so please go on and tell me what bug has gotten up your butt this time,” she remarked disdainfully, as she leaned back in her chair.

“Avorlus is a blood mage,” Saeter announced gravely.

The old scout met Herad’s eyes and stared her down. Herad’s mouth opened slightly and she looked momentarily lost for words. Blacknail had no idea what a blood mage was, but it sure sounded serious!

“Well… that certainly makes sense, and is useful to know. How exactly did you figure this out?” Herad calmly asked, after a moment or two of thought.

“That’s it? I just revealed there’s blood mage in our midst, and that’s all you have to say?” Saeter growled angrily.

“What is it you expect me to say?” she asked.

“I expect you to do something about it!” he replied.

“He’s useful, so I don’t really care all that much,” Herad explained emotionlessly, as her dark eyes narrowed.

“He’s a blood mage!” Saeter exclaimed in outraged disbelief.

“And now that I know what he is I can hold it over him to guarantee his cooperation, so thanks for telling me. Now shut your trap; you’re not to discuss this with anyone,” Herad ordered as she glared coldly at him.

Blacknail heard footsteps, so he turned to see Mahedium approaching the room. Herad’s guards straightened and tried to look like they hadn’t just been listening in, but the hobgoblin just gave the mage a friendly wave before peering back through the doorway.

“Don’t you know how dangerous it is to be around blood mages? Not to mention, they kill people and harvest their blood! ” Saeter pointed out.

Before Herad could answer, their conversation was interrupted as Mahedium walked into the room. They both scowled at him as he entered, but the mage didn’t seem disturbed.

“I heard you wanted me, Saeter,” the mage calmly said, as he approached Herad’s desk.

“Yes, I did! I wanted to discuss your friend Master Avorlus. Did you know he’s a blood mage?” Saeter replied angrily.

“That’s a very serious accusation. I take it you have proof?” Mahedium asked.

The young mage was still calm and composed. He held his staff in one hand, and stood straight with military discipline. With his plain face, hazel eyes, and short brown hair he looked as unremarkable as usual.

“I know he’s been abducting people off the streets, and that his home reeks of people’s blood,” Saeter replied darkly.

“He’s probably a blood mage then,” Mahedium admitted with a frown.

“Did you know?” Saeter asked threateningly.

“I had some suspicions, but nothing more,” the mage replied without concern.

“Why didn’t you say anything?” the old scout exclaimed angrily.

“It’s not something I care to accuse people of without proof,” Mahedium answered coldly.

“More like you didn’t care…” Blacknail’s master grumbled to himself.

The mage met Saeter’s angry stare without flinching. The old scout turned away from him after a second, and looked back at Herad.

“You two aren’t taking this seriously enough. Blood mages pollute the very earth, and they twist beasts into monsters!” he announced in frustration.

His face was red and he was breathing heavier than normal. This was the most worked up Blacknail had ever seen him. However, Herad just gave Saeter a flat uncaring stare.

“As far as I’m concerned, blood mages aren’t much worse than any other type of mage. I’ve never met a combat mage that didn’t have the blood of dozens of men on their hands. All that garbage about blood magic causing mutants to appear is just superstition,” Herad told him dismissively.

“That’s different, combat mages are soldiers. Blood mages prey on people for their own ends,” Saeter replied.

“I also believe there’s an important distinction there,” Mahedium added. “Also, Saeter isn’t completely wrong about the relationship between blood magic and crystal hosts.”

A triumphant look appeared on Saeter’s face, and he opened his mouth to say something, but Herad cut him off.

“Explain,” she ordered the mage.

“Blood magic comes in several forms, but it’s actually very simple. In fact, the first mages probably all used blood magic, before modern alchemical magic was created. The type I imagine Avorlus is doing, simply involves harvesting the blood of people who didn’t survive the transformation into a Vessel, and maybe some that did. He’s probably dosing the people he’s abducted, and then distilling their blood to create Elixir,” the mage explained.

“Why would he do that, and what does it have to do with mutants?” Herad asked.

“It’s a way to create more of an Elixir, even if you don’t know the formula for it. With such an endless supply of samples it also becomes much easier to study an Elixir and discover its recipe. Unfortunately, refining the blood also creates a lot of waste products that contain active crystals. It’s unlikely, but possible, that exposure to this waste could cause a creature to become a host,” Mahedium admitted.

“So, a horde of savage mutants isn’t about to tear its way through the city,” Herad said, as she glared at Saeter.

“No, most likely exposure would just kill the creatures it comes into contact with. It’s very dangerous stuff to anyone not already a mage or Vessel. I wonder how Avorlus is disposing of it,” Mahedium replied.

“One mutant would be too many. We need to stop him before it’s too late!” Saeter said.

“Your paranoid fear of mutants is getting annoying; they die like everything else,” Herad replied scornfully.

“You’ve never seen the havoc a truly dangerous crystal host can create. No man can stand against them, the empty ruins of Coroulis’ should be proof enough of that,” Saeter countered.

His face was still red from being so worked up, and he waved his hands as he talked. This clearly wasn’t an argument he was willing to lose. Of course, Herad wasn’t usually one to care what other people thought, only that they obeyed.

“Even if I wanted to do something about him, and I don’t, I’m not in a position where I can throw away such a useful ally. Perhaps, over your rather long and eventful career as a thief and murderer you’ve noticed that people who play at being a hero, and who involve themselves in events that aren’t any of their damn business, end up dead or as failures. That’s not a mistake I intend to make,” she replied harshly, and with obvious scorn.

“Some things are more important than petty gains, and worth sacrificing for. Maybe, becoming murder queen of the cutthroats shouldn’t be your first priority,” Saeter told her.

Herad’s chair slid back across the floor with shrill screech. A dangerous look appeared on her face as she rose to her feet. Her dark eyes narrowed as she regarded Saeter with hostility. Both Saeter and Mahedium took a step back away from her, as she walked towards them.

“You overstep yourself, Saeter! Remember that I’m the chief here, and that you work for me. You will do as I say, and nothing more, or I’ll dispose of you like so much trash,” she snarled, as she stood in front of him.

The old scout stiffened and his face went slightly pale, but he held her gaze, and his eyes were full of defiance. Blacknail hissed quietly in alarm. Why wasn’t his master backing down? He was going to get himself killed after all!

The hobgoblin held his breath as Saeter and Herad glared at each other. Blacknail’s master seemed unwilling to submit and look away, and Herad’s left hand began to creep closer towards the hilt of a dagger on her hip.

The hobgoblin began seriously considering creating a distraction, and then dragging his master away in the chaos. Maybe he could pretend there was an attack or start a fire?

Just as Herad’s fingers closed around her dagger’s pommel, Saeter finally spoke up.

“It’s as you say; you’re the boss,” he answered flatly.

Blacknail sighed in relief. Saeter then started to turn away from Herad, and head towards the door, but the bandit chieftain stopped him.

“Where do you think you’re going? I didn’t give you permission to leave,” she hissed.

Saeter froze and grimaced. It looked like he wanted to say something unwise. Blacknail held his breath again. If his master said anything stupid, and suicidal, then Blacknail was going to bash him over the head and apologize to Herad for him.

“I’m… going to go get a drink,” Saeter grunted reluctantly a second later. The hobgoblin relaxed.

“Very well; go ahead. Just remember that I meant what I said about keeping this quiet,” Herad replied smugly.

The old scout didn’t respond, he just immediately walked out of the room. Mahedium threw Saeter a concerned look but he also chose to keep his mouth shut.

Saeter walked out the door, and past the two guards and one hobgoblin who were now trying hard to look like they hadn’t been listening. Blacknail moved to follow his master as soon Saeter stomped out into the hallway, but he hesitated when he heard Herad address him.

“Blacknail, make sure the old fool behaves, or you’ll both regret it,” she told him coldly.

“Yes, mistress,” Blacknail answered , as he turned and lowered his head submissively.

“At least one of them knows who is in charge around here,” the hobgoblin heard his chieftain mutter, as he scurried quickly after Saeter.

Why couldn’t Saeter just keep his mouth shut? If he kept this up one of these days Herad was going take offense at his actions and kill him. He’d come awfully close just now, and Blacknail would rather that didn’t happen.

Saeter’s feet thudded against the wooden floorboards as he stomped through the building. He was obviously still furious, so Blacknail hesitated to approach him. He should probably try to cheer his master up, though.

“I could just kill Avorlus for you, or we could do it together, master. I’ve gotten very good at the sneaking and stabbing,” Blacknail offered hopefully, as he walked up beside Saeter.

“You’re not helping, Blacknail. I’ve done a lot of immoral things in my life, but I’m not an assassin,” the old scout replied.

“I am, so I’ll do it for you!” the hobgoblin cheerfully pointed out.

“No,” his master sternly replied. “Stay here, I need to be alone for awhile.”

As Blacknail looked on, his master sighed tiredly and walked out the front door of Herad’s base. The hobgoblin would normally have been more than happy to let him go, but Herad had commanded him to keep an eye on Saeter. With an exasperated sigh, Blacknail stealthily crept after his master.

Things would be much easier if Saeter would just not resist the chief, or if he would at least launch a proper challenge. Of course, if he did challenge Herad he would most likely be cut to pieces, but if Herad did spare him then he would at least learn his place.

There wasn’t much chance of Saeter winning. His master really needed to realize that Herad was a lot tougher than him, so he should just do as she said. That was simply the natural order of things after all. 









QOS 5







The air in the closet was dry and stale, and with the door closed it was almost pitch black inside. Only the tiniest hint of light managed to slip in under the door. Deep at the back, behind a pile of crates and a heap of musty old sheets, there was a quiet muffled shuffling sound as a shadowy figure stirred.

Two long arms that ended in long jagged nails reached out and carefully retrieved something from under one of the sheets. There was then a sinister chuckle, as Blacknail the hobgoblin brought the wheel of cheese up to his mouth and took a luxurious bite out of it. It was so tasty and yummy!

He’d hidden his cheese wheel here several days ago, and now he was enjoying a quick snack. No one would ever think to look for his tasty treat here. As he happily chewed the strong tangy cheese, his revelry was suddenly broken by the sound of raised voices.

Last night he’d followed Saeter out into the city, but nothing interesting had happened. Herad had ordered Blacknail to look out for his master, so he had carefully shadowed Saeter through the streets. The old scout had just wandered to the nearest tavern though, and spent the afternoon drinking.

Blacknail had slipped into the tavern as well, and sat down at a table. He’d chosen a spot across the floor from Saeter that was tucked away in a dark corner. When anyone had tried to approach him he’d simply hissed at them until they had gone away. If they hadn’t got the message then he’d drawn his dagger.

Other than the fun he’d had scaring the occasional drunk or waitress, it had been a very boring night. Eventually, his master had stumbled drunkenly home, and Blacknail had followed him back. The hobgoblin had only needed to kill one mugger to keep his master safe.

It was now the next morning, and Blacknail’s ears perked up as he detected unusual activity. Not only were a group of people discussing something rather loudly, but the sound of hurried footsteps now filled Herad’s base. Something was happening…

The hobgoblin carefully placed his cheese back in its hiding spot, and then stealthily crept out of the closet. He was curious about what was going on, but also cautious. It was entirely possible Herad was just in a mood, and had decided to put everyone to work. It was also possible she’d simply started to kill everyone she saw. In either of those cases, Blacknail wasn’t planning on going anywhere near her.

He silently made his way down the hallway and towards the speakers, until their voices got clearer. One of them was definitely Herad, but she didn’t sound angry. Rather, she sounded excited and cheerful.

Blacknail flinched as he was suddenly overwhelmed by an urge to run back to the closet and crawl under something. If Herad was happy then bad things were about to happen to somebody, and Blacknail didn’t want it to be him.

“…just a few hours away. They weren’t all that easy to count, but there are about a hundred and a dozen of them. They’re definitely a foot company; only a few of the officers were mounted,” a familiar sounding bandit was saying.

“They’re a little early, but we’re ready for them,” Herad replied.

“They were moving pretty quickly, and seemed organized. Whoever these guys are they know how to march,” the other bandit explained.

“Did you get a good look at their equipment?” Herad asked him.

“Not really; they’re transporting it in covered wagons. I don’t think there was enough room in them for all too many pikes or crossbows, though. They had shields on their backs so most of them are most likely planning on fighting with sword and shield,” he replied.

“I would prefer it if they didn’t have shields, but crossbows would have been a bigger threat. You didn’t ambush or raid them at all?” the chieftain inquired.

“No, as per your orders we held back and remained out of sight. The mercenaries didn’t give us an opening to go after. Their officers and supplies were always well protected,” he answered quickly.

“Good, the element of surprise is worth more than the loss of a few grunts to arrows from the forest. It’s important that they don’t realize that we’re expecting them,” Herad announced to everyone there. “I want every single member of the band accounted for, and equipped within the hour. The men already here are to start rolling out the heavy defenses, right away. It’s time to dig in.”

“Right away, boss,” another bandit responded, before Blacknail heard him run off.

As Herad continued to talk, Blacknail slipped into the room. He wanted to be part of the action, as well. Hopefully, Herad would give him a real job this time.

The chamber was packed full of people, most of whom Blacknail couldn’t be bothered to remember by name. He did see both Saeter and Khita, though. No one looked his way as he walked over towards his master.

“Have you been able to round up a few more horses?” Herad asked a tall lanky woman.

“No, there have been some complications there, boss,” the woman replied nervously.

“What kind of complications?” Herad asked with more than a hint of anger.

The female bandit winced and paled slightly. Blacknail was glad he wasn’t the one who’d annoyed the chieftain.

“A lot of the dealers are having problems with their stock. A lot of the animals in the city are sick. They think there’s either a flu going around, or that someone has been poisoning them. I don’t know why anyone would do that, though,” she explained quickly.

Herad grunted in acknowledgment and some of the anger left her face. It was quickly replaced by confusion. She didn’t seem to know why anyone would do that either.

Blacknail went very still, and tried to look as innocent as possible by forcing himself to smile. He wasn’t sure it was working very well. Luckily, Herad didn’t look his way. Saeter turned and gave the hobgoblin an irritated look, though.

“They started it!” Blacknail whispered to him.

His master didn’t seem convinced. The old scout sighed and shook his head, until he turned back towards Herad a second later.

“Smelly stupid horses,” the hobgoblin muttered to himself. How dare they get him in trouble! Next time he was going to use stronger poison.

“What about Zelena; is she moving?” Herad asked.

“Well, we still don’t know where she actually is, but none of her men seem to be doing anything yet,” another bandit replied. He was one of the men Blacknail couldn’t be bothered to remember.

“Good, then we probably have some time. I want you to tell the guards to lock and block every door but the main entrance, girl,” Herad said as she looked at Khita.

The young redhead pointed to herself uncertainly.

“Yes, you,” Herad replied irritably as she pointed to the door.

“I have a bloody name,” Khita muttered darkly to herself.

The young woman knew better then to disobey though, and she hurriedly headed for the exit. Blacknail watched her go, and when Khita noticed him he stuck his tongue out at her mockingly. She scowled at the hobgoblin in return, but that only made him smile smugly.

Herad then turned towards the band’s only mage. Blacknail hadn’t noticed him at first because he’d been standing at the back of a group of people and out of sight. Also, while most humans looked the same, Mahedium was even more generic looking than most.

“Mahedium, I want you to visit your friend Avorlus and deliver a message for me,” she told the mage.

He frowned in displeasure as he considered Herad’s words.

“Is he going to like this message?” he asked dryly.

“Probably not,” Herad chuckled, as she threw Saeter a smug smirk.

The old scout’s face muscles tightened and he clenched his fists, but he didn’t say anything. Mahedium sighed in resignation, and Herad handed him an envelope. The mage then nodded and left the room.

“Blacknail and Saeter, I have a job for you two as well. Saeter, I want you to take some of the other scouts out and stop anyone who tries to approach the base. I don’t want Zelena to know what she’s getting into before it’s too late,” Herad told them.

“You’re the boss, how could I refuse?” Saeter replied coldly.

“What do we do if too many enemies show up?” Blacknail asked quickly.

The hobgoblin didn’t want to give Saeter the chance to annoy Herad. He also wanted to know exactly when it was alright to run away. That was an important thing to know if there were going to be lots and lots of angry humans around.

“Fall back to the first line of defense and help defend it. I want you to keep an eye out for assassins or scouts that try to sneak past, though. That’s your main concern, Blacknail. I expect Zelena to send them in when she realizes how hard a nut we’ll be to crack, and I want you ready. It’ll be your job to deal with them,” the bandit chieftain explained.

Blacknail scowled doubtfully. If Malthus showed up he didn’t want to get in another fight with him. The annoying man was a much better sword fighter than him. Herad was giving him a very dangerous job. His expression didn’t go unnoticed.

“If you manage to handle Zelena’s Knifemen then I’ll buy you all the food you can eat,” Herad told him as she grinned sardonically.

The hobgoblin fidgeted as he considered the offer. It sounded interesting, but Blacknail wasn’t an idiot. The job was going to be very risky, so he wanted something more than just a lot of food. He wanted quality food.

“You’ll give-ss me all the expensive blue cheese and apple pies I want-ss?” the hobgoblin asked, as he licked his lips.

Herad rolled her eyes, and several bandits chuckled.

“Anything you want,” she answered dryly.

“Then I’ll do-ss it!” Blacknail replied eagerly.

The hobgoblin grinned smugly to himself. He was obviously a master negotiator! Blue cheese was worth a little danger. It smelled so good, but was very hard to find or buy.

The merchants wanted crazy amounts of coins for it, and never left it lying around, which was very rude of them. Even the thought of eating as much of it as he could swallow sent shivers of joy down his spine.

“Do you think you can handle it?” Saeter asked him with concern.

The hobgoblin looked down at the ground and began to think furiously. A few seconds later he looked up and met his master’s gaze.

“Yes, I can do it. They might be sneaky and dangerous, but they’re just humans. I also don’t have to fight them fair,” Blacknail replied with a vicious grin.

“Sounds like you have a plan,” Saeter remarked.

“It’s the best plan ever! This job will be easy,” the hobgoblin bragged as he grinned smugly.

Saeter grunted dubiously and frowned at Blacknail, but he didn’t say anything further. The hobgoblin knew his master was skeptical, but was sure his plan would work.

The meeting continued on for almost another hour, before Herad sent everyone away. Saeter immediately went off to gather men for their mission.

“Get ready to do some running and fighting. You’ll want all your gear for this, including your bow. I have to wrangle up the other members of our little party, so I’ll probably be a while. Some of them just got back, so I’ll meet you out front at the eleventh hour,” his master told him.

The hobgoblin nodded and then dashed over to his room to get his stuff. He would need all the time he could get if he wanted to prepare his surprise for Malthus and the other assassins.

He quickly wound the bandages around his arms and legs, donned his cloak, and pulled on his mask. He grabbed his backpack and filled it full of some extra rope and stakes. Then, as his master had suggested, he strapped his bow to his back and pulled on his sword belt.

When that was done, Blacknail quickly rummaged through one of his other bags. A second later, he pulled out a pair of sausages and scoffed them down. He didn’t want to run on an empty stomach.

The hobgoblin dashed out of the building. When he returned around two hours later his backpack was missing, and he was out of breath from running so hard.

Saeter was right where he’d said he would be, just outside the front entrance to Herad’s base, and he wasn’t alone. Two dozen other men were with him. Blacknail recognized them all as scouts that had been with the band since before he’d joined.

The rangers were dressed somewhat similarly to the rest of the band. If anything, their leathers and cloaks were more worn down looking than usual. Unlike most the men in Herad’s employ though, they had an aura of stillness about them. It wasn’t that they didn’t seem dangerous; it was just that that danger was tempered by patience, which was good because Blacknail was late.

“So, the hobgoblin’s finally here,” one of them commented, as Blacknail arrived.

“Good, I was beginning to think old Saeter was going to make us leave without him, and he’s probably worth two or three men for something like this,” another replied with a smile.

Blacknail gave the second man a friendly nod of acknowledgement. He had spent more time around the scouts and foresters than any of the other bandits, and was thus comfortable being around them. He also respected their skill.

“More than that, at least ten,” Blacknail bragged, which drew a round of chuckles.

A scattering of wispy white clouds filled the sky overhead, but the noon sun was still visible most of the time. A cold heavy wind was blowing from the north though, and it was pulling the dark clouds that lay thick on the skyline ever closer. Blacknail thought there was a good chance the day would soon grow dimmer.

“Alright, we’re all here, so let’s get moving,” Saeter told everyone. “Our job is to intercept anyone trying to get a good look at the compound. Gavius, I want you and seven others to watch the gap in the buildings to the West. I’ll take these eleven and watch the main road.

There were nods of agreement from everyone present. The rangers started to form their parties, but just as the groups had started to split up Saeter spoke up again.

“And remember, nobody here should try and play hero. If you see anything you can’t deal with then don’t try, go for reinforcements. It’s not our job to stop a serious advance,” he said.

“You remember it!” Blacknail muttered, as he gave his master a dark look.

If anyone here was going to end up putting themselves in danger it was almost certainly going to be Saeter, and that meant Blacknail would have to put himself in danger to help him. This time, if the old scout tried anything stupid Blacknail was going drag him away, even if he had to knock him unconscious first.

Saeter led the hobgoblin and the other rangers over to the main road, and they started walking to their destination. As they moved Blacknail observed their surroundings carefully for any signs of danger.

This part of the city was mostly deserted. The fact that it had been claimed by Herad was common knowledge, and so was her violent nature. Not that a lot of people had lived here even before the bandit chieftain had moved in.

Most buildings here were old warehouses, and two large ones rose up on either side of this part of the road. Their foundations were rough stone and mortar, but the rest of them were made of thick wooden planks. Saeter stopped and pointed to a window high up on the second floor of the building to the right.

“That spot has a good overview of the entire area. I want someone with a bow up there. If you see anyone that doesn’t belong then use standard birdcalls to tell everyone else which side of the street they’re on,” Saeter said.

“I’ll do that,” one of the scouts replied.

The man exchanged a nod with Saeter, and then headed for the entrance to the warehouse.

“Alright, you two are with me and Blacknail. The five of us will take the west side of the road. The rest of you will take the eastern side. Carvus, you’re in charge,” Saeter then explained.

There were nods of agreement all around, and then the group split into two. Scouts weren’t the most talkative of people.

“Keep those big green ears of yours open, Blacknail,” Saeter told the hobgoblin, as they walked off the street and into an alley.

“I will-ss, no one will get past me!” Blacknail replied happily.

The hobgoblin was already scanning his surroundings with all his senses. Hunting like this always made him excited, and this time was no different. The act of sneaking around while looking for prey made him feel all tingly inside. There was nothing he would rather be doing, and he couldn’t wait for some unexpecting enemy to stumble onto his path. Dealing with them would be so fun!

It had rained slightly that morning, so the loose cobblestones under Blacknail’s boots were still damp and muddy. The sun hadn’t quite risen high enough in the sky to illuminate the spaces between the buildings, so the alleyway was gloomy and full of shadows.

Blacknail heard a slight noise from up ahead, and he instantly whipped his head around to stare intently in that direction. Was it an enemy? No, a rat had just scuttled out of hiding. The hobgoblin sighed and continued following his master, as the vermin disappeared through a hole in a wall.

They continued trudging through the alleys for what seemed like forever to Blacknail, and it was boring! Why hadn’t an enemy shown up yet? The hobgoblin was beginning to think he should be going on ahead by himself. There were supposed to be lots of enemies in the city right now, so he could just go grab one of them. The sucker would never know what hit him!

Suddenly, Blacknail heard a thumping sound from down a side street up ahead. There had been a few more false alarms since the rat, so at first he didn’t think too much of it, but then the sound repeated itself several times.

It sounded suspiciously like footsteps; a large group of unknown people were approaching. Since the hobgoblin's group was out here looking for enemies it seemed likely that they'd just found some. Hooray? 












QOS 6







Blacknail hissed softly in warning, as the sound of footsteps on wet cobblestone drew closer. Saeter quickly held up a hand and signaled everyone to stop, and then looked back at Blacknail to see what was the matter. The hobgoblin responded by pointing to the source of the noise, and then making the hand gesture for people approaching.

Saeter immediately gestured for the group to split up, take cover, and ready their weapons for an ambush. Blacknail was more than happy to obey. Finally, some prey had shown itself! He hoped they had lots of shiny bits and tasty things on them he could take as trophies, like pie.

The hobgoblin quickly dashed over to a rain barrel and hid behind it, before drawing his bow. It had been a while since he had last used the weapon, but he remembered how.

It just wasn’t something he usually carried around with him in Daggerpoint, since a sling was almost as good and much less conspicuous. Experience had taught Blacknail that half of successfully hitting someone lay in making sure they didn’t know you were about to take a shot at them, and that was hard to do with a bow unless you were very far away.

The other members of his party also took cover behind various obstacles, and waited for the source of the noise to draw near. Blacknail could barely contain his excitement. He was shivering eagerly and had even started to drool in anticipation, as he listened to the footsteps approach.

The stupid humans didn’t know what was about to hit them! Unless it was Malthus of course, if it was Blacknail planned on running away as fast he could.

Soon enough, a man’s head poked out from around the corner. His wild looking hair was dirty blonde and he had a short beard. After a few seconds of staring down the street suspiciously, he then turned around and looked the other way for a few seconds, before stepping back around the corner and out of sight.

“It looks clear,” Blacknail heard him tell someone.

There was a low rumble of conversation, and then the blonde man stepped back out into the street. He was soon followed by several other men and a woman. Blacknail studied them as they walked closer. All of them were wearing rough mismatched leather armor, and were armed with short swords.

They all looked like normal Daggerpoint thugs to the hobgoblin, but they clearly weren’t just out for a morning stroll. They were far too nervous to be anything but intruders, and that meant they were fair game.

Saeter’s hiding spot was the closest to the enemy because he had been leading the group. While still concealed, Blacknail’s master flashed the signal for three, and then the one for two. Blacknail smiled eagerly as he realized it was a countdown.

Just as the lead thug stepped in a small puddle in the middle of the street, Saeter gave the go command. As one, the scouts rose from their hiding spots and unleashed a barrage of shrieking arrows. Their targets barely had time to react before the arrows ripped into them.

Howls of pain filled the air, and three of the enemy fell with feathered shafts protruding from their flesh. Their bodies hit the wet ground with a splash and went still. Two more of the enemy had been hit, but were still standing.

Blacknail hissed in annoyance. His own arrow had missed and flown harmlessly down the street. The stupid human had moved at the last second! That wasn’t fair. He had wanted to show off how great an archer he was!

“Damnation, you bloody bastards!” swore a large brown haired thug.

He had a deep gash across his arm that had been caused by an arrow grazing it, but the wound didn’t stop him from drawing his sword and charging the closest target he saw. The three uninjured thugs behind him also drew their own weapons, and charged as well. Blacknail hissed in irritation when he realized that they were headed for Saeter. Why did that always happen?

The hobgoblin was relieved that at least the last two thugs weren’t joining the attack. One was too busy cradling his arm, because it had an arrow sticking out of it. The other was uninjured, but decided to make a run for it. He dashed back the way they’d come, but didn’t get very far. A scout to Blacknail’s left calmly put an arrow right between his shoulder blades.

Saeter saw the enemies bearing down on him and threw down his bow, so he could pull out his sword. Blacknail hurriedly put his own bow down on the barrel in front of him and rushed over to support his master. Two other scouts were right behind him. They all drew their swords as they moved.

Saeter took a step back as he warded off his opponents with a wide swing of his blade. This bought Blacknail enough time to close on the thug closest to him. The hobgoblin put on a dash of speed and ducked under the surprised man’s blade. He then stabbed the tip of his sword deep into the terminally surprised man’s belly.

There was a wet sucking sound as the blade sunk into his flesh, quickly followed by a choking noise as the man collapsed and vomited up blood. Blacknail hurriedly stepped out of the way of the messy red torrent, and then kicked the kneeling man hard in the ribs, so he could pry his sword out of his guts.

That left three enemies that were still attacking Saeter. Blacknail’s master didn’t seem to be having any trouble keeping out of reach of their blades, though. He calmly side stepped any slash or stab that went anywhere near him, and soon the other two scouts reached his side.

Instantly, the odds turned against the thugs; now they were the outnumbered ones. Saeter and the other bandits took full advantage of this. All together they pressed forward and attacked, as Blacknail leaped to the side and threatened the thugs’ flank. The hobgoblin didn’t like attacking from the front.

Blades flashed through the air as Zelena’s hirelings were encircled and pushed together. The clang of steel on steel filled the alley as blade met blade.

As Saeter and the other scouts attacked and exchanged blows with their opponents, Blacknail leaped in from the side and slashed down at one the thugs’ feet. The hobgoblin’s swing didn’t connect, but it forced the man to lurch out of the way, and caused a gap to open in the intruders’ defense.

Almost immediately, one of them stumbled and a sword cut into his neck. He collapsed and the gap widened. Saeter and his men redoubled their efforts, and blood splashed against the ground as another of Zelena’s thugs was cut down. Blacknail giggled excitedly as he circled behind the remaining enemies; he sensed victory.

“Halt,” Saeter told his companions, as he held out a hand.

Blacknail and the scouts stopped their attack. The hobgoblin threw a questioning glance at Saeter. He’d been having a lot of fun, and they were just about to get to the best part, so why had Saeter made them stop?

“Throw down your weapons, and surrender. There’s no point in fighting,” the old scout told the last two thugs.

“We surrender,” the remaining man instantly replied, as he dropped his sword.

The woman was quick to follow. Both of them looked relieved, but still more than a little afraid. Their fear was understandable, since they were surrounded, and at their feet lay the bloody corpses of their former comrades.

The hobgoblin was still wound up from the fight and had to hold himself back from continuing to attack and torment the prey. He shivered as he fought down the urge to pounce on them. He really hoped this surrendering business was just Saeter’s clever way of disarming the enemy so that they were easier to finish off, but he doubted it.

Blacknail distracted himself by studying the captives. The surviving male was a shorter man with a wide build. The hobgoblin thought he looked like he had quite a bit of meat on him. He had dark eyes and dirty brown hair. He also had a short scraggly beard that did little to conceal his fat cheeks and the pockmarks on them.

The female was tall for a woman, and gaunt looking. She also had messy short brown hair and pale washed out blue eyes. Blacknail eyed her suspiciously. She seemed full of nervous energy and was constantly fidgeting. If one of them was going to try something it would probably be her. Blacknail hoped she did.

Both the captives noticed his intense stare, masked face, and agitated demeanor. The man blanched and took a step away from him, while the woman paled and froze. Their reactions simply excited Blacknail further.

“See, I told you the hobgoblin would come in handy. He led us right to them and we caught them like fish in barrel,” the ranger from earlier remarked.

“That wasn’t actually what you said,” his companion replied dryly.

“Close enough. Thanks, Blacknail,” the first man said.

“No problem; it was easy,” the hobgoblin replied cheerfully, without taking his eyes off the prisoners.

Saeter ignored the chattering going on behind him, and was also focused on the captives

“Surrendering was the right choice. Now, what were your orders?” he asked them threateningly.

“We were just told to scout ahead and report back any activity,” the male captive quickly replied.

"We’re not Zelena’s minions, we're just in this for the money. They offered us bonuses if we brought back good info. Please, don’t kill me,” the woman begged.

“Do you know anything about Zelena’s movements?” Saeter asked them harshly.

“Yes, I do,” the man replied eagerly. “She’s planning on attacking you today, and is massing her forces over at Second and Gilber Street.”

Blacknail’s master looked them over contemplatively for a few seconds, before turning to his companions.

“They’re just throwaway hirelings, and probably a distraction for the real scouts,” Saeter told them.

“What do you want to do with them?” one of Herad’s rangers asked. He didn’t sound like he really cared all that much.

The old scout turned to look at the captives again and frowned. The woman gave him a hopeful smile. Blacknail took a step forward and eagerly voiced his opinion.

“You could let them go…” he suggested eagerly.

Some of the tension disappeared from the captives’ posture, and they looked relieved.

“…and then I could hunt them down through the streets for fun,” the hobgoblin finished.

Both the captives took a hasty step back from him, and a horrified expression appeared on the woman’s face.

“That would take up too much time,” Saeter replied dryly.

“I could catch them very fast,” Blacknail remarked as he eyed the woman.

She smelled strongly of fear, and Blacknail detected a slight shiver to her movements. She was obviously more afraid than her companion, and her fear was exciting the hobgoblin. He would really enjoy hunting her. Blacknail licked his lips greedily.

“Nope, still not going to happen,” his master answered sternly, and Blacknail sighed deeply in regret.

Saeter then turned towards the two captives. There was a sad look in his eyes.

“You shouldn’t have taken this job. I don’t have time to lock you up, and you obviously can’t be trusted,” he told them.

“No, wait please!” the brunette woman wailed, before one of the scouts silenced her with a swing of his blade.

The stocky man tried to flee but Saeter stabbed him ruthlessly in the back. The old scout then sighed unhappily at the corpses at his feet.

“I wanted to do that!” Blacknail whined. His master obviously hadn’t enjoyed doing it, so why had he hogged all the action?

Saeter looked up and frowned at the hobgoblin. He looked sad for a second but his face quickly hardened.

“I have another job for you, Blacknail. I’m betting there’s another more skilled group of scouts around, and I want you to track them down. There should only be one or two of them,” he told him.

“Sure thing,” Blacknail replied happily. He would get to hunt some people down after all! That was better than just stabbing them.

The hobgoblin immediately took off at a sprint down the dirty alleyway. He had plenty of energy to burn, and within seconds he had disappeared from Saeter’s sight.

Instinct told him that anyone using the humans from earlier would have wanted to make sure their distraction did as they were told, so Blacknail back traced the enemies path, and soon stumbled on a scent that didn’t belong to them.  Someone had indeed been shadowing the first group of humans as they'd approached Herad’s territory.

From there it was simple for Blacknail to follow the new scent trail through the winding back alleys until he closed in on his prey. The man he was following wasn’t bad at moving silently and keeping out of sight, so the hobgoblin had to proceed carefully when the trail grew fresh, lest he stumble into him. He didn’t want the man to know he was being stalked, that would take the fun out of it.

Blacknail carefully scanned the shadows for any sign of movement, or anything that didn’t belong, as he moved through the alley. His prey was close now. He saw nothing though, so he closed his eyes and concentrated on listening.

The clatter of everyday activities echoed through the narrow streets from far away, but Blacknail tuned it out. A slight wheeze stirred the air somewhere to his right, and the hobgoblin’s eyes shot open. He immediately stalked towards the source of the noise. There was someone nearby.

It had come from the other side of a decrepit looking building, so rather than expose himself by walking down the street Blacknail chose a different way. Silently, the hobgoblin crept up to the wall in front of him and began to climb.

He swiftly made his way up the rough uneven wooden exterior of the building, and pulled himself up onto the roof. Ever so carefully, he stalked across the clay roof tiles until he reached the far edge, and then he looked down.

Below him a man wearing the familiar hooded cloak of an assassin was pressed up against the building. The hobgoblin watched as the man peered nervously around a corner and down the street for signs of pursuit. He appeared nervous for some reason, and that annoyed Blacknail. Had he somehow detected the hobgoblin’s presence?

Blacknail was just about to drop down on the unsuspecting assassin and assassinate him, when he heard someone else approaching. Thinking that it might be more enemies, he quickly rolled back over to the other side of the roof and out of sight.

When the new arrival turned the corner, the hobgoblin peeked over the tip of the building to see who it was, and his eyes widened in surprise. He recognized the man; it was what’s his face the bandit! He was one of the men that had joined Herad after Fang had died. Was he also looking for spies?

Much to Blacknail’s confusion, the assassin stepped out from the shadows and greeted the newcomer. What’s his face returned the greeting, and the hobgoblin’s eyes narrowed suspiciously. The man wasn’t looking for spies, he was a spy! Blacknail was definitely going to kill him.

“Do you have the information?” the assassin asked the traitor.

“I don’t know, do you have my gold?” he replied.

The assassin grunted, pulled out a small pouch, and threw it to the traitor. The bandit caught it and then opened it so he could peer inside. He seemed satisfied with the contents because he smiled and tucked it into his coat.

Upon hearing the word gold Blacknail had instantly focused on the pouch, but he hadn’t been able to see inside of it when it had been opened. If there was gold in there though, then he planned on taking the shiny stuff for his own. He didn’t actually have any gold yet, just a bit of silver.

“It’s your turn,” the assassin remarked, and the traitor nodded.

“All the information you want is in there, including stuff about her defenses and the location of her camp,” the man explained as he pulled out a scroll case, and handed it to the assassin.

“What about information on which merchants she deals with, the caravans she’s hit in the last year, and the details of her operation down South?” the assassin asked.

“Ya, that’s in there too. I don’t know why in all the hells you want that, though. It seems pretty bloody useless,” the other man replied.

The assassin just nodded, and then opened the case and looked the scroll over quickly. A few seconds later he closed it again and tucked it away.

“Good, this will do nicely. Thank you for your efforts,” the assassin replied.

The other man snorted in response.

“I know which way the winds are blowing. Herad’s no match for Warrick and the people behind him. Her days are numbered,” the traitor said.

“Very true, but then so are yours,” the assassin remarked with deceptive calm, as he lunged forward and stabbed the traitor up under his ribs.

The man coughed and crumpled lifelessly onto the alley floor. The assassin then quickly cleaned his knife off with a cloth and re-sheathed it. The corpse’s eyes were wide open in surprise, and the assassin gave it a smug smile.

He then picked the pouch up from where it had fallen on the ground, and opened it. This time Blacknail clearly saw the glint of gold from within, and he purred softly to himself.

“I'll be taking this back for myself,” the man laughed

“Nope, it’s mine,” Blacknail giggled as he dropped down on the man’s back.

“What, who?” the startled man gasped.

The impact stunned the man and he started to fall. The hobgoblin wasted no time; he started stabbing wildly at the man’s exposed sides. Before the assassin even hit the ground Blacknail had stabbed him more than half a dozen times, and then Blacknail stabbed him half a dozen more.

The grinning hobgoblin stepped off the man’s squishy body and started to loot the bloody corpses. He took the scroll as a gift for Herad, but claimed all the assassin’s knives and the pouch of gold for himself. He’d earned them after all. 







QOS 7








With his human prey laying dead on the wet cobblestones at his feet, Blacknail hurried back towards Saeter and the other scouts. He broke out into a quick run so it only took him a few minutes to find them. Thankfully, they hadn’t gone far and were just around the corner from where they’d fought Zelena’s hirelings.

When he turned the last corner and Saeter’s form came into view, Blacknail let out a deep relaxing breath. He was relieved that his master hadn’t managed to get himself into trouble while he’d been gone. He'd sort of been expecting his master to have picked a fight with a troll or something. He had no idea how or why a troll would show up in the middle of the city, but if one did he was sure Saeter would run into it.

“I’m back,” Blacknail called out as he rejoined the rangers. He didn’t want to startle them and get shot in the chest by an arrow.

“Did you find anyone?” his master asked with obvious interest.

“Yep, I found-ss two stupid humans…” the hobgoblin started to reply.

However, he was unexpectedly cut off by the shrill sound of a distant whistle. The first blast of noise was soon followed by several more, and they formed a pattern Blacknail recognized. It was the signal that enemies were coming down the road. Even the humans beside him, with their tiny useless pink ears, apparently heard it, because they turned to look in that direction.

“Time to go. Quickly, get back to the road!” Saeter commanded everyone, as he broke out into a jog.

Together the group of rangers dashed back towards the main street that led to Herad’s compound, and the lookout there that had just signaled them. As they ran Blacknail risked a quick look around.

The sun had now reached the apex of the sky. It was still cloudy overhead so it wasn’t all that bright out, but there was enough light to strip most the shadows from the tight corridors that Saeter’s group were running through. The sunlight had also finally started to dry the wet ground, and the puddles were evaporating.

Saeter’s group soon arrived near the warehouse where they had stationed the sentry earlier, and they came to a cautious stop. One of the scouts peeked out at the street from around a corner, but the roadway seemed clear. Carefully, he led the others to the entrance of the building. Blacknail listened carefully for signs of an ambush as well.

He didn’t hear anything at first, until they got close to the doorway, and then he heard a slight shuffling noise. There was at least one person concealed on the other side of it. He was just about to hiss a warning, when he got a good whiff of their scent.

The hobgoblin relaxed when he didn’t smell anyone around who wasn’t a member of Herad’s band. Sure enough, a second later a familiar face stepped out of the doorway and greeted them. It was one of the rangers Saeter had sent out earlier.

“Good, you're back. We need to get out of here. Zelena’s men are moving in force now. There’s easily a hundred of the scum coming down the road. The misbegotten bastards will be here in just a minute or two,” he told them.

“Any word from Herad about how the preparations are going?” Saeter asked him gruffly.

“No, and I don’t care. We’re not here to buy her time, if she even needs it. We were just told to stop anyone trying to get a look at our defenses until the main attack comes, and it’s bloody well here now,” the other man replied impatiently.

Saeter grunted in vague agreement before replying.

“Fine then, let’s get going. Tell the sentry to get his ass down here so we can leave,” he growled.

The other rangers soon arrived and the entire group quickly retreated down the road towards the base. The group of about a dozen rangers and the hobgoblin dashed towards safety.

As they ran, Blacknail could hear noise from behind them, and it made him more than a little anxious. It definitely sounded like people were chasing them, and he didn’t like being the hunted one. He threw a nervous look over his shoulder, but the road behind them was still empty. The clutter of hoofs on stone and the thud of boots were very clear in his ears, though.

He could also hear quite a bit of activity from up ahead, and he really hoped it was the rest of his tribe. It would be awkward if it was a trap, because then he’d have to make a break for safety and leave everyone else behind. The reason for all the noise soon became obvious however, and it wasn’t a trap.

The wide cobblestone road that led to Herad’s base was full bandits, and a tall wooden barricade now stretched all the way from the building on one side to the building on the other. It was a little taller than a human man, and had been hastily constructed out of mismatched wooden panels.

Herad herself was out front overseeing the work as her minions finished assembling the wall. Her idea of supervision seemed to involve an awful lot of screaming and insults.

“Move faster you lazy vermin! If you don’t start moving your fat asses faster then you won’t have to worry about the enemy, because I’ll kill you fucks myself!” she yelled savagely at the workers.

The bandit chieftain then noticed Saeter’s group returning and turned towards them.

“I take it that your arrival means that Zelena’s finally attacking?” she asked Saeter as they walked up to her.

“A large force of what certainly looks like Zelena’s men is coming down the road right behind us. There’s no sign of the mercenaries yet, though. How are things going here?” Saeter replied.

“Well enough, the barricade isn’t pretty, but it should do the job. The demolition crews have also finished collapsing buildings across the other ways in,” Herad answered.

“We sure are making a mess,” one of the other scouts murmured to himself.

Before Saeter could respond to Herad, her expression hardened and her hand dropped towards her sword. Thankfully she was no longer looking at Saeter though, but gazing past him instead. Both Blacknail and his master hurriedly turned to see what she was gazing at. It was probably important.

The hobgoblin growled softly as he took in the figure of a lone horseman on the empty road behind them. The rider had come to a stop well out of bowshot, and he was too far away for the hobgoblin to see details, but he seemed to be scrutinizing Herad’s barricade.

“The first enemy has arrived. Looks like you two got here just in time for the big fight,” Herad remarked.

“Oh, joy-ss,” Blacknail hissed sarcastically. He had seen human battles before, and being stuck in the middle of one was among the last places he wanted to be.

The bandit chieftain then whistled sharply to get everyone’s attention. Blacknail winced as the noise painfully pierced his skull. Ugh, he hated it when people whistled.

“Alright everyone, get to the other side of the wall. The pathetic fools we’re about to slaughter have arrived!” Herad yelled loudly enough for all her nearby minions to hear.

There was no gate in the barricade, so Saeter’s group followed Herad into a nearby building. The door was shut and locked behind them, and then a large bookcase was jammed up behind it for good measure.

With that done they stepped out of another door and into the area behind the barricade, where they would supposedly be safe. The hobgoblin was glad they had a wall, but he thought it would probably be safer to be somewhere that wasn’t about to be attacked.

A slight smile appeared on Herad’s face as she surveyed the scene before her. Her men were rushing around to put the finishing touches on the wooden barricade that loomed before them.

Blacknail thought this was a good time to give her his gift, because it looked like things were going to get very busy soon and he didn’t want to forget. He found that when people tried to kill him it was usually very distracting.

“Oh great-ss mistress, I have a present for you!” he announced loudly to catch her attention.

Herad turned around and scowled at the hobgoblin. He gave her a hopeful grin in return.

“You’d better not be about to lay some dead rat you caught on the way back here at my feet,” she remarked coldly.

“He’s a hobgoblin not a cat,” Saeter interjected dryly.

Herad just huffed impatiently for Blacknail to get to it. The hobgoblin hurriedly pulled the scroll case out from where he’d tucked it into his belt and held it out in front of himself where she could see it.

“I don’t think you’ve started writing or even reading, so what in all the hells is that?” she asked curiously as she reached out and took it from him.

“Maybe it’s hobgoblin poetry,” one of the scouts whispered to the man beside him, which caused him to snicker quietly. Blacknail ignored them.

“The vile and smelly-ss traitor gave it to the stupid human-ss assassin I killed. So I offer-ss it to you as proof of my kills,” he told Herad excitedly.

“What traitor?” Herad asked with sudden anger as her eyes narrowed dangerously.

Her expression didn’t get any better when she opened the scroll case and started reading. In fact, it got much worse.

“Umm, you know… the man. The um… pink one with the tiny ears and nose,” Blacknail stuttered in reply.

Herad looked up from her reading and scowled at him again. Blacknail cringed under her scrutiny. Why was she angry at him? Maybe he should learn people’s names after all. Why did all humans have to look so similar?

“He’s the one who smelled kind-ss of rusty all the time-ss,” the hobgoblin added hopefully.

He was disappointed; Herad’s scowl grew deeper, but thankfully she turned away from him and towards his master. Surely he hadn’t been the only one to notice that smell? Humans sure had bad senses of smell.

“Saeter, I don’t suppose you happened to see the bastard Blacknail is talking about?” Herad asked.

“Um no, sorry,” Saeter replied carefully.

Herad groaned in uncharacteristic frustration, and eyed Blacknail irritably again. The hobgoblin gave her a nervous smile back.

“Fine, whatever. Don’t worry about his bloody name, then. Tell me exactly how you got this scroll!” she commanded the hobgoblin.

Blacknail immediately launched into a rambling explanation on how he’d tracked the super dangerous eight foot tall assassin through the streets and then killed both him and the traitor in an extended knife fight. There may have been a vicious pack of dogs, or harpies, as well.

He left out the little unimportant details though, like the pouch of gold.

“Well, it seems like you handled the situation right,” Herad told the hobgoblin. “I can figure out who in all the hells the traitor was after I deal with the small army that is about to attack us. Now get back to work. I want you both to join the defensive line, but don’t forget to keep an eye out for anyone trying to sneak around it.”

“Yes, oh great-ss mistress,” Blacknail replied respectfully.

He thought it was a good idea to make sure that he was back on her good side. Herad wasn’t impressed, though.

“Shut your flapping trap and move. I’m busy,” She growled back as she turned away dismissively.

“You heard the boss; let’s get going,” Saeter told the hobgoblin.

The pair then hurried away from the irate bandit chieftain and went to find a good position. Blacknail started to head directly for the barricade, but Saeter stopped him and pointed out a nearby roof with easy access by an exterior stairway.

It was just off to one side of the barricade, was within easy bow shot of it, and had a clear view of the street. The building was also tall enough that anyone below would have trouble scaling it to get at them, so they made their way over to it.

By the time they reached the rooftop balcony the horseman had disappeared. The road in front of Herad’s barricade was now empty.

“Maybe he got-ss scared and went home. I’m very scary; people-ss run from me all the time,” Blacknail remarked hopefully.

“Not likely,” his master chuckled in reply.

Saeter and the hobgoblin weren’t the only ones getting into position; dozens of Herad’s bandits were also nearby and getting ready. The barricade was too thin to at the top to stand on but platforms had been set up behind it for people to climb up.

Most of the platforms were just stacks of crates or barrels that had been piled up behind the wooden wall. There were also one or two carts that had been dragged over. The makeshift footing looked effective though; the bandits standing on it could easily hit anyone that tried to get over the wall in front of them.

Men armed with a variety of weapons, including spears and bows, were positioned all along the barricade to defend it. As Blacknail looked down the last few men got into position and the sounds of activity died down. A sudden stillness then fell over the area, as everyone waited for the enemy to show themselves. There was nothing more to do but wait.

They didn’t have to wait all that long. Within minutes there was a clatter of hoofs as several new riders appeared at the end of the road.

One of them held a long banner. There wasn’t quite enough wind for it to unfurl, so Blacknail couldn’t make out the symbol on it, but it still looked more than a little impressive.

As all of Herad’s minions watched, the horsemen talked among themselves and observed the barricade that was blocking their way. They didn’t seem very impressed by it.

A deep keening noise suddenly rippled though the air as one of the riders raised a horn to his lips. The eerie wail washed over Blacknail and caused the hairs on his skin to rise. When the noise died down Blacknail didn’t feel any better, because it was quickly replaced by the sound of pounding footsteps, and quite a lot of them.

As Blacknail watched the horsemen cantered off to the side of the road, and a rough looking mob of men came down the street past them.

Blacknail gulped nervously as he gave up trying to count them. There must have been hundreds of them! Certainly, there were more of them than he had fingers and toes, anyway.
“They look like normal Daggerpoint riffraff. Zelena must be holding her real soldiers in reserve,” Saeter remarked matter of factly.

Blacknail eyed his master skeptically. There were even more enemies than he could see? They already outnumbered Herad’s band!

“They look more than scary enough to me. Let’s find somewhere safer to be, like the forest!” Blacknail whined.

“Bah, stop being a coward. Fighting isn’t all about numbers,” Saeter replied scornfully.

As the wave of armed and angry looking humans descended upon the barricade Blacknail got a better look at them. They did seem to be nothing special. Most of them wouldn’t have stood out if Blacknail had seen them walking down the street. Of course, this was Daggerpoint so that just meant they weren’t armed with anything larger than a short sword or a large club.

By contrast Herad’s men were better armed and shinier. Almost all of them had helmets, and many of them had weapons larger than just short swords. A few of them even had chainmail shirts and shields. None of the attackers had that sort of equipment. There were still a bloody lot of them though.

Blacknail was brought back to reality by the sound of Saeter pulling his bow string back. He looked over just in time to see his master release an arrow at the approaching enemies, and a loud twang sound echoed past him as the bowstring vibrated.

The projectile sailed over the heads of the first few advancing attackers, and then slammed into the throat of an unlucky man several ranks back. Instantly, the man collapsed and then disappeared as he was trampled underfoot by the rest of the mob.

A victorious roar went up from the rest of Blacknail’s tribesmen as they celebrated the kill. It was quickly matched by a chorus of bloodthirsty cries from the wave of heavily armed thugs that were bearing down on the wall. Now that they were within bowshot the mob picked up speed as one by one they started breaking out into full out sprints.

The attackers looked eager to strike back and spill some blood of their own. Blacknail was going to have to do his best to disappoint them. He clenched his fists nervously as the violent maelstrom of noise from the young battlefield below washed over him.

The first shot had been fired. The first death had been dealt. The battle that would decide the fate of Herad’s Band and all of Daggerpoint had begun.

Blacknail’s stomach grumbled; he wished he’d brought more snacks. Maybe he could loot something… 













QOS 8








The wave of attackers bore down on the barricade Herad had ordered built across the road. Blacknail and his master looked down over the battlefield from a balcony on the side of a building beside the makeshift wall. Both of them had bows and full quivers of arrows.

“Don’t just stand there; help me out!” Saeter growled at the hobgoblin.

Blacknail smiled eagerly as he took up his bow and fitted an arrow to it. He gripped it steadily and pulled the string back all the way to his face. He carefully selected a particularly stupid looking red haired human from among the advancing crowd, aligned his sights on the man’s chest, and then let the arrow loose.

The unleashed projectile sprung forward with a deep twang, and bit deep into the knee of a man standing several feet to the left of Blacknail’s target. The accidental victim screamed before collapsing onto the ground.

The hobgoblin grimaced at how far off he’d been. He was a great archer; that arrow should have gone where he’d aimed! The wind must have shifted or something… stupid wind.

“Huh, not a terrible shot,” Saeter remarked as he let loose another arrow of his own.

“Yes, now he can’t run-ss away,” Blacknail responded guardedly. He’d do better next time. The last shot had just been a fluke after all.

The hobgoblin then selected another arrow and target. This time he chose to aim at the chest of a tall lanky man with a small steel helmet. If the man didn’t want to be shot then he shouldn’t wear such a shiny hat. Maybe Blacknail would take it as a prize after the battle.

He let go of the string, and the arrow zoomed forward and straight toward the unsuspecting man. The hobgoblin grinned happily as he watched it fly true.

The grin slipped from his face though, when the arrow ricocheted off the surprised man’s helmet and spun into the face of the man next to him. They both went down in a confused tumble of limbs, but then a few seconds later they both got back up again.

The first man looked pale and unsteady on his feet, and there was a large uncomfortable looking dent in his helmet. He staggered and blinked uncertainly for a while before rejoining the charge. The second man had a large gash across his face that was bleeding heavily, but he appeared to still be able to fight as well. Both definitely seemed like they would live…

“Dog breath-ss,” Blacknail hissed angrily.

“Ha, that was an unlucky shot! Just keep on shooting, though. They’ve almost reached the wall,” Saeter yelled.

Blacknail grunted unhappily in reply as he squinted at the mass of moving humanity below, and as he watched the front runners reached the wall and stalled before it. The hobgoblin was more than a little curious as to how they planned on actually getting over it.

The hurriedly put together wooden barricade was only about as tall as a human, but there were dozens of armed men behind it who were extremely motivated to stop anyone from climbing it. It was too high to jump over and to climb it someone would need both hands, which would leave them more than a little vulnerable to being stabbed or hit over the head with something heavy.

The hobgoblin’s next arrow missed completely and slammed harmlessly into the ground. He growled in frustration at his latest failure. The shaft must have been bent! In fact, if Blacknail turned his head just so and glared at the arrow a certain way then it definitely looked curved. It wasn’t his fault he’d been given defective weapons!

As more and more attacker reached the wall their intentions became obvious to Blacknail; they were planning to simply overwhelm the defenders with the force of their numbers. As the mob rushed forward they left a trail of dozens of dead and wounded on the ground behind them. More than a few of them had already been brought down by Herad’s archers, but there were still plenty more.

Groups of Zelena’s soldiers began throwing themselves at the barrier. They aimed for any spot that looked undefended and easy to climb over. Some tried to go over alone while others worked together to try and distract the guards and protect the climbers.

Blacknail was happy to see that it didn’t work very well. Almost all the climbers got a blade shoved in their face as a reward for their efforts, but some made it and the fight started in earnest. Fighting began to break out on the other side as attackers scaled the barricade and found themselves face to face with Herad’s men and outnumbered.

The defenders tried to overwhelm the initial attackers before more of Zelena’s hirelings could make it over, and the desperate attackers tried to survive long enough for reinforcements to scale the wall behind them.

The hobgoblin was very glad that Saeter had chosen a position that was nowhere near any place that was under attack. The melee below him didn’t look like a lot of fun. He liked it up on the balcony where he was safe and could shoot people without being distracted.

Blacknail noticed one of his tribesmen along the wall cut down a climber, and get dragged from his perch by several other attackers for his trouble. Immediately, more men began to scale the barrier where it was now undefended.

The hobgoblin quickly chose one of the men and shot an arrow at him. Blacknail held his breath expectantly for the short seconds it took the arrow to hit its target, and hit it did. The projectile slammed into the man’s ass, and he howled as he fell from the wall.

“Aha, that one-ss hit!” the hobgoblin laughed triumphantly.

Blacknail raised a fist into the air and gave a little jump as he celebrated his glorious kill. He really was a great archer! He’d been aiming for the man’s back but that was really close.

“Get down!” Saeter suddenly roared.

The old scout hurriedly grabbed Blacknail’s sleeve and yanked the surprised hobgoblin to the ground. The surprised hobgoblin’s wrist jammed painfully as he tried to catch himself and stop his fall.

“Wha?” he hissed in pain and confusion.

Blacknail’s confusion was dispelled as an arrow whirred through the exact space his head had been a split second ago. The hobgoblin felt his throat tighten from the shock and he gulped nervously. That had been very close…

“Pay bloody attention to what’s going on around you, you damn fool,” Saeter growled as he held the hobgoblin down.

“Yes master, I will. I just-ss didn’t think they had-ss any archers,” Blacknail replied submissively.

His master had just saved his life. He was fairly sure getting an arrow in his skull would kill him.

“Well, now you know they do!” Saeter answered heatedly as he let go of the hobgoblin’s sleeve.

The old scout peered carefully over the edge of the balcony they were on. A few seconds later he quickly rose to his feet, and then aimed and shot his bow in one smooth flowing motion. After a moment the old scout smiled.

“There, I got the bastard,” he then crowed proudly.

Blacknail was more than a little impressed. Since they’d left the forest his opinion of his master had started to slip. He thought Saeter was… sort of useless in the city, but now he knew he’d been foolish to believe that. He still had a lot to learn.

As Blacknail admired his master’s skill, Saeter suddenly tensed. The grey haired scout then threw himself to the ground as a flock of arrows ripped through the air and smacked into the wall behind him and Blacknail.

The hobgoblin flinched at the noise, and dropped onto his stomach with his arms covering his head. Above him several still quivering and humming arrows protruded from the wooden side of the building. Apparently, Saeter had missed an archer or two…

“It seems we’ve attracted some unwanted attention,” Saeter remarked as he grinned at Blacknail from where he lay next to him on the balcony.

“Yes, so let’s leave-ss,” the hobgoblin hastily replied. He didn’t like being shot at nearly as much as shooting at people.

“Just a second,” the old scout told him.

Saeter crawled over to the balcony’s edge and peeked over it. He then scanned the battlefield below them thoughtfully.

Blacknail crawled up beside him, while keeping an eye out for incoming projectiles, and followed his gaze. He quickly noticed what his master was looking at. In the center of the street, among the chaotic masses, a small disciplined group had appeared. They stood out from the others, and were clearly more than just normal Daggerpoint thugs.

Their formation included several men with shields surrounding a group of archers. As Blacknail eyed them nervously the bowmen resumed shooting. Arrows began to rain down on the defenders that were still struggling to hold the barricade, and the occasional unlucky attacker as well. The climbers redoubled their effort to make it over the barricade, and the sounds of fighting intensified.

“So, Zelena has finally made her next move. I wonder what Herad will do. They’re both playing their cards close to their chests,” Saeter mused to himself.

As Blacknail peered over the balcony railing he noticed movement at one of the windows of a building across the street. He tried to see what it was, but it was too far away and all blurry.

“There’s something there,” he told his master as he pointed to it.

“Ah, here we go; there’s Mahedium,” Saeter replied.

Blacknail had no idea how his master could tell who was at the window, the hobgoblin’s own eyes had trouble making out things that far away, but Saeter was soon proven right in a dramatic fashion. A heavy pulsing noise washed over the battlefield as a wave of rippling air shot forth from the window. The distortion then slammed into the center of the group of shielded enemy archers.

The street exploded into sharp stone fragments, and Blacknail was practically deafened by the blast.

Mixed in among the dirt and rock of the explosion were shields and other pieces of equipment, as well as several torn limbs. Bodies were sent rolling across the ground as the impact threw them aside. Only a few of the men anywhere near the blast site managed to keep on their feet, and they looked worse for wear.

The battlefield seemed to pause as everyone took in this new development. As the roar of the blast died down the sounds of steel on steel and screams of pain and rage seemed muted and less frequent. A weird veil of quiet fell across the fighting.

Then, Mahedium unleashed another barrage upon the largest concentration of attackers near the wall. Screams filled the air as men were torn apart by the magical force, and the tide of battle shifted once again. Blacknail grinned savagely at the beautiful destruction that filled his eyes. It was moments like this that made him really want to be a mage.

The rest of the thugs attacking the wall faltered and began to panic. Men trying to climb the wall froze, as the companions beside them took a nervous step back. Blacknail even saw one shorter female fighter who had successfully made it over the barricade abandon her position and leap back across. She was obviously very smart for a human.

Herad’s men were quick to take advantage of this opening, and they regrouped. Her bandits surged up to the wall and began to cut down Zelena’s stunned men. Soon, no attackers were left on the defenders' side of the barricade, and Herad took complete control of the wall back.

That was too much for the remaining attackers at the foot of the barricade. They still outnumbered the defenders, but now they were disorganized and at a serious disadvantage. As one they seemed to waver, and then one of them screamed in surprise and pain as Blacknail’s latest arrow slammed into his left butt cheek.

Why did that keep happening? That wasn't where he had aimed...

That was too much for attackers. As if the wail had been some sort of prearranged signal they broke and started to flee. Groups of them began dashing away from the wall and down the street. Within seconds, the fighting stopped and only the sound of panicked footsteps remained. Soon even that was gone and the last of Zelena’s soldiers disappeared down one of the many shadowy side streets.

“Aha, we won! Run-ss stupid humans, run. I’ll find you though; you can’t hide-ss from me!” Blacknail cheered triumphantly.

The hobgoblin then quickly turned away from the battlefield and headed for the stairs that led down to safe side of the wall. He wanted to beat the rush and get the best loot for himself.

“Where do you think you’re going, Blacknail?” Saeter asked.

“I’m going-ss to go find some prizes. Some of the people-ss in our band are really greedy and will take all the good stuff-ss for themselves, unless I get there-ss first!” the hobgoblin responded.

“The battle is far from over!” Saeter growled.

The hobgoblin turned around and gave his master an uncomprehending stare. Below him on the street the last of attackers had already fled, only blasted rubble and a scattering of corpses remained. It certainly looked like his tribe had won…

“Really-ss?” he asked his master doubtfully.

“Yes, that was just the first wave. They were disposable. Zelena’s commanders just threw them at us hoping that they would weaken us. Their main force is still to come, and now they’ve tested our defenses,” Saeter explained.

“…and that’s bad?” Blacknail asked with wide eyes.

“It might be; we’ll have to see what they do next,” Saeter replied.

The hobgoblin sighed and walked back over to his master. He then leaned over the balcony and tried to peer down the street to see if anyone was coming. He couldn’t see very far though, because another tall wooden warehouse was in the way, but after several minutes spent leaning precariously over the railing he finally heard something.

It was quiet enough that he almost dismissed it. It wasn’t the sound of a large group of people, but rather it sounded more like just a few. Was the enemy trying to be sneaky? If so they wouldn’t be able to get past him. No one was as sneaky as Blacknail; he was the sneakiest of them all.

As he turned to look in the direction the sound had come from, a sudden burst of movement caught his eye. A small group of men burst out of the entrance of one of the nearby side streets, and took up position outside it. There were about a dozen of them and they stuck close to the nearby building for cover.

They didn’t seem very threatening to Blacknail. What were they doing? Several of them had bows, but what could half a dozen archers do, especially at that range? Unless they were all very good shots they would have trouble hitting anyone from that far away.

As he watched another man stepped around a corner and into sight, with a lit torch in his hand. Blacknail tilted his head to the side in confusion. That was weird. Why did they have a torch out in the middle of the day? Maybe, they were cold?

A few seconds later his question was answered, and his eyes widened in surprise. One of the men drew an arrow and held it up to the flame. Instantly, the oddly thick head of the arrow caught fire. The archer then wasted no time in taking a shot at the wall with his bow.

The fiery projectile arced through the air and slammed into a wooden panel on the barricade, before bouncing off and falling harmlessly to the ground. It was quickly followed by others though, and several of those hit the wood and stuck.

“Oh, fire!” the hobgoblin remarked in fascination as he stared at the flames that writhed around the enemies' arrowheads. He wanted some of those. Imagine being able to light fires from a distance. The possibilities were endless, and you didn’t even need magic!

Those of Herad’s men that had bows of their own shot back, but the new attackers were quick to scramble behind cover where they were hard to hit. A steady rain of fire arrows began to fall on the wooden barricade that protected Herad’s forces.

Slowly but surely the flames began to spread and consume the wooden barricade. Cries of alarm went up from the defenders as their protection burned. Blacknail winced has he heard Herad start yelling at the top of her lungs.

“Get those fires out now! You know what to do,” she commanded her men. Blacknail knew things were serious because she hadn’t even had time to swear.

Saeter joined in the defense. The old scout drew an arrow from his quiver and took a shot at one of the saboteurs. This time however, he missed his mark by a few inches and his arrow bounced harmlessly off a wall behind one of the attacking archers.

The close shave startled the man though, and he dropped the arrow he’d been about to shoot. It clattered onto the ground and went out. The archer then had to go back and have it lit again.

“Damnation!” Saeter swore as he reached for another arrow. “They’re too far away. I really hope the fools don’t burn the entire city down. Why is that damn barricade so flammable?”

A mental picture of all of Daggerpoint burning suddenly sprung to life in Blacknail’s head. It was almost all wood so it would burn quite nicely, and it would sure make for a huge spectacle. He kind of wanted to see that, just not from the inside...

“Uh oh,” Blacknail exclaimed nervously as he studied the panicked activity below him. 







QOS 9









Suddenly, a door near the barricade swung open and a squad of Herad’s men started pouring out. The armed bandits immediately raced towards the archers. However, the saboteurs didn’t stick around to fight. They took a few seconds to fire off one last volley, and then disappeared back into the alleyways.

Some of the lead members of the bandits tried to give chase, but they were soon called back.

“You bloody idiots, get back here! Unless you've got a death wish get back here,” their leader yelled.

Just as the group of Herad’s men started to turn around another group of archers appeared on the other side of the street and loosed another volley of fire arrows at the barricade. A few of the saboteurs shot at the bandits out on the street instead of the wall, and one of Herad’s men went down with an arrow in his side.

The leader of the group froze for a second and looked around hesitantly before springing into action.

“Grab the injured and let’s get back to the wall. We’re not doing any good out here,” he yelled as he started organizing his squad’s retreat.

By this time the flames from the first enemies’ arrows had started to spread across the wooden barrier. There was a loud crack and a shower of sparks as a particularly dry section caught flame.

“We should get down there and help,” Saeter told the hobgoblin as he started down the stairs.

Blacknail nodded happily in reply. He wanted to see the fire from closer up anyway. The dancing reds and oranges were always so pretty, and he liked the crackling noise the flames made.

The hobgoblin and his master quickly rushed back down to the road behind the barrier. It was a mad bustle of activity there. Bandits were running around everywhere as they tried to fight the fire, keep a lookout for the next attack, help the wounded, and move flammable supplies out of the way.

Herad was in the very middle of the street shouting commands. At her direction the barrels by the wall that some of the bandits had been standing on were opened, and water was scooped out into buckets. Blacknail was impressed; apparently, Herad had predicted that the enemy would use fire.

Saeter immediately headed for the chieftain to get orders, but before they got there Mahedium stepped out of a nearby crowd and drew her attention. The mage was carrying his usual staff, and Blacknail eyed it with new respect. He’d seen the damage it had inflicted on the enemy.

The mage wasn’t alone this time, though. A scared looking older boy was at his side. He was carrying what looked to be a spare mage’s staff and had short blonde hair. Herad grinned excitedly as she noticed the mage.

“Are you ready?” she asked him.

“Yes, a blaze this size should be no problem. I’m well prepared for much worse,” Mahedium replied, as the boy at his side shied away from Herad.

“Then get to it! The flames aren’t getting any smaller, and my barrier isn’t getting any stronger,” the bandit chieftain told the mage dryly.

“Just make sure there aren’t any snipers hidden anywhere nearby. I’d hate to get an arrow in my back as I’m working. That would be inconvenient for both of us,” Mahedium replied coolly.

“Blacknail and I will take care of that, if that’s what the boss wants,” Saeter explained as he joined the other two bandits.

“That’s fine with me, just hurry up,” Herad told them.

“Good, you two are the best,” the mage commented as he calmly, but vigorously, started walking towards the barricade’s entrance.

All four of them hurriedly passed through building that led to the other side of the wall. The boy following Mahedium stayed as far away from Blacknail as possible. Blacknail was curious why the boy was with them, but every time he so much as glanced at him the boy hid behind Mahedium. The hobgoblin made a mental note to try again later when he wasn’t wearing his scary mask.

“My staff, please,” Mahedium told his aide as soon as they got back outside.

The boy immediately handed the staff he was carrying to the mage, and the mage exchanged it with his own. Mahedium then stared at the staff head for a few seconds, before making a few quick adjustments. When he appeared satisfied with the result the mage aimed the tip towards the wall.

There were bandits atop the barricade throwing water down, but they were barely keeping the flames under control. Flaming arrows would occasionally appear from an alleyway or rooftop down the street, and hit previously untouched spots on the wall. These new flames distracted the men trying to quench the fires, and were preventing them from getting things under control.

As Mahedium leveled his staff at the wall Blacknail felt the air swirl around him, and everyone’s clothes began to stir as newborn air currents pulled and tugged on them. Blacknail had to reach up and grab his hood to keep it from slipping off.

The hobgoblin jumped in surprise as a white icy spray burst forth from the mage’s weapon and slammed into the wall. Frost formed instantly wherever it hit, and within seconds every flame had been extinguished.

The wooden barricade was still charred in quite a few places, and covered with patches of ice, but seemed mostly intact. Saeter raised a surprised eyebrow as he regarded the mage’s work.

“That was no measly magic trick. I don’t think I’ve seen that before,” he remarked.

“Huh, I’m not surprised. A staff like this isn’t something many combat mages get their hands on, outside the navy anyway. It’s delicate and requires three different stones to power it. There’s no better way to put out fires, but the guilds don’t like handing out staffs with more than one stone in them to combat mages,” Mahedium replied.

“Where’d you get it from, then?” Saeter asked curiously.

“Avorlus had it, as well as the stones to power it. I didn’t ask where he got it from though, because I’m not sure I’d like the answer,” the mage replied.

“And he just gave it to you?” Sater asked in disbelief as his eyes hardened at the mention of the blood mage.

“Herad sent him an eloquently written letter asking him for his aid, and so he graciously agreed to help us in our time of need, as any gentlemen would,” Mahedium explained sarcastically.

“Ah,” Saeter replied as he scowled darkly. Blacknail didn’t get it.

“He also gave me several other crystals, and the use of half a dozen of his men,” the mage added.

One of Saeter’s eyebrows rose and he gave the mage an incredulous look, before making an impressed whistling sound.

“Herad must really have him by the balls. That sounds like a small fortune,” the old scout remarked.

“Indeed, it is. Avorlus has his own reasons for wanting Zelena’s plans foiled, though Herad’s rather… direct letter certainly motivated him further,” Mahedium explained.

This conversation was just making Blacknail more confused. He didn’t really understand what his master and the mage were talking about.

“Ha, I imagine it did,” Saeter replied. “She certainly knows where to stick the knife. Although, I imagine you’re right about him not liking the idea of Werrick taking over, or anyone else for that matter. Chaos suits people like him much better than order.”

“I don’t get it. Why is Herad grabbing Avorlus’ balls?” Blacknail suddenly interjected.

Saeter wheezed loudly and began coughing hard enough that he had to bend over. The fit only stopped after he hit himself in the chest a few times, and even then he still looked pale. The corner of his mouth was also twitching.

Mahedium blanched, grimaced, and seemed to be struggling to keep a spasm that had developed in his left eye under control. The boy at his side just looked shy and scared, so basically the same. None of those responses answered the hobgoblin’s question. In fact, they raised several more…

Blacknail’s master threw a quick glance over his shoulder, and when he saw no one was there he gave a quiet chuckle and smiled at the hobgoblin.

“It’s just a saying, Blacknail. It means she’s threatening him and he has to do as she says,” he explained.

“Ah, alright-ss,” Blacknail replied uncertainly.

Any further conversation was interrupted by someone yelling down at them from the wall.

“You four may want to stop gabbing and get back on this side of the wall. We’ve got incoming,” a bandit that was leaning over the top of the barricade told them.

Immediately, they all looked down the street. Blacknail’s ears went back against his head as he saw what was there. It was a lot more enemies, and they looked meaner than the last ones.

Coming down the street towards the wall, and the hobgoblin standing in front of it, were two formations of soldiers. Unlike the last attackers these men weren’t a mob; they were organized.

They were also better equipped. The smaller group on the left looked a lot like Herad’s own men. They had rough looking armor and an assortment of wicked looking weapons.

The group on the right was even more dangerous looking. Each man in it was equipped in exactly the same way, with a brown tabard, chainmail shirt, metal cap, short sword, and a small shield. They were also walking in step and moving all together, like some sort of gigantic bug with a hundred little legs. Blacknail had never seen anything like it. On one hand it seemed sort of pointless to him, but on the other it was more than a little terrifying.

“That’ll be Werrick’s regulars on the left, and the mercenaries to the right. Now the real fight starts,” Saeter mused aloud.

“We should head back inside,” Mahedium quickly replied.

The mage then started for the door without waiting for a response. Blacknail eyed the incoming troops anxiously. They didn’t look weak, and together they outnumbered his tribe by a fair bit.

“We should-ss run away. It’s stupid to try and fight-ss them like this,” he told his master.

“Herad knows what she’s doing, Blacknail; we can win this. The chief has a plan, and if it doesn’t work, well she’s never been too proud to run before. Probably, she even has an escape plan all laid out just in case,” Saeter replied as they both headed off the street.

“You wouldn’t happen-ss to know this escape route, would-ss you?” Blacknail asked him curiously.

A derisive snort from Saeter was the only answer the hobgoblin got. The pair then quickly hurried after Mahedium, and back through the building to the other side of the barrier.

“Are we going back to the uh… place we were before?” Blacknail asked his master.

“It’s called a balcony, and we may as well; the other option is to take a spot on the wall,” Saeter answered.

“No thanks,” Blacknail remarked quickly. That seemed like a horrible idea; a lot of the people that had been protecting the barricade had gotten themselves killed! What kind of idiot would want to go there?

The old scout and the hobgoblin then made their way back to the balcony were they had overlooked the first part of the battle. As Blacknail was climbing the last stretch of the creaky wooden stairs that led up the side of the building he caught another good look at the approaching enemy.

The two enemy formations were still moving separately and advancing slowly. A small group of horsemen rode between them, and seemed to be the leaders.

“It’s too bad none of those riders are stupid enough to get within bowshot. I wouldn’t mind putting an arrow in someone more important than a grunt,” Saeter remarked as he gazed towards the enemy.

“Yes, then I could-ss shoot those horses,” Blacknail replied viciously.

Saeter rolled his eyes and sighed in exasperation, but didn’t say anything.

“What-ss? They’re mean ugly things that trample-ss and bite people!” Blacknail explained.

“Let’s just concentrate on the battle,” his master replied dismissively.

The hobgoblin scowled in fustration. Why couldn’t all these humans see that horses couldn’t be trusted? One day Blacknail knew he would be proven right! Then everyone would know how smart he was and all the horses would be slaughtered. What a glorious day that would be.

“So, we're just going to stand here and shoot people like before?” Blacknail asked his master.

The hobgoblin didn’t mind doing that. Except for the part at the end where the enemy had started shooting back it had been both fairly safe and rather amusing.

“Pretty much,” Saeter answered as he readied his bow.

“Why doesn’t Mahedium just-ss blow up all these idiots like before? Then-ss we could all go back to base and eat,” the hobgoblin remarked.

“Maybe he will. We’ll have to wait and see,” the old scout answered distractedly.

The first rank of soldiers entered the edge of bow range, and Saeter aimed and drew his weapon back. There was a familiar twang as he released an arrow, and seconds later it pierced the shoulder of one of Zelena’s men.

“Stop showing off, Saeter! We get it, you’re a good archer. Why don’t you come down here and shoot with the rest of us?” a laughing man yelled up from below, which was quickly followed by amused snorts and chuckles from the rest of Herad’s men.

Blacknail leaned over the edge of the balcony, spotted the laughing man, and threw a small rock at him. How dare he make fun of Blacknail’s master! The stone bounced off the bandit’s steel cap with a noisy clang.

“Ow, that hurt, you blasted green wretch!” the man cursed in response.

There was more muted laughter and Blacknail smirked smugly to himself.

“Save it for the enemy, they’re almost here,” Saeter ordered the hobgoblin, but Blacknail noticed he was grinning slightly.

A sharp clear trumpet blast drew everyone’s attention towards one of the horsemen, and as Blacknail watched Zelena’s men stopped moving. The mercenaries quickly marched ahead and all together they raised their shields. The first rank of soldiers held them in front of themselves and the ones further back lifted them above their heads. The shields were unpainted wood with thin steel bands around the edges and were shaped like rounded triangles.

Blacknail eyed the moving mass of protected soldiers in annoyance. That was kind of cheating; how was he supposed to shoot them now?

"Well, that will help protect them against archers, but how are they planning on dealing with our mage and the wall?” Saeter mused aloud.

The enemy was within easy bow shot of the balcony now, so Blacknail loosed an arrow their way. Unfortunately, it slammed harmlessly into one of the soldiers shields and stuck there. The hobgoblin growled in frustration.

More of the defenders started shooting and a shower of arrows descended upon the advancing enemy. Almost all the arrows failed to find a soft target though, and only a few mercenaries fell. Meanwhile, the enemy’s quick march brought them ever closer toward the wall.

“Cease fire,” the hobgoblin heard Herad yell.

Immediately, her men stopped firing and the rain of arrows ceased falling. The hobgoblin saw Mehdium climb up onto the barrier and level his staff at the enemy. He watched wide-eyed as a wave of force once again appeared at the end of the mage’s staff, and then like a massive invisible snake it shot hungrily forth.

Any second it would collide with the mercenary formation. Blacknail waited eagerly to see these new enemies get smacked violently aside like rats hit by a boot. Their fancy shields wouldn’t stop them from being blown up!

The mercenary formation finally stopped, and their shield wall suddenly parted. A tall armored man stepped out from the front rank and raised a steel amulet on a chain.

“Fuck,” Saeter cursed unexpectedly from beside Blacknail.

The hobgoblin was then surprised further when his master hurriedly fitted an arrow to his bow and took a shot at the tall man. Herad had told them to cease fire so why was his master ignoring that order?

As both the magical blast and the arrow raced toward him, purple light flared forth from the man’s raised amulet. The air began to churn and a vortex burst into being and began sucking in everything in front of the mercenaries’ mage. The air churned and whirled as dust and grime from the street was picked up and pulled into the amulet.

Mahedium’s blast and Saeter’s arrow were also tugged aside and sucked into the unnatural vortex. There was a flash of purple light and then the other mage dropped his amulet and the vortex disappeared. The enemy formation was completely unscathed.

“That’s not good-ss, even if it was sort-ss of pretty,” Blacknail remarked nervously.

“No, it seems Mahedium has some competition, and this battle will be uncomfortably close,” Saeter replied darkly as he scowled at the figures below.

“At least that guy isn’t throwing any magic back at us,” Blacknail remarked hopefully.

The enemy mage gestured and one of the men behind him passed him a staff. It looked exactly like Mahedium’s staff. The tall man then leveled it at the barricade that blocked his company’s progress, and a familiar looking ripple shot forth.

This new blast slammed into the wooden wall and smashed through it. Splinters and bits of wood filled the air as a large section of the barricade exploded noisily. Mahedium and several other bandits were thrown off the wall and disappeared, as a loud crash roared across the street.

A few seconds later cries of alarm and pain filled the air. At least a few of the hobgoblin's tribesmen had been wounded, and a huge easily traversable hole had been punched through Herad’s barricade.

The tall enemy mage stepped back into rank, and the mercenaries began to march inexorably forward again as wreckage rained down from above.

“Huh,” Blacknail grunted as he felt a sinking feeling in his gut. This wasn’t good…








QOS 10










The thud and crunch of heavy boots on cobblestones filled the air as the large wedge of shield bearing mercenaries marched. The enemy soldiers were headed right towards the large gaping hole that their mage had created in the barrier that Herad had ordered built across the road.

“What do we do?” Blacknail asked his master frantically.

The roar of the barricade exploding had sent the hobgoblin’s heart into overdrive and it was beating a hundred times per minute. He twitched nervously as his every instinct urged him to run somewhere safer or to find somewhere dark to hide.

Any place that hostile magic men were blowing up stuff was a bad place to be. The only thing stopping him from fleeing was a desire not to abandon his tribe, in case he couldn’t find them again later, and Saeter’s reassuring presence beside him.

“Keep shooting,” his master barked as he let loose an arrow at the nearest enemy soldier.

The old scout had aimed low, so his arrow hit the man below the shield and sliced through the side of his leg. The mercenary didn’t look critically wounded but he stumbled and cried out as he fell.

Blacknail did as he was told and sent another arrow at Saeter’s target. It hit the collapsed man in the center of his now exposed back, and the mercenary twitched and then slumped loosely onto the ground. He looked dead.

Unfortunately, there were plenty more mercenaries left, and they had now almost reached the shattered wall. Saeter took another shot and Blacknail was just about to do the same, when the sound of a horn rang out from behind the barricade. The hobgoblin froze and turned to see what was going on.

“That’s the retreat signal,” Saeter exclaimed.

“Did we lose?” Blacknail asked. He hoped the answer was yes so that they could all go back to the forest…

“No, this fight’s not over; Herad isn’t out of tricks yet. It’s just time to withdraw and reorganize,” his master answered.

That sounded like it meant they were allowed to run away, so it was good enough for Blacknail.

“Time-ss to go, then,” the hobgoblin replied as he hurriedly started down the stairs.

His master followed him, and when they reached street level the last of Herad’s men were just jumping off the back of the barricade. The long stretch of rigged together pieces of wood stood empty as its builders hurried away and left it behind.

The only people still near the wall were two small squads of bandits who seemed to be keeping watch over the gap in its expanse, and the mercenary company that was quickly closing in on it.

The rest of the bandits were running further down the street but they weren’t panicked or moving aimlessly. Orders were being shouted out by lieutenants and everyone was being organized into squads.

“Where’s Herad?” Saeter yelled at the nearest squad leader.

The man pointed back towards the abandoned barricade, so both the hobgoblin and his master turned to look. Blacknail didn’t see the chieftain, but now that he was looking closer he did recognize three of the larger bandits. They were part of Herad’s personal guard.

“Shit, what now?” Saeter grumbled anxiously as he started running in that direction.

Blacknail sighed in exasperation as he followed his master towards the most dangerous part of the battlefield.

Ahead of them, there was a loud clatter as the pile of rubble beside the hole in the barricade shifted and two more of Herad’s bodyguards straightened up and rose into sight. They were both holding up the end of a large heavy looking panel of wood that had been lying atop the rubble.

A second later two other figures appeared between the guards. One of them was Herad, and as they watched, she pulled Mahedium up from off the ground. Once he was standing, if unsteadily, she wrapped an arm around the limping mage’s shoulder and began dragging him behind her.

“Here let us take him; I’m sure you have better things to do,” Saeter offered as he ran over to help. Blacknail assumed he was also being volunteered.

“Damn right I do! Just don’t fall behind, old man. I need that mage in working condition,” Herad replied as she passed Mahedium off to him.

With her hands now free the bandit chieftain raised her fingers to her lips and whistled sharply. Instantly, all her minions near the barricade began to fall back and join the others down the street. They didn’t seem to want to stick around, and Blacknail didn’t blame them. Bad things were coming.

The hobgoblin moved over to help his master by supporting Mahedium’s other shoulder. The faster they got Mahedium moving the more distance there would be between them and the enemy. The mage shook his head and blinked before turning towards Saeter.

“Thank you. Just give me a few moments and I think I can walk on my own. Nothing appears to be broken. I just had the wind knocked out of me,” Mahedium told them.

“And half a mountain of rubble dropped on you,” Saeter dryly replied.

“We should-ss probably walk faster,” the hobgoblin interjected nervously as he looked back over his shoulder.

Just as Blacknail finished speaking the first group of shield bearing mercenaries marched cautiously through the gap in the barricade behind them. The trio had almost reached the rest of Herad’s men, though. They were only a few dozen feet away from the closest thing to safety around.

“Good thing they aren’t in any rush to attack. You’re heavier than you look,” Saeter remarked.

“Yes, but what happens if the bad-ss mage decides to throw exploding magic at us right now?” Blacknail replied uneasily.

This was apparently something that hadn’t occurred to Saeter yet, because he tensed up and gave the enemy behind them a nervous look.

“I don’t suppose that if that mage there decides to blast us into human paste you could stop him?” Saeter remarked expectantly.

“Maybe,” Mahedium coughed in reply. He didn’t sound very confident.

“Bloody wonderful,” Saeter sighed.

“Hopefully, they don’t recognize me as the mage from before, and all they see is some walking wounded. There’s no way they would waste any mana crystals on us then,” the mage explained.

Blacknail eyed him thoughtfully. That meant that if the enemy did recognize Mahedium then they could be about to blast all three of them into little bits at any second. He didn’t want to die that way, or any other way really…

“We should dump him. We can say he tripped,” Blacknail suggested quietly to his master as he covered the still somewhat stunned mage’s ears with his hands.

“Herad needs him, and besides we’re already here,” Saeter answered dryly.

The hobgoblin stopped staring back at the enemy and looked ahead. His master was right; they had already reached the rest of Herad’s men. He gave his master an unabashed grin and uncovered Mahedium’s ears.

The scout and the green killer then let go of Mahedium and the mage managed to stand by himself. Herad was watching from out of sight of the enemy at the back of a nearby squad and she called the mage over. He seemed unsteady at first but after a few seconds managed to start walking without their help.

“Thanks you two for your help,” he told them.

“No problem-ss, you can pay me back-ss later. Now, I’m just going to go stand over-ss there, and um… guard that very important barrel,” Blacknail replied wryly as he took a few steps away from the mage and cast another nervous glance back at the enemy.

Saeter smacked him across the back of the head.

“What? If we stay near him then the other mage might set us on fire or turn us into little pieces,” Blacknail hissed quietly to his master.

“This is a battlefield; nowhere is safe,” Saeter replied as he led the hobgoblin away.

The old scout didn’t lead the hobgoblin in Mahedium’s direction, however. Instead, they joined a small squad of men off to the side of the road.

During this time the enemy hadn’t been idle. They weren’t attacking, but soldiers had continued to stream in through the gap in the barricade, and now almost half the mercenaries had taken up position on the same side of it as Herad’s men.

The two sides glared at each other. On one side were over a dozen loose squads of bandits in mismatched gear, and on the other was a solid formation of uniformed soldiers that was slowly growing as more of them slipped through the wall. The expectant stillness was broken by Herad’s voice.

“Show these poor bastards what happens to my enemies, mage,” she yelled.

At her command Mahedium stepped forward and once again leveled his staff. Instantly, a purple glow sprung into being amidst the enemy’s front rank. However, Mahedium didn’t do as anyone expected. No shimmering air or invisible force appeared, instead a pillar of roaring flame burst from his staff and raced across the battlefield.

The purple glow intensified as the enemy mage summoned another vortex into being in front of him, but once again Mahedium had done the unexpected. He hadn’t aimed at the enemy but several dozen feet to their left.

The column of raging fire slammed into wooden barricade and hungrily consumed it. Within seconds that section of the wall had been transformed into a roaring bonfire. Its flames reached as high as the nearby roofs and it was still spreading and growing. The crackle and hiss of burning wood filled the air.

Mahedium unleashed another blast of flame at the barricade on the other side of the gap and the mercenaries that filled it. The enemy combat mage was powerless to stop the second blast as well. Apparently, his purple magic wind sucker thing only worked on attacks headed towards him.

Blacknail giggled happily to himself as a soothing wave of relief washed over him. So that was what the plan was! He liked it; it was a nice little trap. More traps should involve fire.

The mercenaries’ position was now less than optimal. They were stuck halfway through the barricade and flames were rushing toward them from both sides. There was no way they could turn around and retreat quickly enough to avoid the flames completely.

So the tall enemy mage did the only thing he could; he went on the offensive. He dropped his amulet, grabbed his staff, pointed it in Mahedium’s direction, and unleashed a blast of force. Immediately, there was a chorus of angry shouts as the mercenaries around him started rushing forward at Herad’s men, and away from the fire. Blacknail was happy to see that their formation wasn’t quite so neat anymore.

As the wave of magic raced towards Mahedium he reached under his shirt and pulled out an amulet of his own. In imitation of his counterpart, he then raised it. The crystal didn’t glow purple and no whirling vortex appeared. Instead, a small circular transparent shield appeared in front of him, and then quickly expanded until it covered not only him but all the men around him.

The force blast smashed into it with a loud crashing sound that Blacknail felt in his teeth, and a wave of dusty wind blew outwards from the impact site. In the middle of the blast zone stood a completely unharmed squad of bandits with Mahedium standing tall at their center.

“Charge, and push them back into the flames!” Herad’s voice suddenly rang out.

At her command every bandit squad attacked. They flowed together as they raced towards the enemy. The mercenaries’ forward march faltered as their moral took a serious hit. Not only were they now cut off from reinforcements, but their mage seemed to have been bested, and their backs were up against the wall. Not to mention, the wall was on fire.

Both mobs of fighters were racing towards each other now, but they hadn’t met yet. Both mages took advantage of this to quickly throw attack spells back and forth. The mercenary mage sent a ball of kinetic energy into a squad of Herad’s men that were too far away from Mahedium for him to protect. It smashed into them and scattered them like leaves in the wind. In a split second a dozen men had been blown off of their feet and several didn’t get back up.

Mahedium took advantage of his opponent’s distraction and blasted the edge of the mercenaries’ formation with a wave of curling flame. Screams filled the air as men discarded burning shields or fell smoking to the ground.

The enemy mage cursed loudly and raised his staff to counterattack, only to take an arrow in the neck and keel over before he could do anything. It was only one of many arrows that began to rain down on Zelena’s hired soldiers as archers hidden on rooftops on both sides of the street opened fire.

Now the mercenaries really started to falter. The death of their mage clearly demoralized them, and their advance ground to a halt. Herad’s men didn’t stop their charge though, and battle was joined as the lead combatants from both sides crashed together.

The still somewhat disciplined enemy shield wall was hit by the first rank of Herad’s men. A wave of bandits wielding swords, clubs, and spears began battering at the mercenaries and quickly started bending around the enemy formation. Herad was now the one with the numbers advantage.

The mercenaries were a tough nut to crack, though. They were better equipped and more disciplined than their foe, and they were too close now for archers or magic to be used. Hand to hand combat would now decide who would be victorious.

The clash of metal on metal, the thud of blades biting into wooden shields, and human cries of rage and pain filled the street. Behind it all was the crackling of wild flames as the wooden barricade burned.

Blacknail and Saeter kept to the back of their squad. Neither of them was too eager to enter the melee. The hobgoblin only went as close as he did so that he could keep Saeter out of trouble. He kept an eye on the old scout as he darted around the edge of the fight and halfheartedly exchanged blows with the occasional opponent. It wasn’t really his job to fight on the front lines, and that was what rookies were for.

Even with so many things set against them the Leather Heels Company stood their ground. They kept their shields high and their blades swinging. Bandit after bandit fell before them and it looked like they would manage to hold, but then Herad herself joined the fray.

The bandit chieftain charged out from among her minions with her bodyguards at her side, and slammed into the center of the enemy’s formation. Her silver blade flashed through the air and cut down two mercenaries as her hulking guards slammed themselves into the soldiers. They were wearing heavier armor than most the other bandits and carrying heavy two handed swords or pikes.

Her men rallied around her and drove into the gap she created. As she whirled into the enemy formation more and more mercenaries fell and their formation began to dissolve. The sound of Herad’s vicious laughter rang out as she batted a blade away and slashed its wielder across the face. She looked like she was having fun.

A mercenary stabbed at her chest but she sidestepped the blow and ended up with only a shallow cut across her ribs. Herad then stabbed low. Her blow cut her attacker’s leg just below his groin. He collapsed as blood poured from the wound.

Suddenly, there was a loud cry of despair and the enemy broke. Their formation came apart and Herad’s men started pushing them back, but there was nowhere for them to go. The roaring flames of the burning barricade blocked their escape.

Step by step they were pressed backwards until one of them stumbled and fell into the blaze. His screams rent the air as he caught fire, and then he lunged forwards in a futile attempt to escape the flames that now covered him. Of course, there was nowhere for him to go so all he managed to do was throw himself on top of his startled comrades and spread the flames, before one of them panicked and cut him down.

This distraction only served to weaken the mercenaries further and soon another man was pushed into the flames, and then another. The smell of roasting human flesh wafted over the battlefield. Blacknail really wished he’d brought more to eat now; the scent was making his stomach gurgle with hunger.

Enemy soldiers began to drop their weapons, either in hopes of surrendering and being spared, or just so they would die a clean death at the end of a blade instead of burning to death.

Herad didn’t take any prisoners. She and her men cut into the mercenaries until they had all been slain and the more stubborn ones pushed into the flames of the barricade. A triumphant cheer went up from her men when the last of them fell.

As a bloodstained Herad strolled over the corpse-littered street her men started looting the bodies. They were safe from any counterattack for awhile and they were eager to get their hands on some valuables. Blacknail took a few minutes to try and find some boots and socks that fit him. He tended to go through them quickly because of his long sharp toenails.

After he’d found a satisfactory pair the hobgoblin glanced around the battlefield. The butchered or burning remains of his tribes' enemies were scattered everywhere and most of Herad’s men were still busy looting the bodies for weapons or valuables. The flames that wreathed around the barricade itself were finally starting to die down as the last of the wood it was feeding on blackened and crumbled.

“Have we won yet?” Blacknail asked Saeter hopefully.

He was fairly sure they’d won, but then again he’d thought that after the first enemies had run away and it hadn’t been true.

“No, we're just getting to the hard part,” his master grunted darkly in reply. 








QOS 11








“Well, maybe the battle’s over but I doubt it,” Saeter told Blacknail. “Even if the rest of the mercenaries decide to call it quits we’ll still only have taken out Zelena’s gold bought thugs and soldiers. We still haven’t gone up against Werrick’s own men.”

The old scout had to speak loudly in order to be heard over all the background noise. Bandits were still stomping around and cheering their victory as the remains of the wooden barricade burned. All in all it put Blacknail in a festive mood. It certainly smelled like a party, the air was thick with smoke and the iron scent of blood.

The cackling flames of the burning wall also prevented the enemy for launching another attack, for now. The fire wouldn’t last all that much longer though.

“Zelena’s a sly one. She’ll have saved her best tricks for last. Werrick’s regulars will be harder to deal with than the others,” Saeter added.

“If they’re so tough, why did she need-ss to hire so many other fighters?” Blacknail scoffed.

“To wear us down so that we’re easier to take out,” Saeter replied.

“Ha, they didn’t-ss do all that much, and they probably-ss cost a ton of coins,” the hobgoblin countered.

“She doesn’t have to pay them if they all die,” his master explained darkly.

“Oh, that’s tricksy. This Zelena lady is smart. Who is she again-ss?” Blacknail remarked in surprise.

“You don’t know who Zelena is?” his master asked in surprise.

“The enemy. I have-ss enough trouble keeping track of all you humans’ names without worrying-ss about the ones I’m going to kill soon anyway,” the hobgoblin replied with an indifferent shrug.

“Do you know who Werrick is?” Saeter asked.

“The enemy,” the hobgoblin replied with another indifferent shrug.

Saeter sighed in frustration before replying. The lines on his face under his grey bangs looked deeper than usual.

“Most people consider Werrick to be the most powerful of the northern bandit chieftains because he has the most men, and Zelena is one of his lieutenants. Awhile back people started calling him the Wolf because of the ruthless way he raided caravans,” he explained.

“Why are we-ss fighting him?” Blacknail asked curiously. It didn’t seem very smart to pick a fight with the strongest enemy possible, but maybe it was just a Herad thing.

“Herad and Werrick hate each other. They’ve met here in Daggerpoint a few times and Herad ended up killing one of his lieutenants in a duel. The arrogant prick thought Werrick’s name would allow him to do anything he wanted, but it didn’t,” the old scout answered.

“Ah, makes sense,” the hobgoblin replied with a knowing nod.

The same type of thing could happen if there were rival gangs of goblins in an area, just with less walking about and more poo throwing. Humans were weirdly indirect some times.

“The battle isn’t going too badly, though. Herad thought Werrick would be too busy to come to Daggerpoint for the winter this year, and she was right, but he sent Zelena in his place. Zelena’s forces are smaller than Herad’s and even without the barricade we still have a strong defensive advantage,” Saeter explained.

The hobgoblin rubbed his chin as he thought his master’s words over carefully. From what he’d just heard it seemed likely that Zelena would attack soon, so he needed a plan.

“Let’s go join the archers on-ss the roofs. Once there we can just shoot all of Zelena’s men-ss because they don’t have shields,” Blacknail suggested. That seemed like the safest plan.

Before Saeter could reply, there was a scream of pain and a hollow thud as something fell from the top of nearby building and hit the ground. Blacknail looked over to see a twisted corpse lying there, and it had a crossbow bolt sticking out from its chest.

A quick flash of movement drew the hobgoblin’s eye upwards and he glimpsed a familiarly dressed figure dash across the roof and then disappear. It had been one of Malthus’ assassins…

“Or maybe we should just stay here,” the hobgoblin remarked warily as he scanned the nearby roof tops.

“Blacknail get over here, now!” Herad suddenly roared from across the street.
“That doesn’t seem to be an option,” Saeter remarked dryly in amusement.

The hobgoblin winced in reluctance. He had a feeling that he knew where this was going and he didn’t like it one bit.

“You’d better do as she says,” Saeter told him.

Blacknail sighed and started dragging himself over to where his mistress was waiting. There was another scream of pain from across the street and the hobgoblin sighed as the sound of running footsteps on a nearby roof reached his ears.

Herad was yelling at a pair of nervous looking subordinates and gesturing towards where the first archer had fallen from, but when Blacknail approached she looked over and the rage in her eyes died down slightly. She still looked very angry though. The hobgoblin just hoped she wouldn’t direct that anger at him. He was still her favorite, right?

“There you are! You’re supposed to be taking care of those assassins, so go over there and kill them,” she commanded Blacknail.

The hobgoblin grunted vaguely in acknowledgement. She made it sound so simple…

“What are you whining about? I thought you had a plan all worked out so that mere humans wouldn’t stand a chance,” Herad told him impatiently.

“I do, and it’s a great plan. There’s no way it will fail,” Blacknail replied crossly.

“Then go do it before I lose anymore of my men,” the chieftain ordered him.

“Ugh fine, but don’t forget my blue cheese,” the hobgoblin muttered darkly in reply.

Herad eyes narrowed dangerously at being talked back to, but she nodded in acknowledgement.

“Don’t worry about that. Do as I say and you’ll have all the rewards you could ever want,” she answered.

It was Blacknail’s turn to nod now. He then slipped away towards his new targets and disappeared into a nearby crowd of bandits.

Saeter walked up to Herad. The old scout had a concerned look on his age-lined face as he confronted his boss.

“You’re depending on Blacknail for quite a bit. He might be in over his head, you know,” Saeter told her with obvious concern on his face and in his voice.

Herad’s reaction was to laugh in his face. Her sharp barking laughter unsettled the old scout and he shuffled nervously. He wasn’t the only one either. Most of the other nearby bandits threw her surprised or anxious looks.

“You just can’t see it, can you? I’m not betting on your pet or your partner, old man; I’m betting on the monster we created, one the likes of which has never walked the North before,” she explained with vicious amusement.

“That’s a tad dramatic. He’s just a hobgoblin, and not a terribly old one at that,” Saeter countered.

“There has never been a goblin like him, and you know it. He will kill those men because that’s what he is, a predator. Wolves need not fear the lamb,” Herad replied coldly.

“Those are some well armed sheep,” Saeter muttered as he turned and looked in the direction Blacknail had gone.

The hobgoblin himself was now walking towards the fallen archer and scanning the rooftops for any sign of enemies. He slipped between squads of Herad’s men as he moved in order to keep out of sight of any watchers.

When he was sure no one hostile was looking he dashed off the main drag and into a shadowy alley that was squeezed between two large warehouses. Once there he started creeping further in as he listened for any signs of his prey.

He might not know where the enemy was, how many of them there were, or what they were planning but he did know where he needed to go. He had made a perfect plan of his own earlier for dealing with the assassins after all.

Now, he just had to adjust the plan slightly and figure out how not to get shot by the assassins’ crossbows. They were an unwelcome addition to his scheme but one he was sure he could work around, or at least dodge at the last second.

Blacknail decided to head towards the closest location Herad had placed archers. Trying to chase down assassins through these dark side streets seemed like a lot of work, but if the enemy was here to get rid of the archers then they would serve as the perfect bait. The suddenly eager hobgoblin rushed through the dirty alleyways towards his target.

It only took him a few moments to find one of his tribes’ archer stations. From behind a pile of crates he observed five men who were standing on a rooftop above him. Two of them were on watch while the other three were resting.

However, Blacknail immediately noticed several blind spots that he, or an assassin, could use to approach them unseen. The hobgoblin shook his head in disapproval. These members of his tribe weren’t very good sentries. It was a good thing Blacknail was here to protect them, or most of them anyway...

The hobgoblin circled around the area until he found somewhere he could watch the two best ways to sneak up to the archers. The building was right on the edge of the battlefield, and a large section of it had been collapsed to serve as part of the barrier that funneled attackers towards the main street. The northern side was still standing though, and it made a good lookout spot. Blacknail climbed up and perched at a window on the second floor.

If he waited there he was sure the assassins would soon show themselves. They were after Herad’s isolated archers and this group had made them themselves vulnerable. These enemies moved like predators, if not very good ones, so they would without a doubt be drawn to weakness, and that made them predictable.

As Blacknail waited among the rubble and shadows the voices of the archers reached his long green ears.

“Are you sure we're just supposed to be sitting around here?” one of them asked.

“Do you see anymore enemies coming down the main street? No? Then that’s what Herad told us to do,” another bandit replied.

On one hand Blacknail wanted to smack them for being so loud and drawing attention to themselves, but on the other hand that was exactly what he wanted them to do. Maybe he could smack the survivors after the battle was over.

The hobgoblin’s thoughts were interrupted by a rustling noise, like heavy cloth rubbing up against something. A second later a trio of cloaked figures pulled themselves up onto a nearby roof. They crouched there for a few seconds to make sure no one had noticed them and then started to slowly and quietly make their way across the shingled roof.

Blacknail smiled wickedly as he watched them from his perch. It was time for him to get moving. He quickly turned away from the window and climbed down the pile of rubble that he’d used to get to the second floor.

The assassins were using one of the routes he had scouted out earlier to approach the archers so he knew exactly what he had to do. It was too bad that he hadn’t had time to set any traps…

Silently, Blacknail dashed across the street and started climbing up the side of an ivy covered building. The thick vines allowed him to easily make his way up to the roof. He was then positioned perfectly to ambush the assassins.

As Malthus’ men crossed the last stretch of roof Blacknail peeked around a brick chimney and observed them. They were focused on sneaking up on their targets. The idea that someone might be stalking them in turn didn’t seem to have occurred to them, and that made Blacknail feel all tingly inside.

The slate rooftops in this part of the city were squeezed close together. It was easy enough to jump from some of them to others. Any trace of the morning’s dampness had been erased by the hot rays of the midday sun that hung overhead.

The squad of five archers was still positioned on a rooftop that overlooked the battlefield and the now smoldering remains of Herad’s barricade. On the roof next to them the trio of assassins were creeping ever closer by using the slant of the roof to conceal themselves. On the next building over a hobgoblin lurked behind a chimney stack and was eagerly awaiting the fun that was about to start.

One of the assassins had a crossbow strapped to his back. He looked up over the peak of the roof at his targets, and then pulled the weapon off his back and began loading it. His two companions began unsheathing their blades.

The first assassin rose and sighted on the back of one of the archers’ lookouts. He didn’t take the shot though; instead the other two men crept out of hiding and started creeping closer. In just a few moments the two swordsmen would be upon the archers. They might have been outnumbered but with the element of surprise on their side they would make quick work of Herad’s men.

Blacknail would almost have been impressed by the maneuver if they hadn’t left themselves completely open to a counter ambush. That was undoubtedly all you could expect from a bunch of fat city humans.

The hobgoblin quickly pulled his own bow off his back and drew an arrow. He then aimed at the crossbowman. Just as the first of the enemy swordsmen made the long step over to the other roof Blacknail let the string go. There was a sharp tang as the arrow zoomed through the air and slammed into the back of the crossbowman. As the man gasped and crumpled the hobgoblin yelled out a warning to his unprepared tribesman.

“Oh no-ss, the enemy is attacking. Quickly, protect-ss yourselves!” he screamed shrilly at the top of lungs.

The two swordsmen instantly froze and threw startled looks back at Blacknail and the corpse of their companion. The sentry also spun around and his eyes widened in surprise when he saw Blacknail. He quickly noticed the attacking assassins as well.

“Hells, an attack!” he cursed loudly.

At the sound of his voice the two swordsmen jumped back into action and charged the sentry. The bandit took a scared step backwards and tried to draw his sword. He didn’t have enough time though, and he had to give up and dodge out of the way of a slash from the lead assassin.

However, the sudden evasive movement caused the lookout to lose his balance, and Blacknail winced as he toppled over the side of the roof and disappeared from sight. That was going to hurt…

The attackers didn’t waste any time in racing after the other archers. They clearly wanted to reach them before they were ready.

Blacknail dashed carefully across the tiled roof after them. The tiles threatened to come loose beneath his feet, but he had to keep the enemy in sight or they might get away. The sounds of fighting rose from the other rooftop as he moved.

He jumped across the gap between the buildings and ran up the side of the roof. Below him on the opposite slope the two assassins who were left were fighting the three remaining members of Herad’s band. Judging by the bleeding corpse lying prone on the roof one of the archers had already fallen.

Now though, the remaining archers had discarded their useless bows and drawn their close combat weapons. Two of them had short swords and one had a small hand axe. Unfortunately for them they didn’t seem very good at using them.

The two assassins still clearly had the upper hand in the fight. Their blades flashed through the air and forced the bandits back. It was all the archers could do to defend themselves as they flailed about with their own weapons. The clay tiles of the roof also made the footing treacherous so it was a sloppy mess of a fight.

As hobgoblin ran towards the closest enemy, he jumped over the tip of the roof and then kicked out with both feet. His boots slammed into the shoulder of one of the assassins and the impact knocked him sideways with more than enough force to send him right over the edge.

There was a surprised yell and a smacking noise from below as the man hit the ground. This was quickly followed by a series of crashes as a section of clay tiles came loose and slid of the roof.

Blacknail landed next to the last remaining attacker, but the tiles below him came loose from the impact and started to slide. The hobgoblin scrambled to find his balance and get a solid grip on the roof.

“Oopsie,” Blacknail hissed in annoyance as his footing shifted beneath him. This wasn’t good.

The last enemy was startled but quick to react. He lurched around and swung down at Blacknail’s head with his sword. The hobgoblin’s eyes widened in alarm as the silver flash descended towards his face.

A surge of panic jolted through him and Blacknail instinctevely reached deep inside himself to burn a bit of residual Elixir. With lightning speed he twisted to the side, found solid footing, and drew his own blade to parry the blow.

The impact knocked the assassin off balance for a second, and he didn’t get time to recover. An axe slammed into his back and the man’s eyes went wide with shock. His legs gave out a second later and he toppled over.

“Thank you,” Blacknail told the bandit who had finished the last assassin off.

“Ha, we’re the ones that should be thanking you. If you hadn’t yelled out that warning they would have gone through us like Ritchet Oil through a sick sheep,” the axe wielder replied.

Blacknail gave him a blank stare. Like what through a what? What was this crazy human talking about?

“Er, no problem,” the hobgoblin replied as he brushed himself off.

All that fighting had gotten his clothes dirty. Stupid assassins, and their running around on unsafe rooftops! He snorted in annoyance and kicked the corpse of the assassin off the roof. It fell in a clatter of shattering tiles. Why did humans put such dangerous things on their roofs?

Anyway, the first part of Blacknail’s amazing plan was complete. The second part was for him to get the rest of the assassins’ attention. The third was for him to kill Malthus and all his annoying cloaked minions. He wasn’t quite at the third step yet, but he was getting there, and he was really looking forward to it.

The hobgoblin walked over to the peak of the roof and coughed to clear his throat.

“Malthus, you stupid-ss fat pink bastard! I just killed three of your little friends and I’m going-ss keep killing more of them until you fight me! So come here and face me, unless you’re-ss as cowardly as you are ugly!” he yelled shrilly at the top of his lungs.

The sound of his voice echoed over the city. The remaining archers that were standing beside him gave the hobgoblin shocked looks. They seemed more than a little nervous.

“Oh right-ss, you may want to find somewhere-ss else to hang out. Things are probably going-ss to get-ss exciting here soon,” Blacknail told them thoughtfully. 






QOS 12









The bandit archers that Blacknail had saved from the assassins took his advice and decided to leave. It would have been pointless for them to have stayed to help him fight, but it would have also been nice of them to offer. Humans sure were an ungrateful bunch.

Before they left Blacknail borrowed some of their rope. The hobgoblin was a little concerned that Malthus would get lost and not be able to find his location, so he wandered back over to the first assassin he’d killed. He then picked the corpse up and hung the cloaked body by its neck from the tallest nearby chimney. There was no way Malthus could miss that helpful sign!

Now all he had to do was be patient…

Wait, what if Malthus didn’t come because he suspected an ambush or something? That would ruin Blacknail’s perfect plan.

“This isn’t a trap. I just want-ss to kill you, Malthus!” Blacknail yelled out to clarify things.

The sound of his voice echoed loudly over the nearby rooftops and through the dark alleys between them. The hobgoblin was more than a little disappointed when no one yelled back to thank him for the explanation.

Standing around on the rooftop was definitely getting boring. Why couldn’t Herad fight people who were more interesting and talked more?

Blacknail impatiently strolled along the rooftops as he waited for his enemies to show up. He would occasionally stop to throw out a few more insults, apparently Malthus was the son of a goat, but the hobgoblin kept his head down and eyes open. The fact that the assassins were running around with crossbows hadn’t slipped his mind.

A few minutes later Blacknail finally heard the sound of someone trying to sneak up on him. He quickly looked over his shoulder to see a flurry of movement in an alley below him as several cloaked figures dove for cover.

“I think he saw us,” one of the men whispered.

“That’s impossible,” another replied quietly.

“I can-ss hear you too!” Blacknail answered back helpfully.

He wanted them to stop sneaking around and attack him already. There really was no point in them trying to sneak up on him.

“Damnation, how in all the hells can he do that?” one of the assassins cursed.

“Maybe he just guessed what we said, and he didn’t actually hear us,” another suggested.

There was a moment of silence as the assassins thought this possibility over.

“I’m not-ss just guessing; I can-ss really hear you,” Blacknail yelled back.

“Rot and ruin! It must be some sort of magic,” one of them cursed from where he was hiding behind a pile of trash.

“He could have just guessed that we’d think he was guessing,” the first assassin added thoughtfully.

There was another second of silence. Then the hobgoblin heard a smacking sound like someone had just gotten slapped or punched and Malthus spoke up.

“Just shut up, you idiot. It doesn’t matter how he’s doing it! Everyone just stay silent; we’re switching to hand signals from now on,” he commanded his men.

“Just hurry up! You’re taking-ss forever,” Blacknail impatiently shouted their way.

“Shut your vile trap you freakish bastard!” Malthus yelled back angrily.

“You’re not supposed to be talking!” the hobgoblin pointed out cheerfully.

Blacknail may have just been imagining it, but it almost sounded like he could hear Malthus grinding his teeth all the way from the roof. Was he angry for some reason? He was just trying to be helpful so that the assassins would stop wasting so much of his time.

The hobgoblin waited for Malthus and his men to approach him. After a few seconds they tried to slip around the other side of the building and flank him. Blacknail sighed in annoyance at their snail-like pace.

Well if they wouldn’t come to him then he would just go to them! The hobgoblin broke out into a dash. The thump of his footsteps as he ran knocked the tiles beneath his boots loose and they started to slide and fall off of the roof and onto the ground below.

Blacknail jumped the gap between ledges and landed on the next roof over. He scrambled to catch his balance for a second and then continued running straight for Malthus and the assassins, or at least towards the roof that hung over their heads.

After another quick leap he passed them right by and just kept on running. There was muttered swearing from the alley below as the hobgoblin zoomed by, and Blacknail smiled in self-satisfaction. His plan was perfect. All he had to do was get Malthus to follow him, and he had a fairly good idea about how to do that.

“You idiots are too slow. I’m just going-ss to lose you in the city and then go kill-ss Zelena,” he yelled as he ran by.

The muttering from below intensified, and was quickly followed a stampede of footsteps. It definitely sounded like all the assassins were chasing him.

“Quick, after him! Don’t let him escape, but keep an eye out for ambushes. This is probably a trap,” Malthus ordered his minions as he took off after the hobgoblin.

The rooftops were treacherous and harder to run on than the streets below, and that slowed Blacknail down somewhat. They also allowed him to take more than a few shortcuts though, and more importantly he was a hobgoblin Vessel, so he was easily able to keep his lead. In fact, he had to slow down several times so that he didn’t get too far ahead.

At the brisk pace he was keeping Blacknail soon led his pursuers out of Herad’s territory in the warehouse district and out into the city proper. The roofs under his feet and the buildings that supported them grew smaller. The occasional citizen of Daggerpoint also appeared below now that they were away from the battle.

As a Vessel Malthus was by far the fastest runner in his squad, but he seemed reluctant to leave his men behind and that slowed him down. All the assassins were also on the ground below Blacknail, and he was above them on the rooftops, so they couldn’t attack him no matter how close they got.

Or at least that was true for the first few minutes of the chase. Suddenly, there was a series of odd thumps from below and a curious Blacknail looked over the edge just in time to see Malthus launch himself off a pile of crates, grab a post that protruded from a wall, swing himself up, twist through the air, and then roll onto the roof.

The maneuver slowed the assassin down and left Blacknail with a strong lead so he wasn’t too worried though. Even though Malthus was a Vessel he was still human so Blacknail was confident he could outrun him.

The hobgoblin grinned smugly at the assassin without concern, until there was a shout from below and Malthus reached over the edge of the roof just in time to catch a crossbow one of his subordinates had thrown up to him. Blacknail’s smile quickly faded after that.

“Uh oh, that’s bad-ss as bugs,” he swore to himself.

The still running assassin leader pulled out a bolt and started struggling to load his crossbow while he was still moving. Unfortunately, Blacknail was fairly sure he would get it right soon. He was proven correct a few seconds later when an ominous clicking noise rang out behind him.

All of a sudden Blacknail wasn’t left with very many good options, so he jumped off the roof. A second later a crossbow bolt whistled over his head and flew off into the city.

The, still crossbow bolt free, hobgoblin now hung in the empty air over the street that ran beside the edge of the roof. A split second later he began to drop inexorably towards the rather hard looking cobblestones below.

So he twisted around and grabbed a clothesline that hung over the road. His weight dragged the line downwards and he began to slide down its length towards the center of the street, until the line broke with a sharp snap.

“Piss on crossbows!” Blacknail hissed as he flailed in the air and fell uncontrollably towards the ground again.

There was nothing else nearby he could grab, so he tucked himself up and rolled when he hit the ground. The rough stone and gravel of the street dug into his back as he careened across the street and smashed into a stack of crates.

Luckily, the crates weren’t solidly built. The thin wood shattered easily when the cart-wheeling hobgoblin hit them to reveal that they were stuffed full of packing straw. Bits of broken wood jabbed painfully into his sides as he slammed suddenly to a stop, but the cloak that he was now tangled up in stopped any of them from drawing blood.

“Ow,” the hobgoblin whined as straw rained down around him. The only part of him that was visible was his feet. They stuck up into the air while the rest of his body was hidden by shattered crates and their contents.

“He’s down, get him!” Malthus yelled from a nearby rooftop as he reloaded his crossbow.

Blacknail’s head poked out from the pile of wreckage he was buried in and he spat out a mouthful of straw. He didn’t feel so great. The city seemed blurry and to be spinning around him for some reason.

There was something else that felt wrong too… His face felt oddly exposed.

His mask! Blacknail quickly pulled his mask back on. It must have come loose when he’d crashed. Luckily, it didn’t seem like anyone had seen his face. Herad had told him to keep his identity a secret.

Blacknail shook his head to clear it and quickly rose to his feet, just as the first of his pursuers ran around the corner of a close by building and came into sight. It was time to go!

“There he is!” one of the assassins yelled as he pointed to Blacknail.

The hobgoblin immediately broke out into a sprint towards the nearest alley. He almost tripped as he struggled to untangle his cloak from his feet but caught himself at the last second. He had to get out of sight before Malthus reloaded that crossbow!

He apparently made it because no pointy objects slammed into his back as he dashed for cover. The good news was that he was almost at his destination now. The bad news was that every bone in his body hurt and his vision was still a little blurry.

The assassins entered the alley only moments after Blacknail, but he had already sprinted a fair distance ahead. Since Malthus was still more than a bit behind the hobgoblin took gleeful advantage of his absence. He pulled his sling out and sent a hail of stones at the men chasing him. They whirred through the air and smashed into the unsuspecting assassins.

“Bloody bastard,” one of them swore as a stone slammed into his shin.

He dropped to the ground, and he wasn’t alone. Another assassin also took a rock to his stomach and fell. That left… just four more assassins plus Malthus that were still chasing him.

One of the remaining pursuers dove for cover and pulled a crossbow off his back, so Blackail hurriedly fled down the alley. Rotten contraptions, why did all his enemies seem to have them? This would be a lot easier if he didn’t constantly need to worry about being shot!

Blacknail threw himself around the corner of a building and out of the shadows of the alley. He burst at a full sprint out onto a wide sunlit street.

“Ah, which way-ss now?” Blacknail hissed to himself.

All that dodging had gotten him turned around and he had to take a second to figure out where he was. He didn’t dare slow down though.

Homes made from wood and white plaster lined the edges of the road, and the running hobgoblin drew curious glances from several people who were walking by. It was far from crowded here but there were several dozen rough looking men and women scattered about. This was Daggerpoint though, so he was mostly ignored. No one wanted to get involved in something that didn’t concern them.

The assassins ran out of the alley a few seconds later, and Malthus had already gotten off the roof and caught up to them somehow. Blacknail veered left to place a small crowd of six people between him and his pursuers just as Malthus raised his crossbow.

“What in all hells!” a woman swore as she noticed the weapon that was seemingly aimed towards her.

The rest of her group flinched and two of the men drew their swords. Malthus tossed his bolt thrower to the assassin on his left and then drew his own blade. He dove forward with an angry growl and his sword flashed through the air.

The assassin’s blade knocked one of the men’s weapons aside and then he slashed through the other's exposed wrist. The second man shrieked in pain and his sword dropped from his now bloody mangled hand. Malthus then dove through the remaining unresisting members of the crowd and after the hobgoblin.

Shouts of surprise and alarm rang out as the assassin leader scattered people in his wake and they fled from him. Blacknail started running a little faster. He was almost there now!

The street was now almost completely empty of pedestrians as everyone fled from the ruckus, but now Malthus himself was between Blacknail and the crossbowman.

The hobgoblin suddenly turned right and vaulted over a small waist-high wooden post fence that stretched the short distance between two homes. He landed on packed dirt with sparse grass sprouting up from it. Malthus was hot on his heels and the hobgoblin had to run as quickly as possible to stay ahead of him.

A tall stone wall blocked his way, so Blacknail jumped up on top of a barrel and then flipped over the barrier. He landed in a cluster of bushes on the other side and quickly scrambled to his feet.

There were no buildings on this side of the wall. Thick scrubby bush and gangly trees filled the area. The ground was dry and cracked but it showed obvious signs of flooding in the spring. That was probably why no one had built anything here. It was a forgotten little corner of Daggerpoint that had been allowed to run wild.

While exploring the city Blacknail had discovered several places like this, but this was the closest one to Herad’s base. Blacknail grinned as he ducked out of sight behind a tree. This is where he had decided to prepare his fun little surprises. It was time to see how these fat city humans did in Blacknail’s natural environment!

As the hobgoblin watched Malthus appeared atop the stone wall. The man grimaced and cursed quietly to himself as he scanned the bush below him. He seemed hesitant to chase his target into the thicket.

Blacknail was tempted to taunt him but he knew that wouldn’t help. Not knowing where his target was and whether he had doubled back towards the battlefield was undoubtedly bugging him.

After a minute or two Malthus’ cloaked subordinates climbed up onto the wall next to him. They also seemed less than happy when they saw what lay ahead of them.

“What do you think?” Malthus asked.

“I think he led us here on purpose,” an assassin remarked.

“There’s no way he’s led us into an ambush. It would take a half a company to secure this bush and we’d see signs of them,” another man replied.

“Not to mention there’s no way Herad would throw away that many men during a battle,” Malthus added.

“What if he just wants to waste our time while we search this foul mess for him? He could be long gone,” one of the other assassins asked.

Malthus scowled darkly and stared into the bush and trees for any signs of Blacknail. He appeared to be deep in thought and conflicted about what to do.

“No, he’s in there. He’s alone, wounded from his fall, and cornered. I’m not losing this chance to take him out. I don’t care if Zelena wins her little battle. I want this bastard dead. Daggerpoint is our territory; there isn’t room in it for both us and this freak,” he eventually told his men.

There were reluctant nods of acknowledgement from the other four assassins, and together Malthus and his men jumped down into the thicket below. They landed among the bushes and took up a spread out formation as they pressed forward.

From where he was lurking and watching, Blacknail purred quietly to himself in pleasure and his eyes flashed with malevolent joy. The chase had ended and the real hunt had now begun. His perfect plan had reached the final stage.

The hobgoblin carefully turned and began to silently creep away from his pursuers. He then purposely stepped on a large twig. The piece of wood broke under his weight and made a loud snapping sound.

Instantly, the assassins turned towards the noise, but they couldn’t see him through the heavy brush. They thus began to move carefully towards the source of the noise. Blacknail giggled to himself as he led them deeper into the shadows of the trees. 















QOS 13










As Blacknail slipped through the trees and around the nearby thorny bushes, a bird sang out from up above in the trees and drew his attention for a second. It had been a while since he last remembered hearing such a sound. There weren’t a lot of songbirds among the dirty streets of Daggerpoint.

He could reminisce later though; right now he had people to hunt. Or were they hunting him? It was a little confusing…

The rustling of plants reminded the hobgoblin that Malthus was chasing him. Blacknail threw a quick look over his shoulder and was surprised when he saw nothing but living green plants and a canopy of leaves fading to red and autumn gold.

He could no longer see the shaped stones and squat buildings of Daggerpoint. The hobgoblin stretched and straightened his posture as he felt an unseen weight leave his shoulders. It was good to be back among nature and away from the places humans had made their own.

He reached up towards his face with a clawed hand and pulled his smiling mask off. The hobgoblin then tossed it aside into a bush where he could retrieve it later. This was not a place for wearing masks. His green angular face broke out into a wide toothy smile as it was exposed to the world.

In the wild, even in this little isolated patch of it, things were different, purer. There was nothing to hold him back or make him question himself. His thoughts could run free without restraint or the weakness that came from hesitation.

A branch snapped off to his left and the hobgoblin’s long green ears twitched as they picked up the noise. Without a doubt it was Malthus and his pack. The assassins were making quite a bit of noise as they moved through the woods, much more than Blacknail.

The area here was more brush than true forest. The trees were small and spread apart enough that there was no real canopy to block the light. That just made the undergrowth thicker, though. There were bushes and tall stands of plants everywhere for him to hide in, and walking in straight line was difficult.

The hobgoblin had assumed the assassins would be unaccustomed to wilder places, and it sounded like he’d been right. He was having no trouble keeping track of them and slipping ahead of them unseen.

He wasn’t even trying to conceal his trail but they didn’t seem to be able to follow it regardless. Thus, he would have to remember to make some noise every once in a while. The humans couldn’t be allowed to believe he had escaped. He needed them to follow him.

It was a delicate game he was playing with these hunters of men. There was an uneasy balance that had to be kept. To win and claim his prize Blacknail would have to prey upon their instincts and shape their desires to his own end.

He had to appear weak and vulnerable so to lure them in, and yet he couldn’t allow them to draw in too close. He had to get them to walk into his trap and believe that it had been their own idea. Luckily, most humans were very stupid.

As he approached a cluster of thin white barked trees the hobgoblin heard movement off in the bushes from a fair distance behind him. A second later he heard the rustle of leaves from out of sight and over to his left. Blacknail took a second to look over his shoulder and scan the forest behind him.

It really was quite easy to track Malthus and his men in here. He could hear their untrained footsteps crunching twigs and leaves as they pushed their way through the brush. The assassins were spread out but it sounded like they were keeping in sight of each other as they combed through the grass and bushes for any sign of him.

Right now his prey was falling too far behind for his liking. Blacknail coughed and sputtered loudly, as if he was in pain and couldn’t help it.

He wanted them to think he was wounded and vulnerable, and not thinking about how stupid of an idea it was to have followed him in here. The more they underestimated him the easier it would be to trick them. The coughing wasn’t really fake though, he had just fallen off a roof after all. That had hurt a lot.

A loud twang-like noise suddenly split the air behind Blacknail.

“Eep!” the hobgoblin squeaked in alarm as he dropped to the ground and covered his head.

A crossbow bolt ripped through the greenery with a whipping sound. There was then a loud crack as the projectile sunk deep into the bark of a tree trunk that lay several feet ahead of him.

The forest behind Blacknail suddenly echoed with the crashing and snapping of plants as Malthus and his men shot forward and pushed their way through the forest towards Blacknail. It was time to get going!

The startled hobgoblin jumped to his feet and dashed forward deeper into the trees. As he ran he snuck a look back and saw Malthus’ form burst out of a thicket of bushes and throw an angry look around. Blacknail quickly stepped behind a tree and out of sight.

Okay, maybe he had let Malthus get a little too close that time. Blacknail was glad the assassins only had one crossbow…

“Damn that bastard to all hells! I thought we had him this time,” Malthus hissed angrily.

The master assassin was standing next to where Blacknail had been a few seconds ago and staring hatefully at the crossbow bolt stuck in the tree.

“Do you want to turn back?” one of his men asked with more than a hint of nervousness in his voice.

“No, we’re right behind him,” Malthus replied angrily.

“I still think this is a trap,” the other man replied.

“Of course it’s a trap; we know that, and it doesn’t matter. Stop letting a little patch of bushes and trees unnerve you and let’s get after him,” Malthus commanded his men.

Blacknail took advantage of their discussion to slip away to the side and put some distance between him and his pursuers. He really needed to take care of that crossbow. It was too much of a wild card, and being shot would probably hurt a lot.

The hobgoblin crouched down behind a bush and squinted as he watched the assassins. All six of them had been close together while they talked but now they were spreading out again. It was the one on the far right that held the crossbow.

There was no way he could charge the man before Malthus intervened, and even using his sling would involve getting dangerously close and revealing himself. It also wasn’t guaranteed to take the man down in one hit, and it might convince Malthus to turn around and leave.

Well, it was probably about time to begin anyway. He had lured them deep enough. He would just have to position everything just right so that the crossbowman got taken out first.

The hobgoblin slowly got up and crept further away from the assassins. When he was far enough away that a screen of bushes and leafy tree limbs concealed him he stopped. Then he looked down, selected a fairly large twig, and stomped on it.

The twig snapped beneath his boot and a loud cracking noise echoed through the forest. Blacknail was already diving behind a tree. A second later another crossbow bolt tore through the greenery and sliced through the air where his chest had been mere moments before.

Blacknail picked himself off the ground and peered around the tree he had used as a shield. One of his eyebrows rose in surprise at how accurate the shot had been. That assassin was really good with a crossbow. The hobgoblin was definitely killing that guy first.

Blacknail hurriedly got up and began dashing through the forest. He made absolutely no attempt to be quiet about it, and instead just focused on keeping ahead of his pursuers. Underneath the sound of his own footsteps he could hear his pursuers. It was also important to keep the crossbowman too busy running to reload.

A large tree with dark droopy branches appeared on Blacknail’s left and he recognized it. With a cunning grin he ran up to it, and then threw himself onto the ground beside it. He coughed again loudly and then moaned dramatically.

Seconds later, Malthus and his men burst out of the bushes and saw him. Blacknail picked himself off the ground slowly as if he was in pain and had just tripped. The hobgoblin had discarded his mask but his hood was still up. It wasn’t quite time to drop that yet.

“I’ve got you this time! You can’t escape now, and no one will be coming to your rescue,” Malthus gloated smugly as he smiled.

Blacknail ignored him and stepped around the tree. Which way would each assassin go?

There was a click as the crossbowman began reloading and Blacknail’s heart skipped a beat. The trick here would be to predict exactly what the assassins would do. He needed to be careful though, Malthus had fooled him before by pretending to be too angry to think properly.

Malthus signaled to his men using a quick series of hand gestures that Blacknail didn’t understand. Immediately though, two assassin including the crossbowman started circling around to the left. Malthus and the other 3 men headed straight for Blacknail.

The hobgoblin turned to face them and drew his sword. The crossbowman raised his weapon so Blacknail took a quick step backwards. The gnarly trunk of the large tree was now in the way of a shot, but the crossbowman and his guard just started flanking Blacknail to cut off his escape as the rest of their companions descended on the lone hobgoblin.

Blacknail had them exactly where he wanted them.

“So much for the Faceless Assassin! When you die at my hands it will be just another chapter added to my legend. You weren’t even much of challenge, although I have to admit you’re a lucky fool and not half bad at running away,” Malthus bragged as he drew his own weapon.

“Things are not-ss always as they seem, Malthus. Perhaps you are the one that-ss is about to die,” Blacknail replied.

“I am the best killer in all of Daggerpoint and you’re just a creepy little freak. No man is my equal. I’ll take great joy in ripping that hood off your face and seeing what lies beneath it,” the assassin leader responded angrily.

Blacknail began to laugh and he didn’t bother trying to sound human. His shrill malevolent laughter rolled over the assassins and they flinched in surprise. Even Malthus looked startled by the sound.

“Stupid human, Herad is not a man and you ran from her. Soon, you will see my face and then you shall run from me as well,” the hobgoblin cackled.

“Shoot him!” Malthus roared impatiently but with a hint of fear. He had clearly been unnerved by the strange laughter.

The crossbowman aimed his weapon and began to take a step to the left to get a better shot at Blacknail. The hobgoblin leaned around the tree and gave him a toothy grin. The assassin stared in shock and his eyes widened in horror at what he saw beneath Blacknail’s hood. That was when the spear took him in the stomach.

The spear was a long sharpened branch that had been tied to a forcibly bent over sapling. It had been concealed in a bush and been triggered by the assassin’s foot hitting a trip wire. Saeter had taught him how to make them to hunt deer or wild boar but it worked on humans just as well.

The crossbow fell from the man’s slack hands and hit the ground. He gasped as he looked down at the wooden spear that was stuck in his guts and started shivering uncontrollably.

The rest of the assassins gaped in confusion as they tried to make sense of what had just happened. That was when the sling stone smashed into the forehead of the assassin standing next to the crossbowman.

There was a loud crack and a spray of blood as the stone tore through his flesh and slammed into his skull.

Blacknail was already burning Elixir and dashing forwards before either of the assassins’ bodies began to crumple. The hobgoblin laughed again as he ran towards the fallen man’s weapon.

It had worked! That was two men down. The first piece of the puzzle had fallen into place and now all Blacknail had to do was follow the rest of the plan. He was truly a sneaky super genius!

“Shit, what in all hells!” a surprised Malthus cursed as he sprinted after the hobgoblin.

The man was fast but not as fast as Blacknail. He may have been closer to his fallen companions but surprise had slowed his start as well.

Blacknail reached the weapon first and scooped it up. He spun around and grinned as he aimed it at the master assassin. Malthus reacted quickly this time and dodged away to the side, but Blacknail had predicted this. The hobgoblin shot the assassin that had been following in Malthus’ footsteps instead.

That was three down. The man shrieked in pain as the bolt punctured his chest and then collapsed a second later. Blacknail quickly tore the string off the crossbow. He then threw it straight at Malthus’ charging form.

The assassin flinched and batted the flying weapon aside with his blade. Blacknail jumped to the side and dashed away. The last two of Malthus’ minions that were still standing tried to intercept him and cut off his escape.

“No, don’t chase him. There are more traps!” Malthus roared suddenly.

His cloaked subordinates froze in their tracks and warily scanned the ground at their feet while keeping one eye on Blacknail. They didn’t want to be caught off guard by a shot from his sling.

The hobgoblin himself ran to the edge the bushes and then turned back around. He was a safe distance away now.

Malthus slowly and carefully walked over to his companion’s side. He looked calm but Blacknail could see rage smoldering behind his eyes. It amused the watching hobgoblin. He liked pissing off Malthus.

The master assassin suddenly whipped a throwing knife at Blacknail’s head, but he easily leaned out of the way. He was too far away for such knives to be much of a threat. Malthus growled as he stared at Blacknail.

“Do you think that just because you managed to take out a few of my men that you’ve won? Nothing could be further from the truth, Faceless One. As long as I live your days are numbered, and it will take more than a few traps made from pointy sticks to kill me,” he hissed angrily.

Blacknail just laughed again. The time for hiding who and what he was over. Now it was time to spread delicious fear and panic.

“I have just gotten started, arrogant man. You won’t-ss leave this forest alive. It was so very stupid-ss of you to follow me-ss here. Also, my name is Blacknail, and-ss I have a face,” the hobgoblin replied haughtily.

He grinned broadly and then reached up slowly to pull down his hood. His enemies froze as they got their first view of his green skin, pointy ears, long nose, and sharp jagged teeth. Blacknail could see the blood drain from their cheeks as they took in his inhuman visage. It made him laugh again.

“Cor-Dius’ cloak shield us. He’s not human,” one of the assassins whispered in horror.

Blacknail took a step forward and stared into the eyes of the closest enemy. The man stared back with wide eyed dread.

“Rawr,” the hobgoblin yelled as he lurched forward a step.

The man shrieked and fell over backwards as he tried to stumble away. Blacknail chuckled darkly at the stupid human and licked his lips in anticipation of what was to come.

He then turned to the still frozen Malthus and gave him a brief bow, before stepping into the bushes and out of sight.

“Soon…” the hobgoblin’s eerie voice promised as he walked away.

He shivered in excitement as he crept through the forest and circled around his prey. The humans had yet to move. They stood there for several seconds without saying anything.

“We should never have come here. We’re going to be killed and eaten!” one of the men whispered fearfully.

“Shut up or I’ll kill you myself,” Malthus told him as he stared his subordinate down.

The man was shivering in fear and he couldn’t meet his boss’ eyes. Malthus snorted in disgust.

“So he’s not human; it changes nothing! It won’t stop me from cutting his head off with my sword, and it actually explains a lot,” Malthus exclaimed.

“He’s right about one thing, though. We should not have walked into these woods,” the last man added fearfully.

Malthus grunted darkly in reply as he scanned the nearby greenery for signs of Blacknail. He was still looking more than a little pale and jumpy.

“That was definitely a mistake, but we’re far from finished. I’m not scared of a little green freak that likes to hide in bushes,” the master assassin told his men, but judging by their skeptical expressions they didn’t seem too reassured by his speech.

As Blacknail watched from his new hiding spot next to a pile of rocks and thorny plants, he smiled. Malthus was clearly lying. The wind reeked of blood and terror, and those delightful smells were only going to grow stronger… 










QOS 14










Blacknail the hobgoblin stalked through the dense forest scrub with a merry spring in his step and a huge grin on his face. He had just killed three human warriors! How amazing was that? Incredibly super unbelievably amazing is what it was!

When he finished off Malthus and his last two minions it would be a total of… seven human warriors! He couldn’t wait to tell everyone about how awesome he was. Saeter would be so impressed, Herad would give him more cheese than he could possibly eat, and everyone else would finally realize how much better at everything he was than them.

Up ahead, across a few dozen feet of thick bush, the three remaining assassins were slowly trudging back towards the city. They were slowed down by the need to check for traps and watch for ambushes. Much to Blacknail’s disappointment they’d already found and disarmed one that had been in their way.

The hobgoblin was keeping his distance from his prey for now, and waiting for an opportunity to appear. At the pace they were going they wouldn’t be able to escape from the forest any time soon, so he could afford to be patient. Rushing in would be stupid; Malthus wasn’t a human he intended to underestimate again.

After a few more minutes of watching, Blacknail stealthily moved up beside his quarry and narrowed the distance between them. The assassin to Malthus’ left was beginning to slow. Instinctively, the hobgoblin’s eyes picked out the fact that the man’s legs were dragging and his shoulders had started to slouch.

Blacknail’s heart beat sped up and his mind focused. Distractions and other thoughts were pushed aside as he studied his prey. He sensed weakness and that was an opportunity waiting to be taken advantage of.

He tore his eyes away from the man and turned to study the terrain. If the assassins kept their current course they would soon pass next to a small ridge. It was the perfect place for an ambush. Now he had both a place and a target. It was time to put his latest brilliant scheme into action!

The hobgoblin picked up his pace and moved through the underbrush to cut off his quarry’s path. He quickly crept through the trees until he reached the ridge. He then looked out from behind a large moss covered rock that sat at the very edge of the ridge. Malthus and his men were approaching so Blacknail quickly ducked back out of sight.

The trio of men were looking very nervous as they carefully moved through the brush. One of them flinched and jumped slightly when he was startled by the cry of a blackbird. He wasn’t Blacknail’s target though. The hobgoblin was aiming for the other assassin, the one that hadn’t reacted at all and looked tired.

As Malthus and his men drew closer, Blacknail took out his sling and silently loaded it with a stone from one of his pouches. He then peeked ever so slightly out from his hiding spot and watched hungrily for the right time to strike.

Below him, Malthus turned away to look off into the opposite side of the forest and the fatigued assassin slouched and looked down towards his feet. Blacknail made his move. There was a quiet rustling as the unseen hobgoblin rose to his feet and then a loud crack as his spinning sling unleashed its payload.

All three assassins flinched at the noise. The stone zipped through the air towards the off guard man’s chest, and instead of ducking or dodging he froze. Malthus acted quickly, though. The master assassin’s cloak whipped around him as he moved with lightning speed and tackled the other man to the ground.

Blacknail clenched his fists and hissed in annoyance as his projectile sailed harmlessly off into the trees. He didn’t have much time for regret though; Malthus was back on his feet within seconds and headed Blacknail’s way.

“Come face me, you cowardly abomination!” the Knifeman roared as he dashed towards the earthen ridge the hobgoblin stood atop of.

“Maybe later!” Blacknail yelled back as he quickly ran away and disappeared into the trees.

It took Malthus several seconds to climb up the small cliff that lay between them. The soil was loose and wet so by the time he got to the top the hobgoblin was long gone.

“Hells and damnation,” The master assassin cursed loudly to himself as he looked around.

He didn’t give chase, though. Instead, he reluctantly turned back around and rejoined his men in heading out of the bush.

“You’re just going to let that thing get away?” the anxious assassin asked.

“For now; there’s no bloody way I’m chasing that thing through its own territory. As far as I know the entire purpose of that attack was to try and lure me away and into more of those traps. No, all we need to do is get out of this damn bush and then we’re the ones with the advantage. I’m not going to underestimate that creature. It must be a hobgoblin, and I’ve heard stories about them,” Malthus replied.

A fair distance away Blacknail was hanging halfway up a slender tree. Its thick leaves hid him from below, but its thin grey trunk was still swaying slightly from his hurried ascent. It probably wasn’t the best hiding spot but he was stuck there now.

He waited there nervously for a few seconds as he listened for any signs of pursuit. When he didn’t hear anything the hobgoblin carefully climbed down and began to creep back after his prey. Now that he knew they weren’t hot on his trail he was safe, and he couldn’t let them get too far ahead or they would escape.

As he moved the hobgoblin’s eyes narrowed and his forehead grew lined. He had a problem he had to think through and solve. His ranged attack from ambush moments ago had been an obvious failure. He hadn’t managed to even wound anyone and he’d even had to flee for his life.

He was going to have to get closer if he wanted his next strike to succeed. That would be difficult though; he would need a new plan.

The assassins were terrible woodsmen but they weren’t blind or stupid. They knew what he looked like and would see him if he got too close. Hmmm, what if he changed his appearance, though?

Blacknail giggled and rubbed his hands together gleefully as a fun idea popped into his head. It was time to get down and dirty!

It had rained a bit earlier that morning so there were still a few scattered puddles and patches of wet ground around. The hobgoblin quickly headed over to the closest one he remembered and took off all his clothes. It had been quite a long time since he’d last run around naked, and it felt quite liberating, if a little cold.

The hobgoblin hastily and enthusiastically jumped into the muddy puddle and began rolling around. Mud and dirty water splashed up in to the air as he shifted his weight around.

It had also been quite a while since the last time he’d done this, and he’d missed it. The mud felt wonderful and cool on his skin, and so much better than wearing itchy clothes. Humans were so weird about covering themselves up. They’d probably enjoy the occasional mud bath if they tried it.

When Blacknail got back up the green skin that was stretched over his lanky frame was covered in muddy smears. The result was shifting patterns of green and dirty brown that blended in with the forest around him. After bundling up his gear and discarded clothes the hobgoblin headed back after his quarry. The mud on his skin was already starting to dry and flake off as he ran.

Once again, Blacknail circled around the assassins and got out ahead of them. Luckily, they had been slowed down because they’d run into a noose trap. The trap had done little more than snag one of the assassins’ feet and trip him, but it had prevented them from getting very far.

From a safe distance away, the very dirty and naked hobgoblin watched as Malthus cut his subordinate free and helped him back onto his feet. The third man was keeping watch in case Blacknail tried anything while Malthus was distracted.

Up ahead a thick hedge of thorny bushes cut the way forward off. There was only one real path through it. The tall briars had a gap in the middle of them that a human could easily walk through. It was probably some sort of game trail.

“Hmm, perfect-ss,” the hobgoblin murmured happily to himself when he saw it.

With one last look backwards to make sure the assassins were still occupied, Blacknail stalked through the trees and over to the pathway. A quick inspection of the area revealed a leafy depression that would conceal him, so he climbed in. He was only a few feet from the edge of the trail.

It was at moments like this that Blacknail really appreciated how bad human’s sense of smell was. It almost made things too easy.

Soon, his prey was moving again and the hobgoblin grinned in delight when they headed his way. From his hiding spot Blacknail waited for Malthus and the other men to pass by. He was both nervous and excited.

All three of the assassins were keeping close together, but the thin trail was only wide enough for one person at a time to walk comfortably so they were strung out in a line. Malthus was leading the other two and thus the first to walk by.

The master assassin made his way warily down the trail. He carefully studied the heaps of thorn bushes and other thick plants around him as he walked.

Then he stepped right next to Blacknail’s hiding spot and looked in his direction, but his eyes passed right over the hobgoblin. Nonetheless, Blacknail’s stomach twinged and he felt a flash of nervousness as he held completely still. He could have reached over and touched the master assassin.

Then Malthus was past the hobgoblin and walking away from him. There were still two more assassins left, but Blacknail relaxed and calmed down. Malthus was the one he was worried about.

The first of the two remaining enemies walked by without seeing anything either. The cloaked man didn’t even really bother to check his surroundings, most likely because Malthus already had. He just strolled along after his master. Now there was only the rearguard left.

The last of the assassins followed his companions through the gap. The nervous looking man was mostly focused on keeping an eye out for people sneaking up from behind, so he only looked in Blacknail’s direction for a split second before turning back around to stare anxiously at the forest behind him.

The assassin stepped next to Blacknail, and this time the hobgoblin reacted. The second the man’s back was turned the almost invisible hobgoblin silently stood up and stretched out his long thin arms.

One clawed hand instantly snapped down over the unsuspecting man’s mouth and sealed it, while the other reached around with a small dagger and quickly sliced open his pink throat. The hobgoblin’s victim tried to struggle and cry out but it was futile, his throat was gushing blood and Blacknail had him locked in a tight embrace. He couldn’t even fall over.

Malthus and the other man continued forward; they hadn’t heard a thing. As he carefully watched them walk away, Blacknail kept his victim’s mouth covered and slowly lowered him to the ground. He had to keep very quiet. The faintest of sounds would give him away.

The man’s now unmoving corpse touched the earth without making a sound, and the grinning hobgoblin took a few quiet steps backwards. The other two men still hadn’t noticed anything, so he wasted no time in dashing away around the tall thorn bushes and out of sight.

He’d done it! He’d snuck up right under that arrogant fool’s nose and killed his companion. Blacknail giggled to himself smugly. Who was the best assassin now? He was, that’s who! The hobgoblin giggled again as he dove behind the bush where he’d stashed his pants and the rest of his gear.

Mere seconds later yelling broke out from behind him as the dead man’s companions noticed his absence and his corpse was discovered. Oh how Blacknail wished he could see their faces right now!

“Shit, he got Janus! The monster was right here and we didn’t even notice. He must be flaming invisible. We have to make a bloody run for it now!” Malthus’ subordinate yelled with a voice full of fear.

He sounded one step away from full blown panic, which made Blacknail feel really special. Even fully grown human warriors were terrified of him! He was so amazing.

“Be quiet, he’s probably still somewhere nearby,” Malthus replied sternly. “You know why we can’t make a run for it. Not only are there traps scattered around this accursed place, but do you really think we could outrun a hobgoblin in a forest? One trip over a root or slip on some mud and we’d be done. We need to keep our heads together and make for safety slow and surely.”

“That’s not working, though! That thing… is out there and it’s just playing with us! It’s going to creep up behind us and slit our throats, and we won’t even see it coming. We have to run!” the other man stuttered loudly in response.

“If you run then I’ll kill you, and then you won’t have to worry about the hobgoblin,” Malthus told the other man coldly.

“Fine, you’re the boss, Malthus. You know what’s best so I’ll stay with you. That hobgoblin is probably no match for you anyway,” his nervous subordinate replied.

“Make sure you do, because I’m watching you,” Malthus remarked threateningly.

Over on the other side of the thorn hedge Blacknail had finished putting his clothes back on and was considering their words. He scratched his bald head as he considered Malthus’ behavior. The man sure was mean. He had threatened to kill his own companion if he tried to run. The poor man was obviously terrified!

Blacknail pulled his sling back out and sent a stone arcing over the bushes towards the assassins. It sailed through the air and tore its way through the greenery next to the assassins. It went nowhere near the humans but that wasn’t the point.

The last of Malthus’ minions yelped and jumped up into the air when he heard the unexpected noise. A second later he took off like a shot away from the bushes and Malthus.

The master assassin sighed deeply in annoyance and there was a whirring noise that sounded suspiciously like a knife being thrown. Oddly enough, it was followed by the sound of a blade sinking into flesh and a heavy thud. Blacknail grinned smugly; that was another one down.

“It’s just you and me now, hobgoblin! Are you ready to fight?” Malthus roared in challenge.

Blacknail didn’t reply. He wasn’t quite ready yet, so Malthus would just have to wait. Right now any confrontation between them would be far too much like a fair fight for his liking.

When no one replied the master assassin began trudging through the forest again. The hobgoblin followed closely behind him. Malthus was on his own now. He’d gotten rid of all the assassin’s minions but Malthus was by far the most dangerous of them all.

The man was a far better swordsman than the hobgoblin. Blacknail knew he would need a special plan to best the man. It was too bad he didn’t really have one... Oh well, something would probably pop into his head before too long.

Several minutes later Malthus was getting dangerously close to the edge of the vacant land and of returning to the city. Blacknail was running out of time. He’d been kind of hoping that Malthus would trip over a trap and kill himself, but that hadn’t happened. No dangerous forest creatures had inexplicably appeared and eaten him either.

As the master assassin walked out into small clearing that Blacknail recognized, the hobgoblin realized he had no choice. This was his last chance to stop the man from returning to the battlefield, and if that happened Herad would get very mad. With a regretful sigh, the hobgoblin walked out of the bushes and into the grassy clearing.

“Here I am, Malthus. Let’s fight,” he announced half heartedly as he pushed a branch out of his way.

“So the monster shows itself. What’s wrong; have you run out of tricks? I told you that I wouldn’t be done in by such petty traps or schemes,” Malthus replied angrily as he glared at Blacknail.

The assassin’s blade was already in his hand and he looked completely uninjured. He didn’t even seem that fatigued, although his cloak and clothes had become stained and dirty.

“I got tired of your smell. You’ve been upwind this entire time,” Blacknail replied as he drew his own sword and strode forward.

Malthus just smiled and carefully began to walk towards the hobgoblin. He didn’t seem ruffled by the loss of his men or the events that had happened in the forest. Blacknail couldn’t tell if it was an act or if he had been pretending earlier. It probably didn’t matter, though.

“I admit that I misspoke earlier when I said my victory over you would be just one small part of my legend. Instead, it shall be among my crowning achievements. In fact, I think I’ll have your head mounted and put on display,” the master assassin said as he took a fighting stance in the center of the clearing.

The hobgoblin raised his own blade and cautiously went to meet him. A gust of wind blew through the forest and into the clearing knocking autumn leaves loose from the trees and sending them swirling to the ground.

As the killers eyed each other and began to circle one another, both their cloaks caught the wind and rippled. Then there was a flash of silver as Malthus struck first. 












QOS 15











Blacknail ducked as the master assassin’s sword sliced through the air towards his head. As a result the blow passed harmlessly above him. He then raised his own blade to protect himself as he lunged forward to stab Malthus, but the assassin just laughed and easily sidestepped the blow.

“You’re fast, but too predictable,” Malthus told Blacknail with an amused chuckle.

The hobgoblin grunted in annoyance. He then raised his guard again and silently stared his opponent down. Neither one of them looked away as their eyes met. Without warning Malthus struck.

Blacknail hissed angrily as he burned Elixir for speed. A hot wave of energy ignited within him as he jumped backwards. The tip of Malthus’ blade cut though his shirt and drew blood, but it was only a scratch.

The master assassin immediately stepped forward and followed up his last attack with another one. This time it was a horizontal slash aimed at the hobgoblin’s chest. Blacknail stepped forward to meet the blow and swung his own weapon. There was loud clang as the blades collided, and Blacknail felt the pommel vibrate in his hands.

A second later the blades slid down against each other until the swords locked. Both fighters eyed each other as they fought to keep their balance and their swords up.

“That’s very hard on a sword, you know. They…” Malthus remarked snidely.

Before he could finish though, Blacknail’s left boot shot up towards his groin.

“That’s not very sporting,” the assassin joked as he easily twisted his hips out of the way of the low kick.

However, his move forced him to shift his balance and push his locked blade up higher. Deep with the hobgoblin’s mind instinct and experience sparked. Blacknail lunged forward as he instantly acted on the sudden thought.

With lightning-like speed the hobgoblin’s open mouth snapped towards Malthus’ hands. The assassin’s eyes opened in surprise as he was caught off guard by the move. Apparently bite attacks were rare in sword fights. Blacknail’s teeth grazed the man’s knuckles as he jerked his hands, and the sword in them, back.

The quick movement caused Malthus to stumble, and the hobgoblin mercilessly pressed his advantage. He stepped forward and battered the man’s sword aside. As Malthus struggled to get his guard back up Blacknail’s blade sliced towards his exposed shoulder.

Blood wetted the edge of the hobgoblin’s sword as it cut into the assassin’s skin, but Malthus was already dodging to the side. The attack failed to cut deep enough and Malthus spun away without any real damage. The assassin then tucked himself into a ball as his body hit the ground, and the long grass of the clearing was flattened beneath him as he rolled away.

The hobgoblin wasn’t about to let him get away that easily, though. He charged after the assassin with his sword raised above his head and ready to strike. The distance between them rapidly shrunk.

Just as he was about to catch up, a pair of slender projectiles flew out from the assassin’s form while he was in mid roll. Caught off guard, Blacknail could only flinch to the side to avoid the first one and flail wildly at the second. He got lucky and there was a muted clang as his blade safely knocked the spinning knife from the air.

Malthus used this time to spring to his feet and retake his fighting stance. Blacknail hissed in annoyance. He had been so close to killing the bastard! Now they were right back where they started.

“You’re certainly a creative fighter, but you’re not the only one with a few tricks up his sleeve,” Malthus bragged as he grinned smugly.

“You talk-ss too much,” Blacknail replied with a scowl.

“Whereas you apparently have better uses for your mouth,” Malthus observed irately. “I suppose I should expect such things from a savage beast like you.”

The assassin then scowled and wiped the small cut on his hand against his pants. Blacknail hoped it got infected. No wait, he hoped Malthus died way before that could happen.

“You taste like-ss a weakling, and smell-ss worse,” Blacknail grumbled in reply as he spat off to the side.

He then eyed his opponent carefully. The wound on the assassin’s shoulder was a sticky mess of torn cloth and blood but it seemed to have already stopped bleeding. It didn’t seem to be slowing him down either. Malthus’ sword was held out in a high guard and it looked steady.

Blacknail only had a superficial wound as well. He took up a basic stance of his own as he stepped forward. Both fighters had come out of the first exchange on even ground.

It looked like things had yet to be settled. The next clash of swords would determine who the better swordsman was, so Blacknail wasn’t going to do that. That would be really stupid and he wanted to live. He was going to keep trying to cheat!

In fact, he already had a plan in mind. He just needed to figure out how to set it up. The hobgoblin let his gaze slip away from Malthus and he scanned the surrounding brush.

His opponent didn’t give him time to think, though. Malthus advanced on Blacknail. He seemed eager to resume the fight, and that was just another reason Blacknail wanted to avoid it.

There was a crunching noise as Malthus stepped forward and crushed a twig beneath his feet. The hobgoblin readied himself as the assassin moved into striking distance. Sure enough, his opponent immediately attacked.

Blacknail blocked a flurry of quick strikes from Malthus, but every blow forced him backwards. The clang of steel on steel filled the clearing as their swords clashed.

Blacknail found himself slowly retreating as he desperately struggled to keep the assassin’s blade at bay. The sword in Malthus’ hand flowed like water through the air and had a grace Blacknail couldn’t match. The hobgoblin could only burn Elixir and muster as much speed as possible in an attempt to keep up.

The bushes at the edge of the clearing were getting very close now. He couldn’t back up forever. Not unless he wanted to risk tripping over something and then getting stabbed as he flailed around on top of a thorn bush.

Blacknail batted aside one slash that was aimed low, but Malthus’ blade twisted back around toward his face in a quick fluid motion. The hobgoblin hissed in alarm and threw himself to the side. Instead of following up though, Malthus took the opportunity to brag.

“I’ve got your measure now. I suppose you’re not a bad swordsman, all things considered. You’re better than you look anyway, but far from a master. This next pass will be your last,” Malthus remarked disdainfully.

The assassin then lunged forward again with a confident smirk on his face. His blade whistled through the air towards Blacknail.

The hobgoblin stepped back to lessen the power of the blow and blocked it, but Malthus just grinned. The assassin’s dark cloak rippled as he spun around to the side. His blade twisted around like a snake and suddenly an alarmed hobgoblin found his sword being knocked from his hands.

Blacknail managed to keep a grip on the hilt as the tip of the blade was forced down. Malthus’ technique wasn’t finished though. His own sword slid forwards and stabbed towards Blacknail’s gut. The hobgoblin hesitated for a moment, before letting go of his weapon and jumping out of the way.

It hit the ground with a muted thud as Malthus stepped passed it. The assassin quickly descended upon the now unarmed hobgoblin.

“And now you’re mine,” he gloated as he raised his blade above his head.

A panicked look appeared on Blacknail’s face as he cringed away from the blow. He threw himself backwards and to the right, but there was nowhere for him to go. The thorn bushes were behind him and Malthus’ charge was too fast.

The razor sharp edge of the sword sliced down towards him as the assassin stepped into range, but Blacknail’s mouth split open into a wide toothy grin and his panicked look disappeared. Malthus noticed the change and he hesitated, but it was far too late. As his sword swung downwards his foot hit the trap.

Leaves and other debris exploded into the air as the rope concealed beneath the grass sprung into motion. It wrapped around Malthus’ foot and pulled it savagely into the air as the bent over sapling it was tied to unfolded with a loud snap.

“Ahhh, hells,” the assassin yelled as the slithering rope wrenched him off of his feet.

The sapling wasn’t tall or strong enough to get him completely off the ground, but it didn’t have to. Malthus was dragged roughly across the grass and his head hit the ground with a loud thud. His sword slipped from his hands as he was pulled away.

When he came to stop the stunned assassin was lying on his back next to the still swaying tree. His clothes were disheveled and he was covered in bits and pieces of torn up plants. It wasn't the best look on him.

Blacknail grinned smugly to himself as he appreciated his handiwork. It had taken a lot of work to place so many traps everywhere but it had been worth the effort. It was a good thing he had spent so many hours learning to make rope...

As Malthus groaned and blinked in confusion, the hobgoblin skipped happily over to his side. The fun part was finally here!

“And now you’re mine, stupid human” Blacknail gloated as he loomed over his prey and grinned wickedly.

The hobgoblin wanted to take his time and enjoy this. What should he do to his catch? Should he skin him like a rabbit, cut off all his fingers and toes, or set him on fire? All three options had pluses and minuses. It was so hard to choose…

Oh, he knew! He could combine all of them and make Malthus jerky! It probably wouldn’t taste all that great, but it would be very satisfying in other ways.

Blacknail reached down to pull one of his knives out, but was interrupted when he felt Malthus grab his leg. What was the man up to? He wasn’t strong enough to do anything with his bare hands.

As the hobgoblin looked down in curiosity he felt an odd tingling sensation. He frowned and then was thrown sideways as pain burnt its way up his leg. He landed on the ground several feet away and yelped as every muscle in his body started to spasm.

Blacknail writhed painfully on the ground. What had Malthus done? Some sort of magic? Whatever it was, it hurt a lot!

“Ha, as if you could defeat me! I’m the greatest Knifeman in Daggerpoint, and you’re just a jumped up beast. My master selected me to succeed him and trained me to be undefeatable. I have all his skills and the power of a Vessel at my fingertips,” Malthus exclaimed as he cut himself free and slowly stood up.

The assassin sounded pained and he made no move to approach the fallen hobgoblin, though. He seemed unsteady on his feet and barely capable of standing.

The pain running along Blacknail’s nerves suddenly died down. He coughed and quickly rolled into a defensive crouch. As Malthus watched he stood up and met the man’s eyes. Both them stared hatefully at each other as they caught their breaths and cleared their heads.

The nearby songbirds had been startled by all the noise, but they resumed singing now that things were quieter. Around the two combatants colorful leaves continued to drift lazily down from the trees onto the knee high grass.

Blacknail hissed softly to himself. His entire body hurt, especially his leg, and the pain focused his thoughts. He now was utterly focused on killing his opponent. He would rip the man apart with his bare hands and enjoy the squishy feeling of his wet flesh between his fingers.

“Your pants are on fire,” Malthus dryly pointed out.

The hobgoblin’s first instinct was to ignore the man and assume it was a trick. However, his leg did sort of feel funny… Blacknail looked down. There was a large hole in the cloth below his knee where he had been grabbed, and it was smoldering.

“Eeep,” Blacknail yelped as he hopped up on one foot and began trying to put out the flames. He slapped his leg repeatedly with his hands until it stopped smoking.

“It would be far too embarrassing to die by your hands, so I’m going to have to go all out now,” Malthus remarked with a pained sigh.

As Blacknail calmed back down, Malthus unwrapped a thin short chain from around his waist. It was no longer than a man’s arm and ended in a weighted hook.

It didn’t seem like that threatening of a weapon but Malthus wouldn’t have drawn it without a reason. Something told Blacknail it was connected to the burning attack from earlier, and that could only have been caused by one thing.

“Magic, but you’re not-ss a mage,” Blacknail hissed in annoyance as he drew a pair of daggers and stared Malthus down.

“Indeed,” Malthus chuckled. “Not all Vessels are created equal.”

The assassin then raised a hand up to where Blacknail could easily see it. As the hobgoblin warily watched little tendrils of lightning danced between the man’s fingers.

“That’s cheating!” Blacknail exclaimed annoyance as he scowled.

“It’s a flashy trick, but it consumes a lot of very expensive elixir. Stabbing someone is almost always easier anyway,” Malthus added in explanation.

Blacknail hadn’t known Vessels could do anything like that. How come he didn’t have a power like that? He wanted a fancy magic trick, and he didn’t care how much it cost! It wasn’t like he paid for his own Elixir anyway. Also, Mahedium was definitely going to get an annoyed visitor later. How dare he not give Blacknail the best magic possible!

The combatants were only a dozen feet from each other and had both recovered enough to move. Malthus took a step forward and began to spin his chain. It made a whirring sound as it cut through the air.

Blacknail raised his daggers and took up a knife fighting stance that Saeter had taught him. He knew that the chain had to have some sort of trick to it.

Most likely it could somehow shock him like Malthus’ touch had. If that was the case then this fight was going to be very bothersome, and more than a little painful.

The hobgoblin kept his guard up as Malthus suddenly lunged at him. The man’s spinning chain shot out towards his chest. He didn’t try and block it. Instead, he dodged left and slashed over the chain towards Malthus.

The assassin simply stepped back out of the way. His chain had a lot more reach than a dagger.

“Crunchy maggots,” Blacknail cursed.

Knives weren’t the best weapon for this, and his sword was too far away to get at. Maybe he should have kept that crossbow...

Malthus suddenly swung the chain around towards the hobgoblin’s head, and Blacknail was forced to duck out of the way. The assassin kept attacking without a break. The chain rattled as it swung towards its target over and over again.

Blacknail managed to dodge every blow, but he couldn’t get near his opponent. Malthus had too much of a range advantage.

As he fought the hobgoblin furiously tried to come up with a solution. He needed a new plan. What tools did he have on hand? What could he use?

Suddenly, Blacknail remembered some of the preparations he’d made earlier. There was something nearby he could use!

As Malthus continued his assault Blacknail side stepped another attack and circled round to the left. With one eye on his opponent, he hurriedly started backing away. The assassin immediately followed him and his chain slashed out at the hobgoblin’s legs. Blacknail jumped over the weapon and continued his retreat.

Then Malthus lunged forward again and his chain smashed into the hobgoblin’s upper arm. Blacknail felt a crunching sensation as the weapon impacted his flesh and bone, but no shock. He reeled to the side but managed to keep on his feet. Ow, now his arm hurt too!

“Huh, your clothing must have been too thick. I’ll have to hit somewhere else next time, or just beat you to death,” the assassin remarked as he resumed spinning his chain.

“No, you won’t-ss do any of those things,” Blacknail hissed angrily back.

He had grown tired of this fight. He was exhausted, in pain, and really wanted to kill this stupid stinking human bastard!

The hobgoblin kicked the ground at his feet. The tip of his boot hooked a branch that was laying there and flipped it up into the air. Immediately, Blacknail burned Elixir and he felt the magic energy drive away some of his aches and pains.

With inhuman speed he grabbed the long heavy branch out of the air and swung it at Malthus’ head. The man’s eyes widened in surprise as the improvised club closed the distance between them. There was a loud thud and cracking noise as the branch slammed into his face and knocked the man over sideways.

Malthus crumpled onto the ground, and Blacknail didn’t give him any time to try anymore tricks. He stepped forward and continued his savage assault. The clearing was filled with wild growling and heavy thuds as Blacknail beat the man to death.

Soon, there was nothing left but a wrecked and bloody corpse. The assassin’s skull had several dents in it, and one of his eyes had been knocked loose from his head. From experience, Blacknail knew humans couldn’t survive nearly that much damage.

“Ha, I win!” the exhausted hobgoblin moaned as he dropped the club and turned around.

He was breathing heavily as he started slowly walking back to the battlefield. Both his leg and his shoulder hurt, but his mission had been accomplished. It was time to return to his tribe, so he could demand extra cheese and take a very long nap. 








QOS 16








After a minute or two of walking Blacknail stopped and sighed in exasperation. He then turned around and headed back the way he’d come. He’d forgotten to do a few things. To get back to his tribe he’d need to travel through the city and the people that lived there.

He didn’t feel like going back for his mask so he just left it behind. He did however fix up his clothes as much as possible so that he wouldn’t draw too much attention. They had gotten very dirty and torn so he looted a few bits and pieces from the men he’d just killed. They also made for convenient bandages to tie up his wounds.

None of Malthus’ stuff was salvageable; nothing was left of them but bloody scraps. It had been totally worth it, though; he regretted nothing.

Once Blacknail had managed not to look like some sort of murderous drifter, even if he kind of was one, the hobgoblin stepped back into the city. He slipped out of the bushes at the edge of the scrubland and into a nearby alley.

The cool air in the shady alley was a welcome change from being out under the hot sun. All the clothing he wore got very hot when he did strenuous activities such as fighting off squads of assassins and dueling their leader.

It didn’t take him all that long to trace his way back to the edge of Herad’s territory. He kept his head down and his distance from any crowds as he walked the city streets. There weren’t a lot of people around anyway, and those that Blacknail did see were moving quickly and looked nervous.

Word of the battle taking place had undoubtedly already spread. All the magical explosions from earlier had probably gotten people’s attention as well. Like rabbits or mice that had heard an unexpected noise the citizens of Daggerpoint were seeking shelter and finding other less dangerous places to be than out on the streets.

As he drew closer to Herad’s base the sounds of fighting became more and more obvious. The cloaked hobgoblin stopped at the entrance to an alley and looked up over the city as he listened. It sounded like the battle had started up again.

Zelena must have attacked again while he was gone. Blacknail’s chest tightened painfully as he felt a sudden sense of urgency. He picked up the pace and started to jog. He didn’t really want to join the fighting but what if something bad was happening? He had to know how the fight was going.

Quickly, Blacknail scuttled up the side of nearby building and pulled himself onto the roof. Once up in the sunshine he looked over to where Herad’s barricade had been built. Nothing remained of it but ash and the stone all around it was stained black. The flames had scarred the city.

Further back from the blaze the cobblestone streets were red with blood. Ha, Herad really had dyed the streets of Daggerpoint with the blood of her enemies, and more than a few of her minions as well. Saeter had told him she wasn’t being literal but he’d been wrong!

The killing was far from over, though. Below Blacknail the struggle for control of Daggerpoint was still ongoing. Blacknail frowned with concern as he realized Herad’s men were making a fighting retreat back towards their base. If the enemy reached the base then all of the hobgoblin’s things would be in danger, even his cheese!

Zelena had finally committed her own forces and they’d been joined by what was left of the mercenaries. A small solid square of shield bearing infantry were pushing their way down the center of the street. On both sides of them were loose mobs of Zelena’s bandits.

The attackers were steadily pushing the bandits of Blacknail’s tribe back, and they also had them outnumbered. They looked to have a man and a half for everyone in Hera’s tribe. However, the battle was far from over. Herad may have lost her tall wooden wall but Blacknail knew that she’d made other preparations. He’d spent a lot of time avoiding having to help set them up after all.

The advance of Herad’s enemies was slowed by layers of obstacles such as overturned carts and piles of sandbags. Blacknail’s tribe made ready use of the cover as they fought. Before they could be overrun they abandoned their barricade and moved to the next one.

As the hobgoblin watched a group of archers appeared on a rooftop down the street and opened fire. After several volleys had fallen on Zelena’s men the archers quickly disappeared before the enemy could muster a counter attack.

After looking around for a few more moments Blacknail climbed back down onto the ground. The safest place to be where he could still keep an eye on things would be next to Herad and his master. At least it would be as long as Saeter wasn’t doing anything too stupid…

Blacknail hurried through the empty side streets that ran parallel to the battle. He ran until the sounds of battle were behind him. It was then that he noticed the sentries. There were two of his tribe posted at the corner of the street, and they were doing a terrible job because they hadn’t noticed his approach. He wasn’t even trying to be all that stealthy!

Something really needed to done about how terrible humans were at watching and waiting. After all this was over maybe he should start attacking sentries at random. That ought to get them to pay attention, and all the really bad ones would end up dead.

As the hobgoblin studied the two men in front of him, his first thought was that he should just slip past them unseen. He decided against it a moment later, though. That would take effort and he was too tired and sore for that sort of thing. Instead, he slowed down to a non-threatening walk and headed their way.

The pair of sentries quickly noticed him and their shadowy forms tensed, finally. One of them stepped forward and drew their sword.

“Stop, who goes there?” he shouted as he brandished his blade in what looked like a poor attempt to look intimidating.

“It is I, Blacknail the faceless assassin and the greatest killer in Daggerpoint,” the hobgoblin bragged in answer.

He’d gotten the last title after he’d killed Malthus. He was fairly sure that killing the old greatest killer made you the new one. If that wasn’t case then he’d just kill anyone else who tried to claim it.

There was no response for several seconds. Both the sentries started whispering to each other.

“That’s the hobgoblin, right?” a thin man with a scruffy beard asked.

“Ya, tell him to drop his hood so we can be sure,” the shorter bald one replied.

“Drop your…” the first man started to say before falling silent.

Blacknail had already flipped his hood down. The bearded bandit squinted through the shadows at him

“Well, he’s definitely a hobgoblin,” he remarked in relief. He seemed glad that a fight wasn’t about to break out.

“Are we sure it’s Blacknail, though?” the bald bandit asked apprehensively.

His eyes were wide and his voice shook with anxiety. He obviously didn’t like being in a dark alley with a hobgoblin. His companion turned and gave him a dry look. Apparently, Blacknail wasn’t the only one who thought that was a really stupid question.

“No, it’s some other random hobgoblin that has decided to play dress up and wandered over to see what’s going on. As if anyone but Saeter could ever tame a hobgoblin, or want to!” the bearded bandit replied with biting condescension.

The two men then started to argue and bicker heatedly amongst themselves. Blacknail just ignored them walked right past. They were too preoccupied to stop him. Clearly, Herad wasn’t expecting a flanking attack and was putting her less intelligent minions where they could do the least amount of harm.

After a quick peek around the corner to make sure it was safe, Blacknail stepped out onto the main street. Before him was the rear of Herad’s forces. Bandits were running everywhere as they rushed to and from the front lines. A nervous energy permeated the air and Blacknail could smell both fear and excitement.

In the center of all the activity stood Herad; she was only a few dozen feet from the fighting and was yelling orders as she waved her short sword around. At her command bandits abandoned cover or held their ground and counterattacked.

When a group looked like it was about to be overrun she and her bodyguards would dive in and join the fray herself. Enemies fell by the dozen when that happened.

Blacknail couldn’t help but notice two unfamiliar faces next to her that were also racking up quite the body count. Judging by their physical prowess and the dark look in their eyes Blacknail was pretty sure they were Sloshers sent by Avorlus. Mahedium had mentioned something about that earlier, hadn’t he?

The fear she and her bodyguards inspired among Zelena’s men was obvious. They hesitated to approach her and were quick to retreat when she advanced. Only the mercenary formation was unaffected, and Herad seemed to be avoiding them.

Suddenly, there was a shift in the way the enemy was moving. The ranks of Zelena’s men parted and three humans stepped out into the now empty space in front of Herad.

One of them was obviously a mercenary. He was wearing their brown tunic and armed and armored the same way as them. The second was a huge human male in crude leather armor with a large round belly and a long black beard. He had a huge mace over his shoulder that looked to be the size of Blacknail’s entire body. The third was a tall woman with a chainmail shirt, steel helmet, and a long spear in her hands.

The hobgoblin was willing to bet that they were all Sloshers. Herad must have thought so as well because she instantly focused on them and ordered most her men back, only Avorlus’ Sloshers stayed by her side as she marched forward to meet these new foes.

Blacknail looked away from his chieftain for a second and tried to find Saeter. He scanned the nearby crowds but didn’t see him anywhere near the rear. With a frown of annoyance and concern he started looking along the front line. There a flash of movement caught his attention and he spotted his master’s face…

Ahh, Saeter was doing something stupid! Why was he fighting on the front lines? That was for dumb people and disposable members of the tribe! His master wasn’t replaceable. Did he want to get Blacknail killed?

Immediately, the frantic hobgoblin began pushing his way through the crowd of bandits that lay between him and the front line. He had to make sure his master was safe. Who else would feed and train him?

For reasons beyond Blacknail’s understanding Saeter had his sword out and was fighting one of Zelena’s henchmen. He was holding his own but he looked exhausted. His shoulders were slumped and his movements slower than usual.

Blacknail’s heart started beating faster and a sick uneasy feeling grew in his gut. He picked up his pace and shoved a nearby bandit out of his way.

As the hobgoblin drew nearer Saeter managed to parry his opponent’s blade and then deliver a deep slash to his chest. The enemy fell as blood poured from the wound. For a moment Blacknail almost felt relief but it didn’t last long. Another enemy fighter stepped forward to challenge his master, and this one was bigger and had a larger sword!

Saeter raised his blade defensively but he was too slow. The larger man’s sword swatted it aside and sent the old scout reeling. As Blacknail watched his master collapsed onto the ground and didn’t get back up.

The hobgoblin was sprinting now, and not so much pushing people out of the way as picking them up and throwing them. The uneasy feeling pulsating in his gut was being subsumed by a new emotion, a burning wave of all consuming fury. It raged through him like a storm of fire.

Blacknail’s clawed fingers tightened and curled. His eye narrowed and his lips curled up into a snarl to reveal his long pointy teeth. He was angry, very very angry.

The thug standing over Saeter raised his sword high in preparation to strike. There were still people in the hobgoblin’s way, but he didn’t care. Blacknail flared Elixir. It mingled inside of him and seemed to drive his rage to new heights.

So empowered, he jumped and landed on the shoulders of a surprised bandit. The man wobbled but Blacknail had already lunged away towards the target of his now intense and focused hatred.

He hit the unsuspecting thug like a sac of bricks thrown by an ogre. The man coughed painfully in surprise, dropped his sword, and lurched sideways as the speeding hobgoblin smashed into him. A second later he was falling over and Blacknail had his hands around the man’s neck. A second after that Blacknail’s claws sank into the man’s throat and the hobgoblin tore his windpipe out in a small gory red explosion.

Several of Zelena’s henchmen stepped forward to deal with the new threat, but they all froze in terror a second later. The jump and following impact had thrown the hobgoblin’s hood back, and Blacknail was far too enraged to give a damn.

He rose from atop his victim’s body with a vicious snarl on his face and blood dripping from his hands. A loud menacing growl echoed up from his chest and out through his lips as he turned to stare malevolently at his closest enemies. He would rip them all apart and bathe in their blood!

Some of Zelena’s men flinched away from his gaze, others paled and remained frozen in fear, and one blonde tall powerfully built man stepped forward to attack. Blacknail ducked under the blow and killed him with a knife through his groin. The man fell and bled to death in seconds.

The hobgoblin’s bloodlust was far from satisfied; feeding it had just made it stronger and the cravings more seductive. Blacknail went for the weakest and easiest prey next.

He grabbed the fallen man’s sword and swung it towards the closest of his stunned foes. The hobgoblin Vessel’s inhuman speed took everyone by surprise. Before anyone could react the blade had sliced off the man’s hand.

Blacknail was already spinning towards the next target. He slashed up towards the thug’s face but was stopped by a clumsy block. This didn’t stop the hobgoblin. He pushed his blade forward to knock the man off balance, and then stepped forward. As quick as thought, Blacknail’s hand shot out and his fingers sank into the man’s exposed eye sockets.

More screaming filled the air. It seemed to synch with the hobgoblin’s frantically beating heart and was music to his ears. Blacknail withdrew his hand and gave it a quick lick. The taste of iron, blood, and brains felt wonderful on his lips. It tasted like belonging.

A blade sliced through the air towards him but Blacknail dodged to the side. He laughed gleefully as the claws on his left foot tore through the front of his boot and into the groin of an attacker. Then, another thug stepped forward and right into Blacknail’s blade. The edge bit into his neck with fatal precision.

Blacknail laughed as bloodlust overtook him. All these stupid humans were so slow, and their moves were so obvious. He could kill them all day, and he would, because it was such great fun!

He ducked under a wild panicked swing and gutted the idiot who had attacked him. A space had cleared around Blacknail now. Both friends and foes had fallen back from him and the pile of mangled corpses at his feet.

The hobgoblin frowned as the sound of a yelling voice penetrated the red haze that surrounded him. One of his enemies was trying to summon some crossbowmen. Blacknail was so going to kill him next. He took a step forward to do just that when a hush fell over the battlefield.

Almost everyone was suddenly looking towards the center of the battlefield, and then Herad’s voice echoed over it.

“Your Vessels are dead Zelena. They couldn’t stand against me and neither can these pitiful drags you call an army. Now, do you dare challenge me personally or will you run like a coward?” she yelled loudly enough for everyone to hear.

There was no response from anyone on Zelena’s side, so Blacknail took this opportunity to murder the man to his left while everyone was distracted. Unfortunately, he didn’t die as quietly as the hobgoblin had hoped and his screams filled the air for a few moments before Blacknail could finish him off.

Blacknail met the eyes of his next victim and stepped forward. The man’s eyes widened in terror as he returned the hobgoblin’s gaze, and a second later he turned and ran. The thug to his left followed him, and then running away suddenly became the popular thing to do.

All around Blacknail men began to flee for their lives. Soon, it wasn’t limited just to those few men near the hobgoblin. The rhythm of pounding boots on cobblestone rang out repeatedly as all of Zelena’s men broke formation and turned to run. Even the mercenaries started to march slowly backwards.

As they fled, Blacknail took a step forward to chase them but then stopped. As hungry as he was for new kills he couldn’t help but notice that none of his tribe were in pursuit. Going after all of Zelena’s men alone might sound fun but it was also probably unhealthy.

The hobgoblin stood all alone on the blood covered street. As the red rage of his bloodlust slowly drained away, he remembered that he’d come here for a reason. His master had been hit! How could he have forgotten that?

Blacknail spun around to find out what had happened to Saeter. He desperately needed his master to be alright. No amount of blue cheese could replace the man who had taught him so much! 










QOS 17












There was ragged cheering from Herad’s band as Zelena’s forces fled for their lives. The shouts of dozens of tired but joyful men and women rose into the air as they celebrated their victory. Everyone still standing was glad just to have survived the long day of fighting.

With the battle now over, the anger and the energy that had come with it quickly started to drain from Blacknail’s body. Suddenly, he could feel all his injuries again and if anything they hurt more than before!

The hobgoblin couldn’t rest just yet, though. He immediately began limping around in search of his master. Blacknail needed to know if he was okay, and not dead or anything.

What was he going to do if Saeter was hurt? His chest felt unpleasantly hollow just thinking about it, and so did his stomach. His master was the one that fed him most the time!

It didn’t take long for Blacknail to find Saeter. The hobgoblin winced when he saw his master lying up against the side of a building.

Immediately, Blacknail ran over to his side and poked him in the arm.

“Are you-ss alive? It’s not-ss my fault if you died,” he asked as he crouched over his master.

Saeter coughed, opened his eyes, and glared angrily at the hobgoblin.

“I’m fine, stop poking me you overgrown goblin!” the old scout growled weakly.

“You don’t look or sound fine,” Blacknail replied in an unconvinced tone as he tilted his head to the side.

Now that he was closer the hobgoblin noticed that someone had wrapped some bandages around his master’s chest and left arm.

“Bah, I’m just taking a brief rest. I’m not so weak that a blow like that could do me in. I’m just out of shape is all. Now leave me alone,” Saeter said as he closed his eyes again.

Blacknail sighed in relief as he stood back up. Well, his master was apparently going to live, so that was good.

The curious hobgoblin decided to ask around and find out what exactly had happened while he’d been fighting. A few minutes later he got his answer.

Apparently, the blow from the now very dead thug had merely stunned Saeter, and when Blacknail had charged in one of his nearby tribesmen had taken the opportunity to drag the old scout back away from the front lines.

The rescuer was a young blonde man. He was one of the new recruits that Herad had hired in Daggerpoint.

Blacknail walked over to him. The young man paled slightly as he warily watched the bloodstained hobgoblin approach. Blacknail smiled reassuringly but that didn’t seem to help for some reason.

“What’s your name-ss?”Blacknail asked him.

“Eylias,” the man stuttered in reply.

Obviously, he was awestruck being around an amazing bandit such as Blacknail. The hobgoblin wasn’t surprised, he was really amazing.

The hobgoblin stepped up in front of Eylias and looked him over carefully. The blonde bandit froze and his eyes widened in utter amazement. Blacknail thought he looked smarter than the average human, although that wasn’t saying much.

With snake-like speed Blacknail leaned forward and wrapped the man in a huge hug. Elyais’ panicked attempts to escape were futile.

“Thank you for saving Saeter! I like you,” the hobgoblin exclaimed happily.

“You’re very welcome!” the man squeaked in alarm as Blacknail squeezed his ribs together.

“You can be my minion. I’ll show you how to make rope and kill people you don’t like,” the hobgoblin announced cheerfully.

All the important bandits had subordinates, so why shouldn’t Blacknail? He was pretty much the second or third most important bandit in the entire band!

“I don’t think…” Eylias gasped.

“Most humans-ss don’t. It doesn’t matter; you just have-ss to do what I say,” Blacknail explained as he let the man go.

Eylias stumbled unsteadily as the hobgoblin stepped back.

“I mean… I’m already part of Richter’s crew so I can’t be in yours,” the man quickly said after sucking down a long breath.

“I’ll just ask-ss Herad to fix that. Then we can go out-ss into the woods!” Blacknail replied.

“The woods?” the man asked with dawning horror.

“Sure, you need-ss to learn to hunt, and knowing how-ss not to get eaten or torn apart is important too,” the hobgoblin told him.

“No thanks, I don’t really want to learn that stuff,” Eylias quickly blurted out.

Blacknail just shook his head and sighed; he had expected this reaction. Humans were really lazy after all, so they needed motivation.

“Don’t worry! You just have-ss to do as I say, and then nothing bad will happen to you,” Blacknail said with a dark look and a meaningful nudge.

For added emphasis he then made a few stabbing motions with his hand. You could never explain things to clearly too humans.

“I see,” the young bandit replied a few seconds later.

He sounded more than a little shocked and overwhelmed. The right side of his face also seemed to be twitching slightly. Well, it wasn’t every day that a nameless disposable grunt like him managed to get such a great new position in the tribe!

Off in the distance, the sound of Herad yelling could still be heard. Even though the battle was over there was still tons of work to be done. Men were rushing around to help the wounded, load all the corpses and body parts on wagons, loot the fallen, and finish off wounded enemies.

The hobgoblin wanted to join in the fun but he was too tired and sore. He didn’t have the energy left to wander around the battlefield and look for loot to take home.

Oh well, most of his tribesmen would undoubtedly grow tired of their prizes and leave them lying around somewhere Blacknail could pick them up anyway. Most the things the hobgoblin wanted ended up in his possession one way or another. He just had to keep an eye open for all the despicable thieves…

Just then a pair of men arrived with a stretcher. Blacknail watched with interest as they loaded his master up and began to carry him back to base. That stretcher sure looked comfy and Blacknail was really sore from all the fighting.

A few dozen feet away another man was carrying a stretcher and looking for wounded to carry. Blacknail decided to help him. With a cheerful smile on his face he grabbed Eylias and dragged him over to the porter.

“I want to ride-ss on this. Carry me back to base,” he told the man with the stretcher.

“It’s um… only for wounded people,” the porter replied uncertainly.

“I’m very wounded. I can barely walk-ss and I feel like I’m going to fall over. Now carry me-ss back to base or my new minion Eylais will show you-ss how wounded I am, by hurting you the same way,” the hobgoblin replied threateningly with narrowed eyes.

The porter gave Elyais a confused look. The young blond just stared back with a bewildered look on his face.

Blacknail drew his knife and started to pick his nails clean with it in a very conspicuous manner while he stared intently at Eylias. He got the message.

“Right, you’d better do as he says,” the young bandit reluctantly said.

The porter looked between Eylias and Blacknail before shrugging and setting stretcher down on the ground. The hobgoblin then cheerfully jumped on and the two men started carrying him down the road. It was just as comfy as Blacknail thought it would be. He laid back and enjoyed the ride. He should travel everywhere like this.

However, they didn’t get very far before their trek was interrupted. Blacknail heard the sound of familiar light footsteps approaching and he opened his eyes to see Herad headed his way.

At first she gazed towards Saeter’s prone form and scowled in dissatisfaction, but then she turned towards Blacknail. Her eyebrows rose slightly in surprised amusement as she took in the sight the hobgoblin sprawled over the stretcher being carried by the two men.

“Ah, there’s my favorite hobgoblin. I heard that you’d walked back here on your own without any obvious injuries, but the sentries clearly must have not been paying enough attention. You’re obviously wounded so I’ll have to punish them later,” she told him.

Blacknail grinned uncertainly as he stifled a lazy yawn. The two men carrying him froze at their boss’ attention. The hobgoblin noticed that his chieftain looked unusually… happy. It made him uncomfortable, like being in the calm center of a storm. Apparently, all it took to put her in a good mood was the deaths of hundreds of her enemies.

“Yes, I’m very wounded; it hurts-ss everywhere. Bad sentries, they’re terrible at their jobs. Ow, the pain-ss,” he whined dramatically as he collapsed back onto the stretcher.

“I see. Well, since you’re obviously not too wounded to talk I need a report on what you’ve been up to. I gave a mission,” she told him with a trace of her usual sternness.

The hobgoblin quickly began telling his boss all about his plan to take out the assassins and how it had worked perfectly! He grinned and made suggestive hand gestures as he recounted the daring escapes and close fights that had taken place as he’d dealt with Malthus and the other two dozen assassins with him.

“…but now I’m so wounded. Ow, the pain-ss is everywhere inside of me,” Blacknail finished melodramatically.

The bandit chieftain rolled her eyes and a small grin appeared on her lips as the hobgoblin spoke. When he was finished she shook her head in disbelief.

“Since you’re so wounded I guess you won’t be able to get you reward for a while,” Herad remarked.

Visions of blue cheese and meat pies flashed through Blacknail’s head, and his stomach grumbled loudly in response.

“I can still eat!” Blacknail exclaimed quickly as he sat back up.

“Somehow I thought that might be the case,” Herad remarked dryly as she started to walk away.

After a second she seemed to hesitate and then spoke up again without looking back.

“Oh, and Blacknail… good job pulling Saeter’s ass out of the fire,” she told him before leaving.

When she was gone Blacknail relaxed and collapsed back down onto the stretcher in relief.

“What-ss are you two waiting for? Get moving!” he growled at the porters.

After returning to base and getting his own injuries patched up Blacknail curled up on his big comfy bed and took a nap. When he heard the sound of someone trying to wake him up he did his best to ignore it. Unfortunately, that proved difficult and he soon had to roll over and open his eyes so that he could glare at Khita.

“Wake up, Blacknail. You’ve already slept for over a day and Herad wants you,” the young woman said as she reached over to shake the hobgoblin.

“Touch me and I’ll bite you,” Blacknail hissed as he rolled away from her.

“She wants you to follow her to a meeting with the other chiefs in Daggerpoint,” Khita explained.

Blacknail grunted vaguely in reply but didn’t move. That sounded really boring. He was in no hurry to get off his wonderful bed and out from under his soft sheets.

“She wants you there to scare everyone and intimidate them,” Khita added.

The hobgoblin’s eyes opened again as he thought her words over. That actually did sound like fun. He could practice making scary faces. With a deep sigh, Blacknail sat up and looked back at Khita.

“Fine, I’m getting up. Go away,” he grunted.

“Hurry up; you don’t want to keep Herad waiting,” Khita replied as she walked out the door.

A few minutes later Blacknail was dressed in his usual clothes but without his mask. He was fairly sure he wouldn’t need it and it was still in the bush where he’d thrown it anyway.

He then dragged himself out of his room and joined Herad and her hulking bodyguards at the main entrance to the base. Herad was dressed in a fancier version of her usual black leathers and the shadows under her eyes seemed darker as well, but she smirked when the hobgoblin arrived.

Either the effects of winning the battle had yet to wear off or she was really looking forward to this meeting because she was still looking unusually cheerful. She wasn’t even glowering at anyone and it didn’t look like she was about to kill anyone at all!

With Blacknail in tow the two dozen bandits headed out towards the central district. They passed by the guards that stood watch over the border without incident and entered the better part of the city. After a brief walk past increasingly better maintained and larger homes they arrived at the mansion at the center of the city.

More sentries like those that guarded the central district stood outside of it, but Herad ignored them. She strolled right past them and they quickly shuffled out of her way without comment. A few of them noticed Blacknail and scowled, but the hobgoblin just threw them a toothy smile and they didn’t say anything.

As they approached, the doors to the mansion were thrown open and they marched inside. The room on the other side impressed Blacknail. It was the fanciest room he had ever seen. It was much fancier than even Luphera’s or Avorlus’ homes.

The walls were smooth pearly white plaster and long wispy white curtains framed the large glass windows. Intricate silver chandeliers hang from the roof to provide lighting. Even the tables and chairs looked like pieces of delicately crafted art.

“Greetings, mistress Herad. If you would please follow me I will take you to the conference room,” a sharply dressed servant explained with a bow.

Herad nodded in reply and the man immediately led them through a side door and into a short hallway. He then pulled open another door and motioned them inside.

The room on the other side of the door was dominated by a large round table. A dozen men and women were seated around it while a few dozen more stood around the edges of the room. Herad motioned for her minions to take up position along the wall behind her as she swaggered over to a chair and sat down at the table.

Once again, Blacknail drew a lot of attention and no one seemed happy to see him. The hobgoblin ignored them. He was busy trying to find somewhere to sit down.

Whoever had set up this room had been very inconsiderate in not including chairs for everyone, so Blacknail had to do a bit of problem solving. There was a small stand up against the wall and the hobgoblin simply took all the junk on top of it and placed it on the floor before sitting down. During the process a few of the decorations, including a silver candleholder, may have somehow inexplicably ended up in his pockets.

“Ahem, now that everyone is here let’s get this meeting started. As you all know several important and unusual events have recently taken place in this city,” a well dressed older man with a grey goatee announced.

“That’s a bloody understatement, Governor,” one of the rougher looking men at the table replied as he threw Herad an annoyed look.

“It’s a small miracle that most the city’s still standing. Some people have a lot to answer for,” someone else added.

“Ha, who are you referring to, Raelan?” Herad replied with a scornful chuckle. “I was simply defending myself, and I wasn’t the one that brought a mercenary company into the city with the intention of conquering it. Also, anytime you want me to answer for something you can feel free to challenge me to a duel. I’ll gladly accept that or a larger fight. With Zelena gone and Fang dead I have the largest force in the city.”

“Indeed, we are not here to reprimand anyone. While I have no say in what you do amongst yourselves in the outer parts of the city I myself don’t consider Herad to have broken any of the rules we agreed to when I invited all of you into the city. However, Zelena’s actions require some… discussion,” the Governor interjected.

“What do you mean by discussion?” another chieftain asked.

“I mean that I’m hoping we can agree to some clarifications about the rules. In particular, I’m talking about Zelena’s use of mercenaries. There is presently no rule against hiring such forces but I think we can all agree that in light of recent developments it’s unacceptable,” the older man explained.

“I have no problem with that. While everyone is here I’d also like to remind them that most of my band is operating down south right now, and that anyone else who enters my territory will be handled without mercy,” Herad added.

“And what about Herad’s new pet there? That thing should be put down. It certainly shouldn’t be roaming the city, let alone allowed in this room!” a large ugly looking female chieftain exclaimed.

Blacknail turned and glared at the speaker. He was pretty sure she was talking about him. He wasn’t a pet, though. The woman was obviously not that smart but Blacknail still didn’t like being insulted. Well, Herad had brought him here to be scary so he doubted she would care if he spoke up.

“Like-ss that weak fool Malthus, you insult-ss me. I’ll be seeing you-ss later,” he growled in his most sinister voice as he glared at the woman.

She flinched away from him as he spoke and she wasn’t the only one. Several other people in the room appeared more unnerved by his ability to speak than his looks. Herad just laughed.

“I’d like to see you forbid Blacknail from anywhere or anything. Several people who used to sit around this table learned the hard way that he goes where he wants. Even running would be futile. If you think he’s dangerous in this city you haven’t seen anything yet. He was trained to hunt and track by Saeter himself and he’s a bloody hobgoblin! There's nothing he enjoys more than hunting people through the forest. I’m sure that if you apologize he’ll forgive you though,” she remarked cruelly.

Blacknail did his best to look threatening. He scowled at the men and women at the table and around the edges of the room. If that didn’t get a reaction he smiled at them and licked his pointy needle–like teeth with his long agile tongue. That seemed to be what disturbed them the most.

The chieftains soon started to argue amongst themselves and eventually even acting scary started to grow boring. The humans just kept talking and talking! Blacknail was just about to get up and wander around the room when the meeting finally came to a close.

After what seemed like hours of arguing the only thing the bandit chieftains had agreed upon was the Governor’s proposal to ban mercenaries. If Herad had to deal with people like this all the time it was no wonder she wanted to kill everyone.

After a brief walk back to their base, Herad was greeted at the entrance by Saeter. Blacknail was glad to see his master up and about. The bandit chieftain dismissed her guards and turned to the old scout as they walked deeper into the building.

“What do you want, Saeter?” she asked him.

“I thought I should inform you of a discovery I made while looking over the loot Zelena left behind when she fled the city,” Saeter explained forebodingly.

Herad frowned at his words and tone of voice.

“I take it that this isn’t the kind of discovery that can be converted to cash?” she remarked wryly.

“Depends on what you mean. One of the things in the storeroom was an oak chest,” he told her.

“I remember it,” Herad replied impatiently.

“Well, I thought it looked familiar so I tried to open it. The good news is that there were several small bags of silver inside. The bad news is that I opened it with this. Blacknail took it from Persus when the man's caravan visited our camp.” Saeter told her as he held up a familiar golden key.

There was an ominous silence as Herad absorbed the old scout’s words and then her lips tightened into a scowl.

“Maybe they just buy chests from the same locksmith,” Herad replied a second later as she stared menacingly at the key.

Blacknail’s master opened his mouth to say something but Herad cut him off.

“Shut up, I was being sarcastic, Saeter,” she hissed at him.

Saeter closed his mouth and looked grim.

“Demons and damnation, that fucking weasel! Well, at least this explains why Werrick seems to have unlimited funds,” the bandit chieftain exclaimed darkly as she glowered.

Blacknail had no idea what they were talking about or why they were upset. It was just a key. He kind of wanted to ask for his cheese now, but it seemed like a bad time… 









EPILOGUE: FOS













 The plain looking middle-aged man passed his coat off to the waiting servant. It was a well made jacket of the finest quality but you wouldn’t have noticed that at first glance. It was tailored in a subdued style and had a simple design.

As the servant stepped away, the man calmly adjusted the collar of his shirt and walked down the mansion’s hallway. He didn’t bother to say anything to the servant or even acknowledge his presence more than necessary.

The severe looking man ignored his surroundings as he moved, even though the inside of the building was lavishly decorated. His face remained absolutely expressionless.

A long red carpet muted the sound of his footsteps as he walked. Night had fallen hours ago and it was pitch black outside, but an abundance of bright oil lamps lit the man’s way. The light from them glinted off the expensive silver and bronze items that were on display around the room.

He reached the end of the hallway and unhurriedly pulled the door open. There was a lavish but cozy room on the other side and it had three occupants. They were all seated around a small intimate table in the center of the room. All three of them looked up as the newest arrival entered and closed the door firmly behind himself. It clicked shut as the mechanism within sealed the room.

The man gave each of his compatriots a quick look over, but his thin face revealed nothing of his thoughts. There were two other men and one woman at the table.

One of the men was older than him and had a neatly trimmed beard, graying hair, and a smug twinkle in his eye. The other was younger, clean shaven, and didn’t look to be in good shape. He had a pudgy cast to his features and looked like he was carrying extra weight.

“Thank you for joining us, Ressarus,” the grey haired gentleman said as the man pulled out a chair and took a seat.

“Thank you for hosting this meeting, sir” Ressarus replied politely but emotionlessly.

“I hope your journey here was less eventful than mine,” the matronly looking woman remarked.

She was wearing a long plain dress that gave her a frumpy look and her long blonde hair was carefully braided. Altogether, it made her seem older than she actually was.

“I ran into no surprises, and I’m glad to see that you’re fine and still capable of continuing to fulfill your responsibilities for this company,” Ressarus told her.

“Your concern touches my heart,” the woman told him dryly as she tinkered with a wine glass.

“None of us are responsible for your travel plans, or how spectacularly they went wrong. Maybe next time you won’t skimp out on hiring the necessary protection. We don’t control the North yet,” the younger man told her scornfully.

“I never said you were,” the woman replied coldly.

There were no servants in the room, and only a single bottle of wine on the table. Nor were there any windows in the walls. All the light came from a silver chandelier hanging overhead.

“Wonderful, now that the formalities are done with, let’s get down to business. I have ventures of my own to get back to and a throng of lesser nobles that need to be kept in line,” the bulky man suggested impatiently as he reached for the wine bottle and poured himself a cup.

He then set the bottle back down and took a sip from his glass. His comment earned him scowls of disapproval from the woman and Ressarus. The older grey haired man simply smirked as he folded his hands in front of himself on the table.

“Oh, what’s with that stupid look on your face, Ressarus. You’re even less of a stickler for formalities than me,” the youngest member of the group remarked irritably.

“Perhaps, but impatience is not something I approve of either, especially in business partners. I believe that the fact we went rushing in without proper preparation is the reason our plans have been recently delayed,” Ressarus explained.

“Ah, you’re talking about that mess in Daggerpoint. That was unfortunate, but I would hardly even call it a real setback,” the older man replied.

“Yes, you’re probably right that our impatience is to blame for our failure there. We saw an opportunity to expedite our plans and took it. However, Zelena’s failure simply means we are back to our old schedule, and all it cost us was a small chest of silver,” the woman added as she shrugged without apparent concern.

“Ha, even we don’t have unlimited funds. We shouldn’t get in the habit of accepting such losses. Investing so much money in that fool Zelena was a mistake on our part. We should have waited until Werrick could take things in hand personally,” the bulky man remarked.

“Now now, we all knew this would be a complicated endeavor and that we would face setbacks. Let us simply move forward from here,” the older man interjected calmly.

“Agreed,” Ressarus commented.

There were mutters of agreement from the other people at the table as well.

“So, we underestimated both Herad’s pride and her competence, but that won’t happen again. Based on what Persus told us we assumed she wouldn’t make a good… employee, so we chose to ignore her until it came time for Werrick to eliminate her. However, these latest events have shown that we must deal with her directly,” the older man added.

“Yes, the next time we move we must leave nothing to chance. For Werrick to control the North for us the Black Snake must be eliminated. I propose we spare no expense when we move against her; she must be crushed with overwhelming strength!” the younger man told his partners.

“Winter is almost here so we can’t do anything until spring. I’m not sure if you’ve ever seen a proper northern winter, but it shuts almost all travel down,” the woman remarked.

“That works both ways. Herad’s movements will be restricted as well. She will be stuck in Daggerpoint all winter. Come spring, she will assuredly then move South to reunite with the rest of her band. We simply have to get ready to strike once that happens,” Ressarus explained.

“Won’t that kind of manpower draw attention to ourselves?” the woman asked.

“From who? The nearby lords are the next best thing to destitute. Hulgaron is kingless and Eloria preoccupied by myriad other concerns. We also have agents in place that can make sure anyone looking is distracted if necessary. A group of merchants paying to exterminate some bandits is hardly suspicious, anyway. Anyone who even notices will probably applaud us!” the younger man explained.

“Indeed, it would even set a useful precedent. Since no one else is willing to stand up to all the nefarious bandits in the North, why should we not protect ourselves? When Warrick pushes South none of the powerful lords will care if we raise a small army of mercenaries to protect our interests, and once that happens…” Ressarus drawled on suggestively.

The older man laughed and smiled cheerfully at his companions and poured himself a glass of wine. He then raised his glass up into the air in front of himself. He looked like nothing more than someone’s favorite elderly uncle.

“Then it’s official; I don’t see any need for a formal vote. When the snows start to melt this spring the Broken Wheel Company will destroy The Black Snake and her band. Cheers!” he happily announced.

The others all raised their glasses, even Ressarus’ empty one, and a chorus of cheers and the sound of chinking glass filled the room. None of the participants had any doubt in their minds that they would succeed. The resources they controlled were simply far too great for a mere bandit chief to stand against.
Advertisement



